597 在主耶稣心头有爱为着你
1 在主耶稣心头，有爱为着你；  这爱纯洁、温柔，且深切无比。  为何你感孤单，常叹无友伴？  因在主心里面，正将你顾念。 
2 在主耶稣心上， 常将你关注；  温暖有如阳光， 甘甜如晨露；  为何你感不安， 常挂虑、忧愁？  因主耶稣思念， 凡祂所拯救。 
3 在主耶稣田里， 有份工为你；  天使也都愿意， 能一同参与。  为何闲站叹息， 向往作大事？  正当主的田里， 需你来尽职。 
4 在主的教会里， 有处所为你；  荣耀、光明、公义，喜乐又安息。  为何在外徘徊， 如无家可归？  正当在主教会， 有处为你备。 
597 IN THE HEART OF JESUS THERE IS LOVE  FOR YOU
1 In the heart of Jesus There is love for you, 
 Love most pure and tender, Love most deep and true;  Why should you be lonely, Why for friendship sigh,  When the heart of Jesus Has a full supply? 
2 In the mind of Jesus There is thought for you, 
 Warm as summer sunshine, Sweet as morning dew;  Why should you be fearful, Why take anxious thought,  Since the mind of Jesus Cares for those He bought? 
3 In the field of Jesus There is work for you; 
 Such as even angels Might rejoice to do; 
 Why stand idly sighing For some life-work grand,  While the field of Jesus Seeks your reaping hand? 
4 In the Church of Jesus There’s a place for you; 
 Glorious, bright, and joyous, Right and peaceful too;  Why then, like a wand’rer, Roam with weary pace,  If the Church of Jesus Holds for you a place?
598 敬爱的主美善无比
1 敬爱的主，美善无比；  是我良友，忠诚无欺。  你的爱心，像你能力，  无限无量，始终如一。 
2 耶稣，你是首先末后；  属天道路，你领我走；  为着已往，我赞美你；  为着将来，我信靠你。 
598 HOW GOOD IS THE GOD WE ADORE
1 How good is the God we adore, 
 Our faithful, unchangeable Friend; 
 Whose love is as great as His pow’r, 
 And knows neither measure nor end. 
2 ‘Tis Jesus the First and the Last, 
 Whose Spirit shall guide us safe home: 
 We’ll praise Him for all that is past, 
 And trust Him for all that’s to come.
599 蒙恩群众将主颂扬
1 蒙恩群众，将主颂扬！  其恩何深，其爱何厚；  无以图报， 
 甘心献上所是并所有。 
2 耶稣圣名，将我吸引；  赐我装备，战胜敌军；  作我保护，不受伤损；  祂有信心。 
3 愿众圣徒投靠救主，  祂的信实今仍如初，  不论强暴或是骗术，  不能隔绝主。 
4 求我救主容我亲近，  永不疏远，永不失信，  等我得了主所应允，  祂是我永分。 
5 那时到我所爱乐地，  那时我得全然更新；  世间所无全备福气，  全都归我们。 
599 PRAISE THE SAVIOR YE WHO KNOW HIM
1 Praise the Savior, ye who know Him! 
 Who can tell how much we owe Him? 
 Gladly let us render to Him 
 All we are and have. 
2 Jesus is the name that charms us; 
 He for conflicts fits and arms us; 
 Nothing moves and nothing harms us 
 When we trust in Him. 
3 Trust in Him, ye saints, forever; 
 He is faithful, changing never; 
 Neither force nor guile can sever 
 Those He loves from Him. 
4 Keep us, Lord, oh, keep us cleaving 
 To Thyself and still believing, 
 Till the hour of our receiving 
 Promised joys with Thee. 
5 Then we shall be where we would be; 
 Then we shall be what we should be; 
 Things which are not now, nor could be, 
 Then shall be our own.
600 暗中摸索无一线光明
1 暗中摸索，无一线光明！  何等疲乏！何等劳形！  但一仰望基督你的王，  什么都必照耀辉煌。
和 转眼将耶稣仰望， 
 将祂荣脸注目观赏！  所有事物在祂荣耀光中，  都要次第变色成蒙眬。 
2 经过死亡就必得生命，  祂已前去，我们随行；  罪的权势今已经过去，  我们已经得胜有余。 
3 祂的应许终不至落空，  若信靠祂，事事亨通；  所以应当坚定不灰心，  你必经历祂的救恩。 
600 O SOUL ARE YOU WEARY AND TROUBLED
1 O soul, are you weary and troubled? 
 No light in the darkness you see? 
 There’s light for a look at the Savior, 
 And life more abundant and free. 
(C) Turn your eyes upon Jesus, 
 Look full in His wonderful face, 
 And the things of earth will grow strangely dim,  In the light of His glory and grace. 
2 Through death into life everlasting 
 He passed, and we follow Him there; 
 O’er us sin no more hath dominion 
 For more than conqu’rors we are! 
3 His Word shall not fail you, He promised; 
 Believe Him and all will be well; 
 Then go to a world that is dying, 
 His perfect salvation to tell!
601 你这奔跑正路手垂脚酸的人
1 你这奔跑正路、手垂脚酸的人，  望断以及于主，免得疲倦灰心；  祂面光照灿烂，驱尽困人黑暗，  你若仰望祂脸，就必明如中天。 
2 望断以及于主，你灵必蒙恩湛，  在世上有苦楚，在祂里面平安；  在人生苦海中，时有波浪澎湃，  若仰望祂面容，你心必不惊骇。 
3 望断以及于主，你就不会迷糊，  你若向祂举目，祂必指你正路；  当祂领你前走，即使遇到云雾，  你若向祂仰首，也必不会错误。 
4 望断以及于主，你心就必安宁，  祂在你旁看顾，有何使你战兢？  既知祂的大能，随时作你保护，  “你为何感不宁？”实在无以答覆。 
5 望断以及于主，直到被提上天，  祂荣耀的面目，完全显你眼前；  今所仰望荣面，使你路中得力，  那日变为颂赞，使你永远欢喜。 
601 O EYES THAT ARE WEARY AND HEARTS  THAT ARE SORE
1 O eyes that are weary and hearts that are sore, 
 Look off unto Jesus and sorrrow no more; 
 The light of His countenance shineth so bright, 
 That on earth as in heaven, there need be no night. 
2 “Looking off unto Jesus,” my spirit is blest; 
 In the world I have turmoil — in Him I have rest;  The sea of my life all about me may roar, 
 When I look unto Jesus I hear it no mom. 
3 “Looking off unto Jesus,” I go not astray; 
 My eyes are on Him, and He shows me the way;  The path may seem dark as He leads me along, 
 But following Jesus I cannot go wrong. 
4 “Looking off unto Jesus,” my heart cannot fear,  Its trembling is still when I see Jesus near; 
 I know that His power my safeguard will be, 
 For, “Why are you troubled?” He saith unto me. 
5 Soon, soon shall I know the full beauty and grace  Of Jesus my Lord when I stand face to face; 
 I shall know how His love went before me each day,  And wonder that ever my eyes turned away.
602 亲爱基督精兵 争战正激烈 特.
1 亲爱基督精兵， 争战正激烈，  前曾倚赖自己， 我精疲力竭；  今不再靠自己， 单靠基督大力；  靠那加我力量主， 凡事我都能作。 
2 在你日常分内， 为公义站立，  是否有时厌倦， 感到不容易？  永不疑惑救主， 是你得胜之路：  靠那加我力量主， 凡事我都能作。 
3 路中若感疲乏， 祂必来扶助，  无论你是喜乐， 或者是痛苦；  应对撒但宣告， 应对环境称道：  靠那加我力量主， 凡事我都能作。 
4 在这邪恶世界， 试探实频繁，  但你不需跌倒， 撒但必逃窜；  他必全然徒劳， 只要你肯宣告：  靠那加我力量主， 凡事我都能作。 
5 基督能力无量， 深广如海洋；  祂能拯救到底， 凡事都担当；  祂的够用恩力， 将我软弱覆庇：  靠那加我力量主， 凡事我都能作。 
602 SOLDIER SOLDIER FIGHTING IN THE  WORLD’S GREAT STRIFE
1 IRREGULAR METER
Comfort and Encouragement 
1 Soldier, soldier, fighting in the world’s great strife,  On thyself relying, battling for thy life; 
 Trust thyself no longer, Trust to Christ — He’s stronger;  I can all things, all things do Through Christ, which strengtheneth  me. 
2 In your daily duty, standing up for right, 
 Are you sometimes weary — heart not always light?  Doubt your Savior never, This your motto ever: 
 I can all things, all things do Through Christ, which strengtheneth  me. 
3 Help you in your troubles and your pleasures too;  Say, when Satan’s by you; Say, when all things try you:  I can all things, all things do Through Christ, which strengtheneth  me.
4 In a world of trouble, tempted oft to stray, 
 You need never stumble, Satan cannot stay, 
 Will but tempt you vainly, If you tell him plainly:  I can all things, all things do Through Christ, which strengtheneth  me. 
5 Jesus’ power is boundless, boundless as the sea; 
 He is always able, able to keep me, 
 Power bring from my weakness, Glory from my meekness:  I can all things, all things do Through Christ, which strengtheneth  me.
603 你当安息这是有福的秘诀
1 “你当安息！”这是有福的秘诀，  使你生活真能讨主喜悦； 
 并非最忙的人，最能事奉神，  乃是安息在祂话上的人。 
2 “你当安息！”安息乃最高服事；  神的秘密平静的心得知； 
 故当学习等候、儆醒并劳力；  从主得力，因祂住在你里。 
3 “你当安息！”惟独安息方证实，  你已将一切挂虑交托主； 
 “你当安息！”如此生活将见证：  是神工作，是神听人求恳。 
4 “你当安息！”当人问说：”谁是神？  祂在那里？”你就是个覆讯；  神是安息，祂居住在安静里，  凡住祂里，就必分享安息。 
603 BE ALL AT REST MY SOUL OH BLESSED  SECRET
1 “Be all at rest, my soul!” Oh! blessed secret 
 Of the true life that glorifies thy Lord; 
 Not always doth the busiest soul best serve Him,  But he who resteth on His faithful word. 
2 “Be all at rest!” for rest is highest service; 
 To the still heart God doth His secrets tell; 
 Thus shalt thou learn to wait, and watch, and labor,  Strengthened to bear, since Christ in thee doth dwell. 
3 “Be all at rest!” for rest alone becometh 
 The soul that casts on Him its every care; 
 “Be all at rest!” so shall thy life proclaim Him 
 A God who worketh and who heareth prayer. 
4 “Be all at rest!” so shalt thou be an answer 
 To those who question, “Who is God, and where?”  For God is rest, and where He dwells is stillness,  And they who dwell in Him that rest shall share.
604 要思想耶稣以祂作模型
1 要思想耶稣，以祂作模型，  好在你身上显出祂荣形：  祂已经赐你永远的生命，  并使你享受复活的大能。 
2 要思想耶稣，天天都如此，  要自甘卑微，不再有大志；  甘心愿舍弃虚空的事物，  将荣耀归给在天上的父。 
3 哦，神的儿女，莫退缩畏惧，  与耶稣同死，是我们所需；  才认识无穷生命的大能，  并得以脱离罪、己的权能。 
4 要思想耶稣，一生当这样，  要活在幔内常见主荣光；  若弃掉自己，必知主心意，  一脱离自己，纯洁又安息。 
5 要思想耶稣，当你在向前，  要一直向上瞻仰祂荣面，  必荣上加荣，变成祂形状，  使祂的形像显在你身上。 
604 CONSIDER HIM LET CHRIST THY PATTERN  BE
1 “Consider Him,” let Christ thy pattern be, 
 And know that He hath apprehended thee 
 To share His very life, His pow’r divine, 
 And in the likeness of thy Lord to shine. 
2 “Consider Him”; so shalt thou, day by day, 
 Seek out the lowliest place, and therein stay, 
 Content to pass away, a thing of nought, 
 That glory to the Father’s name be brought. 
3 Shrink not, O child of God, but fearless go 
 Down into death with Jesus; thou shalt know 
 The power of an endless life begin, 
 With glorious liberty from self and sin. 
4 “Consider Him,” and thus thy life shall be 
 Filled with self-sacrifice and purity; 
 God will work out in thee the pattern true, 
 And Christ’s example ever keep in view. 
5 “Consider Him,” and as you run the race, 
 Keep ever upward looking in His face; 
 And thus transformed, illumined thou shalt be, 
 And Christ’s own image shall be seen in thee.
605 用功追求圣洁 多和主对讲
1 用功追求圣洁， 多和主对讲，  常住在祂里面， 以祂话为粮。  等候在祂面前， 柔顺且降服，  每件事上不忘， 寻求祂祝福。
2 用功追求圣洁， 事务虽忙碌；  多花时间单独 和主在密处。  借着仰望耶稣， 变成祂形像；  在你的行为上， 人见祂模样。 
3 用功追求圣洁， 让祂作领导；  任何事情发生， 不在祂前跑；  无论是乐是苦， 始终跟随主，  始终相信祂话， 常仰望耶稣。 
4 用功追求圣洁， 内心须宁静；  让祂前来管理 意念和性情。  祂灵把你带到 爱的发源所，  如此你才配作 属天的工作。 
605 TAKE TIME TO BE HOLY SPEAK OFT WITH  THY LORD
1 Take time to be holy, Speak oft with Thy Lord, 
 Abide in Him always, And feed on His Word. 
 Wait thou in His presence, Submissive and meek, 
 Forgetting in nothing His blessing to seek. 
2 Take time to be holy, The world rushes on; 
 Spend much time in secret With Jesus alone. 
 By looking to Jesus Like Him thou shalt be; 
 Thy friends, in thy conduct, His likeness shall see. 
3 Take time to be holy, Let Him be thy guide; 
 And run not before Him Whatever betide; 
 In joy or in sorrow Still follow thy Lord, 
 And, looking to Jesus, Still trust in His Word. 
4 Take time to be holy, Be calm in thy soul, 
 Each thought and each temper Beneath His control.  Thus led by His Spirit To fountains of love, 
 Thou soon shalt be fitted For service above.
606 你愿否常保纯良活着只为耶稣
1 你愿否常保纯良，活着只为耶稣？  你愿否欢然和祂同行窄路？  你愿否让祂为你负轭、担你重负？  凡事让祂作你主。 
和 祂的能力够你一切所需，  祂的宝血洗净你的罪污，  祂的大爱充满你心有余，  因此你该凡事让祂作主。 
2 你愿否被祂释放，跟随祂的召呼？  知否平安来自舍弃你全部？  你愿否让祂救你，保守你永稳固？  凡事让祂作你主。 
3 你愿否在祂国里寻得安息之处？  你愿否证实祂有属天安舒？  你愿否竭尽心力，服事不辞劳苦？  凡事让祂作你主。 
606 WOULD YOU LIVE FOR JESUS AND BE  ALWAYS PURE AND GOOD
13.11.13.7. WITH CHORUS 
Comfort and Encouragement 
1 Would you live for Jesus and be always pure and good?  Would you walk with Him within the narrow road?  Would you have Him bear your burden, carry all your load?  Let Him have His way with thee. 
(C) His power can make you what you ought to be,  His blood can cleanse your heart and make you free,  His love can fill your soul, and you will see 
 ‘Twas best for Him to have His way with thee. 
2 Would you have Him make you free, and follow at His call?  Would you know the peace that comes by giving all?  Would you have Him save you, So that you can never fall?  Let Him have His way with thee. 
3 Would you in His kingdom Find a place of constant rest’?  Would you prove Him true In providential test?  Would you in His service Labor always at your best?  Let Him have His way with thee.
607 你们能否顺从 你一切的主
1 你们能否顺从 你一切的主，  如果地要震动， 天象要翻覆？  你们能否相信， 神与你同在，  就是灾祸忽临， 必定不遭害？ 
2 你们能否顺从 所事奉的主，  不稍软弱、惊恐， 也不稍让步？  虽然你的前途 好像是死路，  此时能否顺服， 而不一自顾？ 
3 你真能否顺从， 如果主召你  加入前线进攻， 抵御凶仇敌？  你真能否立前， 欢喜受差遣？  你真能否争战， 直到晚色遍？ 
4 能否？我的弟兄， 你神已久等，  应当服祂权柄， 遵行祂命令。  你若作主精兵， 当祂再降临，  祂要题起你名， 并说你”忠心！”  
607 CAN YOU BE OBEDIENT TO THE LORD OF  ALL
1 Can you be obedient To the Lord of all, 
 Though the earth should totter, Though the heav’ns should fall?  Face e’en a disaster With a faith-filled heart, 
 Knowing naught can harm him Who with Christ will start? 
2 Can you be obedient To the Lord you serve, 
 Never even flinch, friend, Never even swerve; 
 Though your next step onward Seem to lead to death?  Can you then obey Him Without bated breath? 
3 Can you trust your Leader When He bids you go 
 Right into a battle With a mighty foe? 
 Can you step up briskly And with joy obey? 
 Can you fight the battle, Till the end of day? 
4 Can you? Then beloved, Christ just waits for you;  Listen for His orders, Glad His will to do; 
 Then when soldiers muster At the set of sun, 
 And your name is mentioned, Christ will say, “Well done.”
608 在主里喜乐因祂怜悯欢愉
1 在主里喜乐！因祂怜悯欢愉，  罪恶捆锁祂已断裂；
 被宝血赎回，我们何需畏惧？  耶稣乃是我们一切。 
和 神若帮我们，神若帮我们，  神若帮我们，谁能敌挡我们？  谁？谁？谁？ 
 谁还能敌挡，敌挡我们？ 
2 在主里刚强！因祂大能喜乐，  天天靠祂忠心、坚刚； 
 当仇敌攻击，为义勇敢站着，  祂就必作你的力量。 
3 相信主的话，祂的应许可靠；  在主都是”是”与”阿们；”   天地会过去，主话永不动摇，  持守主话就必蒙恩。 
4 住在主里面，交托祂真安稳，  永远生命作我保证； 
 要从祂手中夺去最弱灵魂，  此事永远决无可能！ 
608 REJOICE IN THE LORD OH LET HIS MERCY  CHEER
11.8.11.8. WITH CHORUS 
Comfort and Encouragement 
1 Rejoice in the Lord! Oh, let His mercy cheer; 
 He sunders the hands that enthrall; 
 Redeemed by His blood, why should we ever fear, 
 Since Jesus is our all in all? 
(C) If God be for us, if God be for us, if God be for us,  Who can be against us? 
 Who? who? who? 
 Who can be against us, against us? 
2 Be strong in the Lord! rejoicing in His might, 
 Be loyal and true day by day; 
 When evils assail, be valiant for the right, 
 And He will be our strength and stay. 
3 Confide in His Word, His promises so sure; 
 In Christ they are yea and amen; 
 Though earth pass away, they ever shall endure, 
 ‘Tis written o’er and o’er again. 
4 Abide in the Lord, secure in His control, 
 ‘Tis life everlasting begun; 
 To pluck from His hand the weakest, trembling soul,  It never, never can be done!

609 何必耽心一握不释
1 何必耽心一握不释？  且让先知先果腹；
 若是神管你的度支，  你的来源何患枯？ 
 每天都有新的需要，  每天必有新供给； 
 你既然是祂所创造，  祂岂不为你设计？ 
和 仍然当爱，仍然当给，  照旧你还余一握； 
 所有的爱，所有的给，  要使神赐加倍多。 
2 相信！时候不至蹉跎，  虽是不快，总不慢；  相信！瓶子不至干涸，  永远不空，也不满。  纵使百合缺了衣衫，  纵使小鸟无食啄， 
 但是寡妇微小面坛，  必定依然有一握。 
3 何必豫料明天境遇，  今天够了就可乐； 
 何必先借明天忧虑，  手里岂非还有着！ 
 爱是生活，给反存留，  种得多的收也多； 
 好像你已罄你所有，  看哪！你还有一握！ 
609 SHARE THY HANDFUL WITH THE  STRANGER
8.7.8.7.D. WITH CHORUS 
Comfort and Encouragement 
1 Share thy handful with the stranger; 
 Bid the Prophet to thy board; 
 No resources are in danger 
 Whose exchequer is the Lord. 
 Daily new demands await thee, 
 Daily new supplies are sent; 
 He alone who doth create thee 
 Can secure thy nourishment. 
(C) Giving, giving, o’er and o’er,  
 Still you’ll find one handful more. 
 Loving is the truest living; 
 God will double all thy store. 
2 Trust! the Lord will not deny thee, 
 Ev’ry longing shall be stilled; 
 Trust! the cruse will yet supply thee, 
 Never empty, never filled. 
 Should the lilies lack apparel? 
 Should the ravens cry in vain? 
 Even then the widow’s barrel 
 Shall its handful still retain. 
3 Why shouldst thou forecast the morrow?  Take with gladness while you may; 
 Why, dismayed, forbodings borrow? 
 See! thou hast enough today; 
 ‘Tis by loving that thou livest, 
 Spending doth not waste thy store, 
 Tho’ it seems the last thou givest, 
 There is, aye, one handful more.
610 神的人哪兴起
1 神的人哪，兴起！ 
 你为何懒洋洋？ 
 应当尽心、尽意、尽力，  服事万王之王。 
2 神的人哪，兴起！ 
 祂的国度迟延； 
 带进弟兄相爱实际，  了结错谬夜晚。 
3 神的人哪，兴起！ 
 教会在等着你， 
 她的任务承担不起，  需你兴起加力。 
4 高举基督十架， 
 跟随祂的脚； 
 祂的弟兄，应当像祂，  兴起，同祂行动！ 
610 RISE UP O MEN OF GOD
1 Rise up, O men of God! 
 Have done with lesser things; 
 Give heart and soul and mind and strength  To serve the King of kings. 
2 Rise up, O men of God! 
 His kingdom tarries long; 
 Bring in the day of brotherhood  And end the night of wrong. 
3 Rise up, O men of God! 
 The Church for you doth wait, 
 Her strength unequal to her task:  Rise up, and make her great. 
4 Lift high the cross of Christ, 
 Tread where His feet have trod;  As brothers of the Son of man, 
 Rise up, O men of God!
611 沉睡的人醒起
1 沉睡的人，醒起！
 莫再贪享安逸； 
 不要留恋榻上， 
 不求肉体舒畅； 
 远远逃离死荫幽谷，  快步迈向永生之路。  快步迈向永生之路。 
2 卸下每一重担， 
 前程不受阻延； 
 脱离自己、罪愆， 
 使你快步向前； 
 豫备聆听夜半呼声：  “看哪，新郎已经来临！”   “看哪，新郎已经来临！”  
3 起来，进前寻出， 
 你的信实之主； 
 一切丢在背后， 
 祂话灵里领受。 
 清心得见祂的同在，  祂乐向你启示出来。  祂乐向你启示出来。 
4 将你深处敞开， 
 享受祂的大爱； 
 被祂圣灵焚烧， 
 随时多方祷告； 
 趁着今日，多多买油，  以免那日，使你蒙羞。 
5 此心只献给神， 
 万物虚空不真； 
 哦主，赐下你灵， 
 将爱浇灌我心！ 
 但愿圣火点亮我魂，  永不熄灭，至死仍焚！  永不熄灭，至死仍焚！ 
6 耶稣，求你激励 
 我脚奔跑不息 -  
 儆醒、祷告、争战，  直到瞻你荣脸！ 
 不要使我疲倦、止息，  直到完满达你心意！  直到完满达你心意！ 
611 YE SLEEPING SOULS AWAKE
1 Ye sleeping souls, awake 
 From dreams of carnal ease! 
 Your couch of sloth forsake; 
 Nor seek the flesh to please; 
 Far from this land of shadows flee,  And march towards eternity. 
 And march towards eternity. 
2 Aside each burden lay, 
 That does your course restrain, 
 And onward urge your way 
 From nature, self, and sin; 
 Prepare the midnight cry to hear, 
 “The Bridegroom comes, behold Him near!”  “The Bridegroom comes, behold Him near!” 
3 Arise, go forth to find 
 Your true and faithful Lord; 
 And leaving all behind, 
 In spirit hear His word. 
 The pure in heart His presence feel,  ‘Tis them He doth Himself reveal.  ‘Tis them He doth Himself reveal. 
4 Within your souls retired, 
 His precious love enjoy; 
 And with His Spirit tlr’d, 
 Your time in prayer employ; 
 And purchase oil, whilst yet you may,  Lest it should fail you on that day. 
5 Give God alone Thy heart, 
 For vain is all disguise. 
 O Lord Thy love impart, 
 The oil that makes us wise! 
 To light our souls with holy fire, 
 Which shall not, e’en in death, expire.  Which shall not, e’en in death, expire. 
6 Jesus, Thyself excite 
 Our feet to run the race —  
 To watch, and pray, and fight, 
 Till we behold Thy face! 
 Nor let us ever tire, nor rest, 
 Till with Thy full possession blest!  Till with Thy full possession blest!
612 我魂兴起你神领路
1 我魂，兴起！你神领路，  谁也不能再拦阻； 
 只管前行，祂在保护，  加力获释的囚虏。 
2 是否旷野就在你前，  到处沙漠干燥地？ 
 但那天来新鲜甘泉，  不断涌出滋润你。 
3 神圣亮光绕你脚步，  神在指定你路径； 
 隐密之福，丰满、充足，  使你灵魂常苏醒。 
4 活神是你永远福分，  大能食物赐给你； 
 使你不受埃及扰困，  埃及粮食可撇弃。 
5 你若断绝埃及福乐，  神就藏你于隐密， 
 打开宝藏让你来得，  永浸浸沉神爱里。 
6 在这嚝野神要教你，  认识祂是怎样神： 
 忍耐、恩慈、神圣、有力；  祂的恩典何高深。 
7 迦南路上仍当力前，  虽有缺乏和仇敌， 
 但祂赐下够用恩典，  怜悯之泉常涌溢。 
8 路径虽长并且荒凉，  神会加力如鹰腾； 
 衣裳仍新，脚未受伤，  见证一路神引领。 
9 神圣大爱领你脚步，  进入迦南那美地， 
 要与众圣凯歌欢呼，  在那锡安永安息。 
612 RISE MY SOUL THY GOD DIRECTS THEE
1 Rise, my soul, thy God directs thee; 
 Stranger hands no more impede; 
 Pass thou on, His strength protects thee, 
 Strength that has the captive freed. 
2 Is the wilderness before thee, 
 Desert lands where drought abides? 
 Heavenly springs shall there restore thee, 
 Fresh from God’s exhaustless tides. 
3 Light divine surrounds thy going, 
 God Himself shall mark thy way; 
 Secret blessings, richly flowing, 
 Lead to everlasting day. 
4 God, thine everlasting portion, 
 Feeds thee with the Mighty’s meat; 
 Saved from Egypt’s hard extortion, 
 Egypt’s food no more to eat. 
5 Art thou weaned from Egypt’s pleasures? 
 God in secret shall thee keep; 
 There unfold His hidden treasures, 
 There His love’s exhaustless deep. 
6 In the desert God will teach thee 
 What the God that thou hast found —  
 Patient, gracious, powerful, holy; 
 All His grace shall there abound. 
7 On to Canaan’s rest still wending, 
 E’en thy wants and woes shall bring 
 Suited grace from high descending; 
 Thou shalt taste of mercy’s spring. 
8 Though thy way be long and dreary, 
 Eagle strength He’ll still renew; 
 Garments fresh, and feet unweary, 
 Tell how God hath brought thee through. 
9 When to Canaan’s long-loved dwelling 
 Love divine thy feet shall bring, 
 Thou, with shouts of triumph swelling, 
 Zion’s songs in rest shall sing.
613 当向标竿力前虽然孤单不变
1 当向标竿力前！虽然孤单，不变；  那开路者现在召你，所以当前勿延。 
2 当向标竿力前！ 主眼目如火焰，  正在看你；人算什么？ 何必管他喜厌！ 
3 当向标竿力前！不要再望后面，  因为前头就是奖赏，主要赐给冠冕。 
4 当向标竿力前！塞耳、哑口、闭眼，  在崎岖的血迹路上，紧随基督向前！ 
613 ON TOWARD THE GOAL PRESS ON ALONE  YET UNAFRAID
1 “On toward the goal!” Press on! Alone, yet unafraid;  He cut the path, who beckons thee, On then, and undismayed. 
2 “On toward the goal!” Press on! The eyes that are a flame  Are watching thee, what then are men? What matter praise, or  blame? 
3 “On toward the goal!” Press on! Look not behind thee now,  When just ahead lies His “Well done,” And crowns await thy brow. 
4 “On toward the goal!” Press on! Blind, deaf and sometimes dumb  Along the blood-marked, uphill way, Hard after Christ, press on!
614 向前直跑向前直跑
1 向前直跑，向前直跑！ 
 标竿是万有主； 
 为得奖赏，别无旁顾， 
 一直跑向基督。 
和 向前跑，向前跑，向前跑！  阿利路亚，为得奖赏向前跑，  一直跑！要得神的基督。 
2 向前直跑！丢弃万事， 
 看万物如粪土！ 
 神的基督，荣耀奖赏， 
 吸引我的脚步！ 
3 向前直跑！认识基督， 
 经历复活高超， 
 哦，这乃是上好奖赏 -   若先进入荣耀！ 
4 向前直跑！只有一事： 
 就是忘记背后， 
 向着前头基督直跑， 
 向前永不回头！ 
614 PRESS ON PRESS ON TOWARD THE GOAL
1 Press on, press on toward the goal —  
 The all-inclusive Christ. 
 To gain the prize of God’s high call, 
 Press on, press on to Christ! 
(C) Pressing on! Pressing on! 
 Pressing on! Hallelujah for the prize  
 We’re pressing on! On and on! 
 To gain the Christ of God! 
2 Press on, press on, count all things loss, 
 All that is gain to us, 
 To win the prize, the Christ of God, 
 Is far more glorious! 
3 Press on, press on to know the Lord 
 And resurrection power —  
 Oh, this is our supreme reward, 
 E’en in the suffering hour! 
4 Press on, press on, this one thing do, 
 Forget the things behind; 
 Press onward to the Christ before, 
 Press onward with this mind!
615 我们有当跑的路阿利路亚
1 我们有当跑的路，阿利路亚！  当一路跑尽，切莫停下！  对所有在跑的人，阿利路亚！  神说，”当望断以及于祂！”  
和 当望断以及于祂！ 
 一路跑尽，切莫停下！  望断一切身外物，注视耶稣，  当望断一切以及于祂！ 
2 望断周遭的事务，阿利路亚！  当望断扰嚷以及挣扎； 
 专一注视安息主，阿利路亚！  当望断一切以及于祂！ 
3 望断起伏的心绪，阿利路亚！  别管你自己的好或差； 
 专一注视那标竿，阿利路亚！  当望断一切以及于祂！ 
4 望断背后的一切，阿利路亚！  好或坏完全不必管它； 
 持守那位活的主，阿利路亚！  当望断一切以及于祂！ 
5 专一注视祂荣脸，阿利路亚！  祂乃是阿拉法、俄梅戛；  领受恩典向前跑，阿利路亚！  当望断一切以及于祂！ 
615 THERE’S A RACE FOR US TO RUN  HALLELUJAH
11.9.11.9. WITH CHORUS 
Comfort and Encouragement 
1 Hallelujah,  And a way for us the race to win.
 To all those who have begun — Hallelujah,  God has spoken, “Look away to Him!” 
 Look away! O look away! 
(C) Look to Jesus now today! 
 Look away from everything unto Jesus,  Look away from everything to Him! 
2 Hallelujah,  Look away from all the strife and din;
 Look away where peace is found — Hallelujah,  Look away from everything to Him. 
3 Hallelujah,  Look away from failing self within;
 Look away toward the goal — Hallelujah,  Look away from everything to Him. 
4 Hallelujah,  Look away from both the good and sin;
 To the living One hold fast — Hallelujah,  Look away from everything to Him. 
5 Hallelujah,
 He who’ll finish what He did begin. 
 O what grace to run the race — Hallelujah —   We obtain by looking off to Him!
616 前进是我口号 步声相接联
1 前进！是我口号， 步声相接联；  向着标竿直跑， 永不回头看。  军前火柱灿烂， 照明我路程；  谁还畏缩不前， 基督在率领。  前进！经过旷野， 经过苦战争；  迦南不再隐约， 锡安放光明。 
2 荣耀又加荣耀， 我神已豫备；  凡爱神者必要 有分于此内：  眼睛未曾看见， 耳朵未曾听，  荣耀达到极点， 心想也未曾。  前进！一直前进！ 直到国度显，  直到幔子不存， 信心变眼见。 
616 FORWARD BE OUR WATCHWORD STEPS  AND VOICES JOINED
1 “Forward!” be our watchword, Steps and voices joined;  Seek the things before us, Not a look behind; 
 ‘Burns the fiery pillar At our army’s head; 
 Who shall dream of shrinking, By our Captain led?  Forward through the desert, Through the toil and fight;  Heaven’s Kingdom waits us, Forward into light. 
2 Glories upon glories Hath our God prepared, 
 By the souls that love Him, One day to be shared:  Eye hath not beheld them, Ear hath never heard; 
 Nor of these hath uttered Thought or speech or word;  Forward, marching forward Where the kingdom’s bright,  Till the veil be lifted, Till our faith be sight!
617 兴起兴起为基督兴起十架精兵
1 兴起，兴起，为基督，兴起，十架精兵；  举起主旗扬威武，永远将它高撑。  主必率领祂大军，得胜而又得胜，  直到仇敌全灭尽，人尊主名为圣。 
2 兴起，兴起，为基督，兴起，听主号令；  走上疆场齐步武，靠主得胜大名。  仇敌虽多，又凶险，也必向其进攻；  愈险，愈攻，愈勇敢，攻到仇敌消踪 。 
3 兴起，兴起，为基督， 兴起，靠主大力；  莫靠自己而贻误，莫用血气兵器。  穿上属灵的军装，祷告随时多方；  无论何处需抵挡，都能随灵前往。 
4 兴起，兴起，为基督，战争必不会长；  今日杀声虽四布， 明日凯歌响亮。  凡是靠主得胜者，必得荣耀冠冕，  必与基督同快乐， 同王直到永远。 
617 STAND UP STAND UP FOR JESUS YE  SOLDIERS OF THE CROSS
1 Stand up! stand up for Jesus! Ye soldiers of the cross;  Lift high His royal banner, It must not suffer loss:  From vict’ry unto vict’ry His army shall He lead,  Till every foe is vanquished And Christ is Lord indeed. 
2 Stand up! stand up for Jesus! The trumpet call obey;  Forth to the mighty conflict In this His glorious day.  Ye that are men, now serve Him Against unnumbered foes;  Let courage rise with danger, And strength to strength oppose. 
3 Stand up! stand up for Jesus! Stand in His strength alone;  The arm of flesh will fail you; Ye dare not trust your own.  Put on the Gospel armor, And, watching unto prayer,  Where duty calls, or danger, Be never wanting there. 
4 Stand up! stand up for Jesus! The strife will not be long:  This day the noise of battle, The next the victor’s song;  To him that overcometh A crown of life shall be;  He, with the King of glory, Shall reign eternally.
618 前进基督精兵前进
1 前进！基督精兵，前进！ 
 如出征；十架旌旗高撑，随主向前行。  前进！走上疆场，进攻诸幽冥；  必将仇敌扫荡，若听主号令。 
和 前进！基督精兵，前进！ 
 如出征；十架旌旗高撑，随主向前行。 
2 一闻耶稣大名，魔军必窜逃； 
 所以基督精兵，向前将敌剿。 
 若肯高声赞颂，阴间必动摇； 
 所以亲爱弟兄，赞颂声要高。 
3 基督教会出征，势如大军队： 
 古圣在前先行，我们在后随； 
 并非分成两起，古圣与我们； 
 乃是一灵、一体、一望并一信。 
4 诸王终必摧毁，邦国兴而衰； 
 惟有基督教会，永远必存在。 
 阴间权势虽凶，不能胜教会； 
 教会随主进攻，必要毁魔鬼。 
5 前进！蒙恩圣徒，回应主教会；  跟随教会步武，必奏凯歌归。 
 荣耀、尊贵、颂扬、归给得胜王；  圣徒天使合唱，颂扬永无疆。 
618 ONWARD CHRISTIAN SOLDIERS
1 Onward Christian soldiers! 
 Marching as to war, With the cross of Jesus 
 Going on before. Christ, the royal Master, Leads against the foe;  Forward into battle, See, His banners go! 
(C) Onward, Christian soldiers! 
 Marching as to war, With the cross of Jesus, Going on before. 
2 At the name of Jesus Satan’s host doth flee; 
 On then, Christian soldiers, On to victory! 
 Hell’s foundations quiver At the shout of praise:  Brothers, lift your voices, Loud your anthems raise! 
3 Like a mighty army Moves the Church of God: 
 Brothers, we are treading Where the saints have trod;  We are not divided, All one Body we —  
 One in faith and Spirit, One eternally. 
4 Crowns and thrones may perish, Kingdoms rise and wane;  But the Church of Jesus Constant will remain. 
 Gates of hell can never’ Gainst the Church prevail;  We have Christ’s own promise, Which can never fail. 
5 Onward, then, ye people! Join our happy throng;  Blend with ours your voices In the triumph song.  Glory, laud and honor Unto Christ, the King; 
 This through countless ages Men and angels sing.
619 我不敢稍微失败因有加略在望
1 我不敢稍微失败，因有加略在望，  耶稣在彼曾奏凯，胜过黑暗君王；  求主赐给我异象，我才临阵奋兴，  使我作个得胜者，靠着你的大能。 
和 得胜者，得胜者，都因着髑髅地。  使我作个得胜者，因着你，因着你能得胜。 
2 我不敢稍微失败， 因为基督我主，  召我进到前线来， 与祂一同追逐。  求主赐给我胆量， 使我刚强有力，  使我作个得胜者， 里面充满了你。 
3 我不敢稍微失败， 因为耶稣领我  来冲阴府的境界， 与祂同登宝座。  求主赐给你战士， 有力能以挥剑，  使我作个得胜者， 借着你的圣言。 
4 我不敢稍微失败， 当此日西时辰，  因为我主正等待， 要说”好！我仆人。”   求主今日从天上， 从新赐我能力，  使我作个得胜者， 得胜一直到底。 
619 I DARE NOT BE DEFEATED WITH CALVARY  IN VIEW
7.6.7.6.D. WITH CHORUS 
Spiritual Warfare 
1 I dare not be defeated With Calvary in view, 
 Where Jesus conquered Satan, Where all His foes He slew;  Come, Lord, and give the vision To nerve me for the fight,  Make me an overcomer Clothed with Thy Spirit’s might. 
(C) A victor, a victor! Because of Calvary. 
 Make me an overcomer, A conqu’ror, a conqu’ror, Lord, in Thee. 
2 I dare not be defeated Since Christ, my conquering King   Has called me to the battle Which He did surely win.  Come, Lord, and give me courage, Thy conquering Spirit give,  Make me an overcomer, In power within me live. 
3 I dare not be defeated, When Jesus leads me on 
 To press through hellish regions To share with Him His Throne;  Come, Lord, and give Thy soldier The power to wield the sword,  Make me an overcomer Through Thine inerrant Word. 
4 I dare not be defeated, Just at the set of sun, 
 When Jesus waits to whisper, “Well done, beloved, well done”;  Come, Lord, bend from the Glory, On me Thy Spirit cast,  Make me an overcomer, A victor to the last.
620 竭尽全力奋勇战争
1 竭尽全力，奋勇战争！  主是力量，主是良善；  持定生命，生命必成  你的喜乐、永远冠冕。 
2 藉神恩典，奋勇力前，  举目仰望，寻求主面；  生命之路，在你眼前，  主是道路，主是冠冕。 
3 莫要挂虑，紧随引领；  无限怜悯，丰厚供应；  信靠之人，必将证明，  主是生命，主何丰盈。 
4 勿恐勿馁，只将主靠，  祂不改变，何来烦恼？  只要坚信，终必明了，  基督是你一切需要。 
620 FIGHT THE GOOD FIGHT WITH ALL THY  MIGHT
1 Fight the good fight with all thy might! 
 Christ is thy strength, and Christ thy right; 
 Lay hold on life, and it shall be 
 Thy joy and crown eternally. 
2 Run the straight race through God’s good grace,  Lift up thine eyes, and seek His face; 
 Life with its way before us lies, 
 Christ is the path, and Christ the prize. 
3 Cast care aside, lean on thy Guide; 
 His boundless mercy will provide; 
 Trust, and thy trusting soul shah prove 
 Christ is its life, and Christ its love. 
4 Faint not nor fear, His arms are near, 
 He changeth not, and thou art dear; 
 Only believe, and thou shalt see 
 That Christ is all in all to thee.
621 已经得胜且胜而又胜
1 已经得胜，且胜而又胜，  大君王御驾亲征！
 祂麾下军兵尽皆忠诚，  奋勇投入这战争。 
 看大军扬威武前行，  旗帜铠甲多鲜明！ 
 听他们齐声呼主名，  并他们所唱歌声： 
和 “得胜不是因人强壮，  不因快步于疆场， 
 乃因主恩典的应许，  是忠诚者的胜利！”  
2 已经得胜，且胜而又胜，  谁是奇妙的君王？ 
 那里是祂所率的军兵？  何时将荣耀高唱？ 
 祂是我们的救赎主，  救主和神圣君王； 
 他们在祂荣耀国度，  永远如众星放光。 
3 已经得胜，且胜而又胜，  主耶稣万有之主， 
 宝座和王权都要倒倾，  冠冕和荣华消除。 
 但你所率领的军旅，  真实并忠诚到底， 
 那时争战都要过去，  在你国度里安息。 
621 CONQUERING NOW AND STILL TO  CONQUER
9.7.9.7.8.7.8.7. WITH CHORUS 
Spiritual Warfare 
1 Conquering now and still to conquer, 
 Rideth a King in His might, 
 Leading the host of all the faithful 
 Into the midst of the fight; 
 See them with courage advancing, 
 Clad in their brilliant array, 
 Shouting the name of their Leader, 
 Hear them exultingly say: 
(C) “Not to the strong is the battle, 
 Not to the swift is the race; 
 Yet to the true and the faithful 
 Vict’ry is promised through grace.” 
2 Conquering now and still to conquer, 
 Who is this wonderful King? 
 Whence are the armies which He leadeth 
 While of His glory they sing? 
 He is our Lord and Redeemer, 
 Savior and Monarch divine; 
 They are the stars that forever 
 Bright in His kingdom will shine. 
3 Conquering now and still to conquer, 
 Jesus, Thou Ruler of all, 
 Thrones and their scepters all shall perish,  Crowns and their splendor shall fall, 
 Yet shall the armies Thou leadest 
 Faithful and true to the last, 
 Find in Thy kingdom eternal 
 Rest, when their warfare is past.
622 等到光明的早晨
1 等到光明的早晨，
 赞美何其轻省， 
 祂是你大能救主， 
 将你释放、救赎； 
 如今夜半的赞美， 
 才令仇敌败退， 
 才能荣耀你救主， 
 并显出祂帮助。 
2 今日你若要得胜， 
 使神旨意完成， 
 只要你大声夸耀， 
 将主得胜宣告； 
 监狱之门必全开， 
 亮光必照进来， 
 四围所有的罪囚， 
 必见主的拯救。 
622 ‘TIS EASY WHEN THE MORNING
1 ‘Tis easy when the morning 
 Appears at last to view 
 To praise thy strong Redeemer 
 Who burst the bondage through, 
 But ‘tis the praise at midnight 
 That gives the foe alarm, 
 That glorifies thy Savior, 
 And bares His strong right arm. 
2 If thou wouldst be a conqueror, 
 Yea, more than conqueror thou, 
 If thou wilt shout in triumph 
 And claim the victory now; 
 The prison-doors will open, 
 The dungeon gleam with light, 
 And sin-chained souls around thee 
 Shall see thy Lord’s great might.
623 我对撒但总是说
1 我对撒但总是说：
 “不，”我对父神就说：”是！”   好叫我主所有部署， 
 全得成功不受阻。 
 当我这样听主号令， 
 求主赐给我权柄， 
 使我满有能力圣灵， 
 成功主永远定命。 
2 我对撒但总是说： 
 “不，”我对父神就说：”是！”   这个是我永远态度， 
 求神施恩加保护。 
 不然当我实行顺服， 
 撒但就要拦去路； 
 当我正在听你吩咐， 
 主耶稣，求你看顾！ 
3 我对撒但总是说： 
 “不，”我对父神就说：”是！”   我愿完全绝对顺服， 
 不论将受如何苦。 
 当我同主往前时候， 
 主若肯拯救保守， 
 无论什么威胁、引诱，  不会使我一回头。 
623 TO THE FOE MY WORD IS ALWAYS NO
1 To the foe my word is always, “No,” 
 To the Father it is “Yes,” 
 That His plan and all His counsel 
 Be accomplished with success; 
 When Thine orders I’m obeying, 
 Grant me, Lord, authority 
 To fulfill Thy plan eternal 
 Thru the Spirit’s power in me. 
2 To the foe my word is always, “No,” 
 To the Father it is, “Yes”; 
 ‘Tis my attitude eternal; 
 May the Lord protect and bless, 
 Lest while walking in obedience 
 Satan undermine the way; 
 When I’m list’ning to Thine orders, 
 Grant me mercy, Lord, I pray. 
3 To the foe my word is always, “No,” 
 To the Father it is, “Yes”; 
 I completely would obey Him, 
 Though deep suff’ring may oppress. 
 If the Lord will save and keep me, 
 As I forward press with Him, 
 Then no trials shall prevent me, 
 Nor will opposition grim.
624 安营依傍光明山冈
1 安营依傍光明山冈， 
 基督精兵刚强， 
 勇往直前，趁夜未莅， 
 天光尚未遮蔽； 
 尽我一切能力， 
 攻击今生地上仇敌； 
 我知信心必会得捷， 
 必定胜过世界。 
和 信心就必得胜，信心就必得胜！  荣耀、荣耀的胜捷，靠它胜过世界。 
2 祂的爱旗将我遮蔽， 
 祂话是我兵器； 
 追随古圣所走路径， 
 喊出得胜歌声。 
 凭信犹如旋风扫荡， 
 吹过每一战场； 
 信心藤牌胜过死亡， 
 如今仍然发亮。 
3 我们目睹四方仇敌， 
 凶猛阵前站立； 
 安逸帐棚尽都抛弃， 
 前进迎敌不惧。 
 救恩头盔人人当戴， 
 束上真理腰带； 
 脚掌所踏之地战兢， 
 回响得胜呼应。 
4 我们今日胜过仇敌， 
 必蒙赐下白衣； 
 天使面前欢然确定， 
 天上承认他名。 
 从那发光山冈进前， 
 我心爱火重燃， 
 我们因耶稣得胜名， 
 灭尽黑暗军兵。 
624 ENCAMPED ALONG THE HILLS OF LIGHT
1 Encamped along the hills of light, 
 Ye Christian soldiers rise, 
 And press the battle ere the night 
 Shall veil the glowing skies; 
 Against the foe in vales below 
 Let all our strength be hurled; 
 Faith is the victory, we know, 
 That overcomes the world. 
(C) Faith is the victory! Faith is the victory! 
 O glorious victory, That overcomes the world. 
2 His banner over us is love, 
 Our sword the Word of God; 
 We tread the road the saints before 
 With shouts of triumph trod. 
 By faith, they like a whirlwind’s breath, 
 Swept on o’er every field; 
 The faith by which they conquered death 
 Is still our shining shield. 
3 On every hand the foe we find 
 Drawn up in dread array; 
 Let tents of ease be left behind, 
 And onward to the fray. 
 Salvation’s helmet on each head, 
 With truth all girt about, 
 The earth shall tremble ‘neath our tread, 
 And echo with our shout. 
4 To him that overcomes the foe, 
 White raiment shall be giv’n; 
 Before the angels he shall know 
 His name confessed in heav’n; 
 Then onward from the hills of light, 
 Our hearts with love aflame, 
 We’ll vanquish all. the hosts of night, 
 In Jesus’ conqu’ring name.
625 在祂得胜的名里是得胜者的秘密
1 在祂得胜的名里，是得胜者的秘密！  一生经历诸战役，站稳并羞辱仇敌。 
2 呼求耶稣得胜名，此名使你得复兴；  认识仇敌的诡计，重新收复你失地。 
3 回头速将恶者驱，将他逐离每寸地；  战士，进攻不退缩，奋勇进攻到日落。 
4 在祂得胜的名里，是得胜者的秘密！  一生经历诸战役，站稳并羞辱仇敌。 
625 IN THE OVERCOMER’S NAME BE AN  OVERCOMER TOO
1 In the Overcomer’s Name Be an overcomer too!  Stand and put the foe to shame All the livelong battle through! 
2 Jesus is the Name to sound, Name to rally fainting hearts!  To recapture “forfeit” ground, Lost awhile through Satan’s arts. 
3 Backward drive the Evil One! Force him out of every hold;  Smite until the sinking sun Sets upon the warrior bold! 
4 In the Overcomer’s Name Be an overcomer too!  Stand and put the foe to shame All the livelong battle through!

626 在主耶稣名里
 1 在主耶稣名里，
 在主耶稣名里，我们就必得胜！  在主耶稣名里， 
 在主耶稣名里，撒但惧怕、无能。  谁能尽述神爱你？ 
 谁能尽述祂的大能？ 
 在我们主耶稣名里，我们就必得胜！ 
626 IN THE NAME OF JESUS IRREGULAR METER
1 Spiritual Warfare
 In the name of Jesus, 
 In the name of Jesus, we have the victory.  In the name of Jesus, 
 In the name of Jesus, demons will have to flee.  Who can tell what God can do? 
 Who can tell of His love for you? 
 In the name of Jesus, Jesus, we have the victory.
627 安息于你你是我盾牌保护
1 安息于你，你是我盾牌、保护；  我们不靠自己能力站稳；  得力在你，蒙你保守得稳固；  安息于你，奉你大名前进。  得力在你，蒙你保守得稳固；  安息于你，奉你大名前进。 
2 救恩元帅，你是稳固的根基；  你名可爱，超乎万名之上；  耶稣我主，你是我们的公义；  荣耀之主，你是爱的君王。  耶稣我主，你是我们的公义；  荣耀之主，你是爱的君王。 
3 靠信前行，深感自己的软弱；  每时每日都需你的怜悯；  从心深处唱出得胜的凯歌；  安息于你，奉你大名前进。  从心深处发出得胜的诗歌；  安息于你，奉你大名前进。 
4 安息于你，你是我盾牌、保护；  得胜君王，惟你配得称颂；  那日要临，与你掌权在国度；  安息于你，直到永世无终。  那日要临，与你掌权在国度；  安息于你，直到永世无终。 
627 WE REST ON THEE OUR SHIELD AND OUR  DEFENDER
11.10.11.10. WITH REPEAT 
Spiritual Warfare 
1 We rest on Thee, our Shield and our Defender; 
 We go not forth alone against the foe; 
 Strong in Thy strength, 
 safe in Thy keeping tender, 
 We rest on Thee, 
 and in Thy Name we go. 
2 Yea, in Thy Name, O Captain of salvation! 
 In Thy dear Name, 
 all other names above; 
 Jesus our Righteousness, 
 our sure Foundation, 
 Our Prince of glory and our King of love. 
3 We go in faith, our own great weakness feeling, 
 And needing more each day 
 Thy grace to know: 
 Yet from our hearts a song of triumph pealing; 
 We rest on Thee, 
 and in Thy Name we go. 
4 We rest on Thee, 
 our Shield and our Defender: 
 Thine is the battle, 
 Thine shall be the praise 
 When reigning in the Kingdom of Thy splendor, 
 Victors, we rest with Thee, Through endless days.
628 神的儿子出战前方去得冠冕为王
1 神的儿子出战前方，去得冠冕为王；  血染大旗远远飘扬，谁配加祂阵行？  谁将苦杯饮之如饴，不顾痛苦创伤，  甘负十架，忍耐到底，才配加祂阵行！ 
2 历代殉圣眼光锐利，看透坟墓对方，  看出主的复活能力，仰望祂的扶帮；  效祂发出赦免之求，在受致死之伤，  也求饶恕害己之仇，谁配加其阵行？ 
3 蒙主选召英勇圣徒， 
 满得圣灵力量， 
 充满盼望，轻看羞辱， 
 汇成荣耀阵行； 
 十架、烈火、刀剑、猛兽， 
 他们面对死亡， 
 毫不畏惧，欣然接受， 
 谁配加其阵行？ 
4 复有精兵、壮丁、孩童， 
 贤妇、淑女继起， 
 今绕宝座欢乐无穷， 
 身服光明白衣； 
 他们登上乃靠圣力， 
 历经劳苦、创伤， 
 恳求我神赐我恩、力， 
 配加他们阵行！ 
628 THE SON OF GOD GOES FORTH TO WAR A  KINGLY CROWN TO GAIN
1 The Son of God goes forth to war, A kingly crown to gain;  His blood-red banner streams afar: Who follows in His train?  Who best can drink his cup of woe, Triumphant over pain,  Who patient bears his cross below, He follows in His train. 
2 The martyr first, whose eagle eye Could pierce beyond the grave,  Who saw his Master in the sky, And called to Him to save:  Like Him, with pardon on his tongue, In midst of mortal pain,  He prayed for them that did the wrong: Who follows in his train? 
3 A glorious band, the chosen few 
 On whom the Spirit came, 
 Twelve valiant saints, their hope they knew, 
 And mocked the cross and flame. 
 They met the tyrant’s brandished steel, 
 The lion’s gory mane, 
 They bowed their necks, the death to feel: 
 Who follows in their train? 
4 A noble army, men and boys, 
 The matron and the maid,  
 Around the Savior’s throne rejoice, 
 In robes of light arrayed. 
 They climbed by strength divine from heaven, 
 Through peril, toil, and pain: 
 O God, to us may grace be given 
 To follow in their train.
629 我神是我大能堡垒
1 我神是我大能堡垒，
 坚固保障永不颓； 
 致命凶恶虽在包围， 
 祂作帮助我何畏。 
 我们老旧仇敌仍在寻隙攻击，  诡计、能力都大， 
 又加狠心毒辣， 
 地上无人能抵它。 
2 我们若靠自己力量， 
 奋斗争战必失败； 
 神选之人岂非在旁？ 
 为何不将祂倚赖？ 
 这位适当之人， 
 乃是基督本身； 
 祂是万军之主， 
 万世万代无殊， 
 胜利永远惟祂属。 
3 世界虽然充满鬼魔， 
 常施惊吓谋毁坏， 
 但是我神定规藉我 
 使祂真理得奏凯。 
 黑暗君王狰狞， 
 我们并不战兢， 
 我忍受它气忿， 
 因它结局已近， 
 一句主话使它倾。 
4 主话超越世界权势， 
 神旨成功不延迟； 
 藉那与我同在的主， 
 圣灵、恩赐全我属。 
 名利都可远离， 
 生死我也不计； 
 即使杀我身体， 
 真理仍然屹立， 
 神的国度永无已。 
629 A MIGHTY FORTRESS IS OUR GOD IRREGULAR METER
1 A mighty Fortress is our God, 
 A Bulwark never failing; 
 Our Helper He amid the flood 
 Of mortal ills prevailing: 
 For still our ancient foe Doth seek to work us woe;  His craft and power are great, 
 And, armed with cruel hate, 
 On earth is not his equal. 
2 Did we in our own strength confide, 
 Our striving would be losing; 
 Were not the right The Man on our side, 
 The Man of Gods’s own choosing: 
 Dost ask who that may be? 
 Christ Jesus, it is He; 
 Lord Sabaoth His Name, 
 From age to age the same, 
 And He must win the battle. 
3 And though this world, with devils filled,  Should threaten to undo us, 
 We will not fear, for God hath willed 
 His truth to triumph through us: 
 The Prince of Darkness grim, 
 We tremble not for him; 
 His rage we can endure, 
 For lo! his doom is sure, 
 One little word shall fell him. 
4 That word above all earthly powers, 
 No thanks to them, abideth; 
 The Spirit and the gifts are ours 
 Through Him who with us sideth: 
 Let goods and kindred go, 
 This mortal life also; 
 The body they may kill: 
 God’s truth abideth still, 
 His Kingdom is forever.
630 当奉耶稣这名站住
1 当奉耶稣这名站住，
 信祂得胜站住； 
 不靠自己力量站住， 
 不靠才能站住； 
 不要使用血气兵器， 
 只用圣灵宝剑； 
 穿上神的军装服役， 
 灭尽仇敌火箭。 
2 看哪，仇敌正在聚集，  故当守你地场！ 
 四面黑暗，争战紧急，  故当靠主抵挡！ 
 你若退后，惧怕敌凶，  一人牵动全军； 
 请你不要使你弟兄， 
 因你缘故受窘。 
3 撒但已知其时不久， 
 所以其气忿忿， 
 要在争战尚未起首， 
 就使你灵郁闷。 
 诱惑、试探比前更多，  苦难比前更大， 
 阴府权势攻逼你我， 
 比前更为可怕。 
4 对此情形，我们当有 
 何种态度才可？ 
 我们可否因贪优游， 
 便让仇敌宰割？ 
 或者因着苦难加倍， 
 更加忍耐、奋勇？ 
 生死关头，在此定规！  谁要得主称荣？ 
5 因此，你当为主站住；  耶稣是得胜者！ 
 你当忍受一切痛苦， 
 直到那日方舍。 
 耶稣不久快要再临， 
 战事不久要停； 
 你今为主受难、受惊，  那日必得权柄。 
630 THE NAME OF JESUS IS OUR STAND
1 The name of Jesus is our stand, 
 It is our victory; 
 Not on ourselves do we rely, 
 But, mighty Lord, on Thee. 
 Our weapons are not arms of flesh, 
 But ours the Spirit’s sword, 
 And God’s whole armor putting on, 
 We battle in the Lord. 
2 Behold, the foe doth meet and plot, 
 Stand firm in one accord! 
 Though war be fierce and darkness thick, 
 Resist him in the Lord! 
 If one thru fear should backward turn, 
 He undermines the rest. 
 Oh, do not let your brothers down, 
 Nor by you be distressed. 
3 The devil knows his time is short, 
 He is the more enraged, 
 And by his wiles would weaken us 
 Before the battle’s waged. 
 The trials now more numerous are, 
 The suff’ring e’en more sore, 
 The force of hell opposing us 
 More dreadful than before. 
4 What should our posture be today 
 In such a desperate hour? 
 Should we our ease and pleasure seek 
 And let the foe devour? 
 Or with increasing conflict strong, 
 Courageous to endure? 
 ‘Tis here that life or death is won! 
 Who will God’s praise secure? 
5 For Christ the Lord we then would stand, 
 He is the Conqueror! 
 For Him we would endure the pain 
 Until the fight is o’er. 
 The hour of triumph soon we’ll see —  
 The Lord will come again; 
 If now we suffer for His sake, 
 Then we with Him shall reign.
631 基督精兵兴起
1 基督精兵！兴起！
 披戴全副军装； 
 神的儿子是你能力， 
 在祂名里刚强。 
 祂是万军之主， 
 大能谁人能拒！ 
 靠祂能力、跟祂步武，  终必得胜有余！ 
2 靠祂大能站稳， 
 运用祂的大力； 
 神的军装披挂在身， 
 昂然进前御敌。 
 直到大功告成， 
 争战已成过去， 
 你因单靠基督得胜， 
 至终屹然站立。 
3 处处防守严密， 
 也无软弱暴露； 
 取用主的美德、恩力，  使你全人坚固。 
 兵器时常磨利， 
 警觉切勿疏忽； 
 主的面光时刻不离， 
 儆醒祷告不住。 
4 基督所赐话语， 
 化为祷告不停； 
 欣然遵从祂的令谕， 
 时时呼求祂名。 
 将你所有需要， 
 常在神前陈明； 
 常常祈求，不住祷告，  祷告一直不停。 
5 奋力，奋力进前！ 
 角力、搏斗、祷告！ 
 黑暗权势尽都灭歼， 
 全胜之日来到！ 
 圣灵感动军心， 
 求主快来世间； 
 耶稣基督自天降临， 
 提接勇士凯旋！ 
631 SOLDIERS OF CHRIST ARISE
1 Soldiers of Christ, arise, 
 And put your armor on, 
 Strong in the strength which God supplies,  Through His eternal Son; 
 Strong in the Lord of Hosts, 
 And in His mighty pow’r, 
 Who in the strength of Jesus trusts  Is more than conqueror. 
2 Stand then in His great might, 
 With all His strength endued; 
 And take, to arm you for the fight, 
 The panoply of God, 
 That, having all things done, 
 And all your conflicts past, 
 Ye may o’ercome through Christ alone,  And stand complete at last. 
3 Leave no unguarded place, 
 No weakness of the soul, 
 Take every virtue, every grace, 
 And fortify the whole. 
 To keep your armor bright 
 Attend with constant care, 
 Still walking in your Captain’s sight  And watching unto prayer. 
4 Pray, without ceasing pray, 
 Your Captain gives the word; 
 His summons cheerfully obey, 
 And call upon the Lord: 
 To God your every want 
 In instant prayer display; 
 Pray always; pray, and never faint;  Pray, without ceasing pray. 
5 From strength to strength go on; 
 Wrestle, and fight, and pray; 
 Tread all the powers of darkness down,  And win the well-fought day: 
 Still let the Spirit cry 
 In all His soldiers, “Come!” 
 Till Christ the Lord descend from high,  And take the conquerors home.
632 哦主天天呼召
1 特.重.
属灵的争战──靠主大能和权柄 1 哦主，天天呼召 
 你仆人前去争讨， 
 灵里火热心欢喜， 
 我们来跟随你。 
 我们是你精兵， 
 领我争战得胜。 
和 坚定我手！焚烧我灵！  在主名里，必定得胜；  在主名里，必定很胜！  坚定我手！焚烧我灵！ 
2 主，以信心、恒忍， 
 你前来装备我们， 
 并倒下热心与爱， 
 加以智慧、忍耐。 
 哦主，焚烧我们， 
 为得奖赏前奔。 
3 十架荣耀大旗， 
 我们将它来高举； 
 靠主宝血的能力， 
 抵挡邪恶仇敌。 
 应用十架在”己， 
 “单靠基督而已。 
4 争战、受苦、祷告！ 
 胜利终必得到； 
 赢得荣耀和冠冕， 
 永远同主掌权。 
 争战、受苦、祷告！ 
 有日必得荣耀。 
632 O LORD TO CONFLICT NEW IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS Spiritual Warfare
1 O Lord, to conflict new 
 You daily call your servant; 
 With joy and spirits fervent 
 We rise to follow You. 
 Lead us to battle too, 
 We are Your soldiers true. 
(C) Our hands empow’r, Our hearts enflame!  We’ll overcome in Jesus’ name,  We’ll overcome in Jesus’ name!  Our hands empow’r, our hearts enflame! 
2 Fully equip us, Lord, 
 With faith and perseverance, 
 With wisdom and adherence, 
 With zeal and love outpoured; 
 Set us on fire, O Lord, 
 To win the great reward. 
3 We lift up firm and high 
 The Cross, our banner glorious. 
 The enemy notorious 
 By Blood we dare defy. 
 To self the Cross apply, 
 On Christ alone rely. 
4 Wrestle, suffer and pray! 
 The end shall be victorious. 
 The promised crown all-glorious  We shall receive one day. 
 Wrestle, suffer and pray! 
 We’ll reign with Christ for aye.

633 天上地下所有权柄
1 天上地下所有权柄， 
 都已赐给复活基督； 
 与祂联合，靠祂生命， 
 所有仇敌都要屈服。 
2 你当藉主说你必定 
 胜过魔鬼一切能力！ 
 应当从主支取权柄， 
 践踏地上蛇头、龙体。 
3 管你什么，你这高山！ 
 管你那里，或天或地！ 
 无论如何我总要铲， 
 奉主的名，你当快离！ 
4 信心命你离开此地， 
 你当顺服投在海里！ 
 我当、我要、我能、我必  成功我神所有目的。 
633 WITH ALL THE POW’R IN HEAV’N AND  EARTH
1 With all the pow’r in heav’n and earth 
 Our resurrected Lord’s endued; 
 If we unite and live by Him, 
 The enemy will be subdued. 
2 In Jesus’ name we must declare 
 That we shall overcome the foe; 
 We draw authority from Him 
 The serpent’s head to crush below. 
3 No matter what, thou mountain high, 
 In heav’n or earth, where’er thou art, 
 At any cost we’ll level thee, 
 In Jesus’ name thou must depart! 
4 Faith orders thee “Remove from here, 
 And be thou cast into the sea!” 
 We should, we must, we can, we will, 
 Fulfill God’s purpose faithfully.
634 今日战争凶猛仇敌声势更强
1 今日战争凶猛，仇敌声势更强； 
 战场呼喊、杀伐之声，比前更为响亮。  阴府反抗之声，远比以往厉害； 
 听哪，却有夜半呼声：”看哪，我必快来！”  
2 今日试炼更苦， 敌我交战益烈； 
 阴府军兵一齐鼓舞， 集队汹汹来劫 。  我在此处守等， 更觉难以得胜； 
 却听传来喜乐之声： “耶稣我主已近！”  
3 更难证实主话， 在此末后之世； 
 因为撒但倾力攻打， 竭其一切权势。  我需更大灵力， 才会击败仇敌； 
 当主来时不再叹息， 那时喜乐无比！ 
4 谁愿一直前进， 借着主的大能？ 
 谁要坚定一直相信， 直到争战全赢？  谁要靠主壮心， 直到得胜奏凯？ 
 如此之人何等乐听： “看哪，我必快来！”  
5 谁选神的最好， 走这十架窄路； 
 历尽百般忧患、苦恼， 丝毫也不回顾？  谁敢奋勇直前， 忍受痛苦、惧惊？  因在此时，欢乐可见：”耶稣我主已近！”  
6 现今黑暗深厚， 我们仍当力前， 
 直到我们被提时候， 荣耀就必显现！  在彼我们见主， 仇敌已经失败； 
 得胜者要一同欢呼： 耶稣我主已来！ 
634 CONFLICT TODAY IS FIERCE THE  STRENGTH OF SATAN MORE
1 Conflict today is fierce, The strength of Satan more;  The cry of battle calling now Is louder than before.  The rebel voice of hell E’en stronger now becomes;  But list, the midnight cry resounds, Behold, I quickly come! 
2 Trials more bitter grow, The fighting doth enlarge;  Hell’s forces rally all their pow’rs And gather for the charge.  Yet while we wait and watch And feel the war severe,  We hear the joyful song ring out, Jesus, the Lord, is near! 
3 ‘Tis harder at the end The word to testify, 
 For Satan fights with all his pow’r Our witness to defy.  Much greater strength we need The foe to overcome;  How happy when the Lord we see And all our sighing’s done! 
4 Who then will forward go Strong in His mighty power?  Who then will firmly trust the Lord Until the vict’ry hour;  Till with the conqu’rors blest, The triumph song’s begun?  That man will then rejoice to hear, Behold, I quickly come! 
5 Who then will choose God’s best, And take the narrow track,  Though passing thru the wildest storms, Yet never turning back?  Who now will dare press on, Enduring pain and fear?  All such will then rejoice to see Jesus, the Lord, is near! 
6 Though deep the darkness be We still would onward go,  Till we the day of rapture greet And glory ‘round shall glow.  ‘Tis there we’ll see the Lord, And Satan overcome;  The overcomers will rejoice, Jesus, the Lord, has come!
635 阿利路亚耶稣得胜大声唱凯歌
1 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！大声唱凯歌！  耶稣得胜，仍旧得胜，胜过罪、死、魔！ 
和 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！荣耀的消息！  耶稣得胜，仍旧得胜，胜过众仇敌！ 
2 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！ 疾病也消杀！  因藉耶稣，完全得胜， 成于各各他。 
3 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！ 故刚强有为！  无论何处，祂有遣征， 当应命勿畏。 
4 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！ 勿惧，勿让步！  前途纵有黑暗权能， 耶稣必开路。 
5 阿利路亚，耶稣得胜！ 耶稣快再临！  所有同祂得胜的人， 前来同欢欣！ 
635 HALLELUJAH CHRIST IS VICTOR TELL  WITH EVERY BREATH
8.5.8.5. WITH CHORUS 
Spiritual Warfare 
1 Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, Tell with every breath,  That the Savior still is conqu’ror Over sin and death. 
(C) Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, Tell where’er you go,  That the Lord is still the conqu’ror, Over every foe. 
2 Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, Pain and sickness flee,  When we plead the mighty victory Won on Calvary. 
3 Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, Therefore do and dare;  Go wherever Jesus sends you In prevailing prayer. 
4 Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, No defeat nor fear 
 Evermore must dim thy vision! Christ the way will clear. 
5 Hallelujah! Christ is Victor, Soon His voice shall ring,  “Come ye conquerors, come up hither, Join thy conquering King.”
636 冲过战士哪冲过前线正在开火
1 冲过！战士哪，冲过！前线正在开火；  但各各他已得胜，请你常唱此歌。  黑暗权势应当退！撒但阴府已危！  万军之主的元帅，快要奏凯归回。 
2 “冲过！战士哪，冲过！仰起你头看我；  你若为我打胜仗，必得登我宝座。”   这是属灵的交战，不在属世地盘；  主知仇敌正迫近，前后四围布满！ 
3 “冲过！战士哪，冲过！ 你要登我宝座；  使我复活的能力，会使你灵超脱。  藉我你要得权能，藉我你要得胜，  藉我你要唱凯歌，藉我你要高升。”  
4 “冲过！战士哪，冲过！你要登我宝座；  我已为你留一席，你要欢喜快乐。”   我们与祂同复活，同升天上坐着，  远离战场的喊声，远离绑人罪恶。 
5 冲过！战士哪，冲过！你要登主宝座；  主从灰尘拣选你，要你同祂得国。  你的将来乃光明，不是黑暗灰心，  永与耶稣在一起，永得祂的爱情。 
6 冲过！欢呼着冲过！前面就是宝座！  你从郇山的高峰，可唱得胜新歌。  被杀羔羊已得胜！登基羔羊已胜！  我们欢呼赞美祂，因祂必定得胜。 
636 CHARGE SOLDIERS CHARGE IN BATTLE  THE CONFLICT HAS BEGUN
1 “The victory is won!”  Hell’s power must be vanquished And Satan’s forces strewn;  The Captain of the Army Will come and triumph soon.
2 Charge, soldiers, charge in battle! And gaze upon thy Lord;  If thou wilt fight His battle, The throne is thy reward.  This war is of the spirit, Not fought on earthly ground;  The Lord well knows the foe is near, Encircling us around. 
3 Charge, soldiers, charge in battle! Christ’s throne awaiteth thee;  His resurrection power Will lift thy spirit free. 
 Through Him thou wilt have power, The foe to battle down;  Through Him thou wilt the triumph sing, And wear the victor’s  crown. 
4 Charge, soldiers, charge in battle! Thou shalt ascend the throne;  A feast He is preparing, How happy thou to own. 
 With Him we’re resurrected Above the battle din;  Transcending all that binds us, We’re far above in Him. 
5 Charge, soldiers, charge in battle! Thou art the royal heir;  The Lord from dust did choose thee, That thou His kingdom share.  Thou hast no part in darkness, Thy future, O how bright;  With Christ to dwell forever And in His love delight. 
6 With joyful shouts charge forward! The kingdom is before;  Upon the peak of Zion We’ll sing, the battle o’er.  The Lamb has won the victory! The Lamb is on the throne!  With shouts of joy we praise Him, For He must overcome.
637 真是如此我将像你儿子
1 真是如此！我将像你儿子？  这是否祂为我成功恩慈？  何其高超，父的荣耀计划！  要带我进荣耀并且像祂。 
2 哦，主耶稣，谁能爱我如你？  不仅见你荣耀在永世里，  在彼并见你劳苦的果子，  我这人乃你魂产难赏赐。 
3 若非我们与你全然如一，  你爱就仍不能完全安息；  因你爱所赐不像这世界，  但与蒙爱者同享它一切。 
4 有日蒙爱者荣耀里显现，  欢乐环绕你，全都已完全；  都要像你，因你荣耀像你，  你远超一切，配万众顶礼。 
637 AND IS IT SO I SHALL BE LIKE THY SON
1 And is it so! I shall be like Thy Son? 
 Is this the grace which He for me has won? 
 Father of glory — thought beyond all thought! 
 In glory, to His own blest likeness brought! 
2 Oh, Jesus, Lord, who loved me like to Thee? 
 Fruit of Thy work, with Thee, too, there to see 
 Thy glory, Lord, while endless ages roll, 
 Myself the prize and travail of Thy soul. 
3 Yet it must be: Thy love had not its rest 
 Were Thy redeemed not with Thee fully blest; 
 That love that gives not as the world, but shares  All it possesses with its loved co-heirs. 
4 Nor I alone; Thy loved ones, all complete 
 In glory, round Thee there with joy shall meet; 
 All like Thee, for Thy glory like Thee, Lord, 
 Object supreme of all, by all adored.
638 一点时候 - 主就回来
1 “一点时候” - 主就回来，  我们就要不再流落；  迎接我们归家云外，  祂所豫备天上居所 -   与祂同居瞻祂荣面，  高声歌颂奇妙恩典。  与祂同居瞻祂荣面，  高声歌颂奇妙恩典。
2 祂就再来，  我们须要赎回光阴；  使祂痛心是我悲哀，  跟祂、事祂，是我欢欣；  愿我豫备，儆醒、祷告，  有如仆人等候主到。  愿我豫备，儆醒、祷告，  有如仆人等候主到。
3 转瞬即过，  主赐十架为何推辞？  步祂脚踪，效祂所作，  为祂，利益算作损失；  祂的笑脸是为报酬
 这苦痛的”一点时候。”   祂的笑脸是为报酬 
 这苦痛的”一点时候。”  
4 求你就来！  主，你新妇盼望已久；  疲倦客旅切切等待，  归家高唱永远歌讴；  见你真体荣耀无比，  并要改变完全像你。  见你真体荣耀无比，  并要改变完全像你。
638 A LITTLE WHILE OUR LORD SHALL COME
1 “A little while!” Our Lord shall come, 
 And we shall wander here no more; 
 He’ll take us to our Father’s home, 
 Where He for us has gone before —  
 To dwell with Him, to see His face, 
 And sing the glories of His grace. 
 To dwell with Him, to see His face, 
 And sing the glories of His grace. 
2 He’ll come again;
 Let us the precious hours redeem; 
 Our only grief to give Him pain, 
 Our joy to serve and follow Him. 
 Watching and ready may we be, 
 As those that wait their Lord to see. 
 Watching and ready may we be, 
 As those that wait their Lord to see. 
3 ‘twill soon be past,
 Why should we shun the promised cross? 
 O let us in His footsteps haste, 
 Counting for Him all else but loss; 
 For how will recompense His smile 
 The suff’rings of this “little while.” 
 For how will recompense His smile 
 The suff’rings of this “little while.” 
4 come, Savior, come!
 For Thee Thy bride has tarried long; 
 Take Thy poor waiting pilgrims home, 
 To sing the new eternal song, 
 To see Thy glory, and to be 
 In ev’rything conformed to Thee! 
 To see Thy glory, and to be 
 In ev’rything conformed to Thee!
639 耶稣要再从高天降临 特.和.
1 耶稣要再从高天降临，
 会否就在今天？ 
 以爱和大能治理万民， 
 会否就在今天？ 
 来迎娶祂拣选的新妇， 
 就是一切被祂所救赎， 
 又蒙洁净各地信徒， 
 会否就在今天？ 
和 荣耀，荣耀！我心欢乐歌唱；  荣耀，荣耀！要加冠祂为王；  荣耀，荣耀！速速豫备主道；  荣耀，荣耀！耶稣即将临到！ 
2 撒但的权势即将终止， 
 但愿就在今天！ 
 悲伤与叹息都要消失， 
 但愿就在今天！ 
 主里安睡者都要起来， 
 被提空中与基督同在， 
 荣耀情景即将揭开， 
 会否就在今天？ 
3 我们是否良善又忠心， 
 若祂今天降临？ 
 是否坦然等候又欢欣， 
 若祂今天降临？ 
 主再临豫兆比前更甚， 
 有如曙光渐现的早晨， 
 儆醒等候，破晓已近， 
 莫非今天就临？ 
639 JESUS IS COMING TO EARTH AGAIN IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
1 Jesus is coming to earth again, 
 What if it were today? 
 Coming in power and love to reign, 
 What if it were today? 
 Coming to claim His chosen Bride, 
 All the redeemed and purified, 
 Over this whole earth scattered wide, 
 What if it were today? 
(C) Glory, glory! Joy to my heart ‘twill bring;  Glory, glory! When we shall crown Him King;  Glory, glory! Haste to prepare the way; 
 Glory, glory! Jesus will come some day. 
2 Satan’s dominion will soon be o’er, 
 O, that it were today! 
 Sorrow and sighing shall be no more, 
 O, that it were today! 
 Then shall the dead in Christ arise, 
 Caught up to meet Him in the skies, 
 When shall these glories meet our eyes? 
 What if it were today? 
3 Faithful and true would He find us here, 
 If He should come today? 
 Watching in gladness and not in fear, 
 If He should come today? 
 Signs of His coming multiply, 
 Morning light breaks in eastern sky, 
 Watch, for that time is drawing nigh, 
 What if it were today?
640 我主今被人弃绝又被世界否认 特.和.
1 我主今被人弃绝，又被世界否认；  众人将祂漠视、忽略，只被少数崇尊；  但祂不久将荣归！时日已经迫近，  因为不久加冠之日即将临。 
和 哦，那加冠之日已近，不久即将来临，  那时主将在大能荣耀中从天降临。  哦，荣耀情景将令守望者欢喜不置，  在那不久即将临加冠之日。 
2 诸天发荣耀光辉； 
 众圣蒙主妆饰， 
 在荣耀里所发光辉， 
 明亮远超天势。 
 穿戴救主的美丽， 
 光彩令人眩目， 
 在那不久即将临加冠之日。 
3 不再犯罪不再忧， 
 痛苦都成过去， 
 一切忧伤丢在背后， 
 面前惟有欢喜， 
 是在主里的欢欣； 
 我们与祂相近， 
 在那加冠之日 - 不久即将临。 
4 但愿我们都催促 
 快乐之日来临， 
 借着专一奉献给主， 
 窄路上往前奔； 
 并寻回失丧灵魂， 
 因主为他受死， 
 在那不久将临加冠的日子。 
640 OUR LORD IS NOW REJECTED AND BY THE  WORLD DISOWNED
1 IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
The Hope of Glory 
1 Our Lord is now rejected, And by the world disowned,  By the many still neglected, And by the few enthroned;  But soon He’ll come in glory! The hour is drawing nigh,  For the crowning day is coming By-and-by. 
(C) O the crowning day is coming, Is coming by-and-by,  When our Lord shall come in power And glory from on high.  O the glorious sight will gladden Each waiting, watchful eye,  In the crowning day that’s coming By-and-by. 
2 The heavens shall glow with splendor, 
 But brighter far than they, 
 The saints shall shine in glory, 
 As Christ shall them array. 
 The beauty of the Savior 
 Shall dazzle every eye, 
 In the crowning day that’s coming By-and-by. 
3 Our pain shall then be over, 
 We’ll sin and sigh no more, 
 Behind us all of sorrow, 
 And naught but joy before, 
 A joy in our Redeemer, 
 As we to Him are nigh, 
 In the crowning day that’s coming By-and-by. 
4 Let all that look for hasten 
 The coming joyful day, 
 By earnest consecration, 
 To walk the narrow way; 
 By gathering in the lost ones, 
 For whom our Lord did die, 
 For the crowning day that’s coming By-and-by.
641 自伯大尼你与我们分手后
1 自伯大尼你与我们分手后，  我心有个真空无可补满，  我坐河滨，将琴挂在柳枝头，  你不在此，我怎有心鼓弹？  当我深夜孤独安静的时候，  (此时我无忍受，我也无享受，)   不禁叹息，我想着你是多远，  我想着你应许已久的归旋。 
2 你的马槽使我生无家之想，  你的苦架使我无所欲喜，  你的再来使我怀未见之乡，  你的自己成我追求目的。  你不在此，喜乐已减它滋味，  诗歌也缺它所应有的甜美；  你不在此，终日我若有所失，  主阿，我要你来，我不要你迟。 
3 虽我在此也能享受你同在，  但我深处依然有个缺憾；  虽然有你光照，也有你抚爱，  有个什么我不知仍不满！  平安里面，我却仍感觉孤单，  喜乐时候，我仍不免有吁叹，  最足意时，我心仍有不足意，  就是我还不能当面看见你。 
4 亡人怎不想见生长的乡邑？  俘虏怎不想见故国故人？  情人分离，怎不一心羁两地？  儿女远游，怎不思家思亲？  主阿，我想看见你面的心意，  还非这些人间情形可比拟；  现今在此，我无法见你丰采，  是否只好叹息等到你回来！ 
5 主，你能否忘记你曾经应许，  你要回来，接我与你同在？  但一天天又一年年的过去，  我仍等候，你却仍未回来！  求你纪念，我己等得好疲倦，  而你归期仍像当初一样远！  多久？多久？还有多久的时候，  你才应验应许来把我提走？ 
6 日出日落，一世过去又一代，  你的圣徒生活、等候、安睡，  一位一位，他们已逐渐离开，  一次一次，我们望你快回。 
 我主，为何你仍没有显动静，  天仍闭住，我们观看仍对镜，  我们在此依然等候再等候，  哎呀，是否我们等候还不够？ 
7 当我回想，我已等候多长久，  不禁叹息，低头独自流泪，  求你别再迟延不听我要求，  现今就来接我与你相会；  来罢，我主，这是教会的求呼！  来罢，我主，请听圣徒的催促！  来罢，历世历代累积的共鸣，  我主，能否求你今天一起听！ 
641 SINCE LONG AGO AT BETHANY WE  PARTED
1 Since long ago at Bethany we parted, 
 Within my heart there is a ceaseless void; 
 How can I take my harp down from the willow?  How can my songs without Thee be enjoyed?  And when at night I’m keeping lonely vigil —   Grown numb alike to sorrow and to cheer —   Then I recall the promise of Thy coming, 
 But sigh: O Lord, why, why Thou dost not yet appear? 
2 Thy manger wakes the thought: I too am homeless;  Thy cross strips earthly pleasures from my soul;  Thy coming bids me seek a better country,  For Thou Thyself art now my final goal. 
 Since Thou art gone my joy has lost its flavor,  My song the sweetness I would fain convey.  Since Thou art gone the sense of void o’erwhelms me.  Oh, how I long that Thou wilt come and not delay. 
3 Though even now I know Thy loving presence,  Yet in my heart there’s still a sense of lack.  Enlightening and tenderest sustaining 
 Can no more satisfy: I want Thee back. 
 Despite Thy peace within, I still feel lonely;  Despite Thy joy there still remains a sigh; 
 When I feel most content, the silent yearning  To see Thee face to face becomes an uttered cry. 
4 What exile cannot but desire his homeland  And long his people once again to greet? 
 What soul on alien soil forgets his kindred?  What parted lovers never yearn to meet? 
 O Lord, how can these earthly loves and pleasures  With all the joy of Thy return compare? 
 Then, if I cannot here behold Thy countenance,  What can I do but sigh till Thou, my Lord, appear? 
5 Could’st Thou, O Lord, forget Thy word of promise  Soon to return and take me unto Thee? 
 Yet day by day and year by year I’ve waited  And still I wait, and no return I see! 
 Remember, Lord, the years I have been waiting  While Thy dear footsteps linger far away. 
 How long? How long? Oh! must I wait still longer  Till Thou shalt come again in glorious array? 
6 From generation unto generation 
 Thy saints have come and gone, but have not seen  Thy glorious promise pass into fulfilment. 
 How long, how very long the time has been!  Why cannot we, dear Lord, discern Thy footsteps?  Why are the heavens still so closely sealed?  Oh! must our waiting be prolonged still further  Before Thou in Thy matchless splendor art revealed? 
7 Lord, I recall the many years I’ve waited 
 For Thy return — yet, Lord, not I alone, 
 But Thy dear saints through many generations —   Beseeching Thee to come back for Thine own.  To countless tears and countless fervent pleadings,  By Thine appearing haste to make reply. 
 Oh, may Thou come, the echo of the ages, 
 Come, come and answer now this mighty corp’rate cry!
642 自从当年橄榄山前一别离
1 自从当年橄榄山前一别离，  至今你仍未向我们呼召；  历世历代我们都求看见你，  但你好像不听我们祷告。
和 你来！就来！我们呼求你快来！  我们的心所有盼望是你来！  我们等候你快来！ 
2 爱主，自从当年你上升之后，  这里全都变为枯燥无味；  我们时在祈求，又时在看守，  每一动静，都疑是你已回。 
3 景色虽美，你我何日才相聚？  山水虽佳，你今在天何方？  花香鸟语不能使我有情绪，  因我正在思念你的容光。 
4 主阿，我们等待已久真焦灼，  不知还要多少时候等待；  从每次日出直到每次日落，  我们都是望你能就回来。 
5 当雨每次滴沥，海每次澎湃，  风每次吹动，月每次照明，  我们都望就是你已经回来，  何等失望，至今尚无动静！ 
6 若非纪念你临行所赐命令，  我们就要灰心，无意工作；  但你要我们一面等你来迎，  一面努力工作为你生活。 
7 主阿，求你纪念日子已长久，  应许已过多年尚未应验；  希望又希望，一直希望不休，  要来未来，可否来在今天？ 
642 SINCE THY DEPARTURE FROM OLIVET’S  MOUNTAIN
11.10.11.10. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 Since Thy departure from Olivet’s Mountain, 
 Why is Thy coming again so delayed? 
 Thru the long years we have longed for Thy coming;  Hast Thou not heard all the prayers that we’ve prayed? 
(C) Come Thou, come now; Lord, for Thy coming we yearn;  All our desire is Thy promised returning, 
 Oh, may Thou quickly return. 
2 Beloved Lord, since the year Thou ascended 
 Everything here has been tasteless and dry; 
 Often in praying and often in watching, 
 In every movement, for Thee, Lord, we sigh. 
3 Scenes although lovely, yet when will we meet Thee?  Birds and the flowers fair beauty embrace; 
 All are delightsome, but none satisfy me, 
 For I am longing for Thy loving face. 
4 Lord, we’re impatient awaiting Thy coming, 
 We do not know how much longer ‘twill be; 
 From every sunrise to every bright sunset 
 Hope we each moment Thy coming to see. 
5 Whene’er ‘tis raining, or strong winds are blowing,  Whene’er the moon shines, or rises the sea, 
 We ever hope to discover Thy coming; 
 How disappointed when no sign of Thee! 
6 If it were not for the bidding Thou gav’st us, 
 We’d be discouraged, Thy service we’d shirk; 
 But Thou dost want us while waiting Thy coming,  For Thee to live and in diligence work. 
7 Oh Lord, remember the days have been lengthened  Since Thou hast promised ere going away; 
 We hope and hope and are endlessly hoping, 
 That Thou wilt come. Canst Thou come e’en today? 
643 我王必定快要再临
1 我王必定快要再临，
 天空都满了祂！ 
 待赎宇宙快得复兴， 
 主要完成救法！ 
 我已听见祂的脚声， 
 在那彩云中间； 
 我已看见祂的荣身， 
 隐约显露在天。 
2 我今仰望我主”同在，”   不敢懈怠一点； 
 我今等候我主再来， 
 使我得着所天。 
 除了我主此刻就来， 
 接我与祂同在， 
 除了这件美事以外， 
 我心别无所爱。 
3 我眼专看我的救主， 
 我心已经在天， 
 我口不说别的题目， 
 只说与主相见。 
 主的再临已经紧近， 
 主来原是为我； 
 主的应许永远坚定， 
 从来没有空说。 
4 我的救主，你的圣言 
 无可惑，无可减； 
 我今忠诚不顾脸面， 
 因你圣言自勉。 
 愿你荣耀早日显现， 
 仇敌败，阴府陷； 
 愿你应许早日应验， 
 接我们到那边。 
5 你的膀臂是避难所， 
 耶稣救主我神！ 
 你像天父一样保妥 
 一切靠你的人； 
 羊和牧者同样轻重， 
 身和头同境遇！ 
 谁也不能从你手中， 
 夺去你的儿女。 
6 千人的手不能阻我， 
 万人的眼也不； 
 路上荆棘，不过助我 
 忠勇进前得福。 
 我心！我灵！今当复兴，  让这世界过去； 
 生命的主！求你快临，  接我进入天域。 
7 医治的日！人的盼望！  我真爱你光线； 
 公义的主！荣耀的王！  我今伏你面前！ 
 求你自己快登宝座！ 
 求你脸面快显！ 
 求你伸手建立天国， 
 向万民赐恩典！ 
8 真理本当得胜为王！ 
 自由本当为后！ 
但是谎言竟然倡狂， 
 为这世界元首！ 
 所以真理求你快来！ 
 带着天光而来！ 
 好使仇敌遇见失败， 
 众子投入你怀。 
643 MY KING WILL SOON COME BACK AGAIN
1 My King will soon come back again, 
 The sky be filled with Him; 
 The universe to be redeemed 
 Will see His light therein. 
 The Lord will soon fulfill His plan, 
 His footsteps now I hear; 
 His glorious frame I faintly see 
 Beginning to appear. 
2 I’m longing for His presence blest 
 And dare not slothful be 
 While waiting for my Lord’s return, 
 His own dear self to see. 
 My only hope — that He may come 
 And change my faith to sight; 
 There is no other joy on earth 
 Which gives my heart delight. 
3 My heart is always with Himself, 
 My eyes are heavenward, 
 My lips would utter nothing else 
 Than meeting with my Lord. 
 The coming of the Lord draws nigh, 
 His coming is for me; 
 His promise ever standeth firm 
 And soon fulfilled I’ll see. 
4 My Savior, all Thy holy words 
 Can never doubted be; 
 With them encouraged day by day, 
 I’m faithful unto Thee. 
 Oh, may Thy glory soon appear, 
 The foe be overthrown; 
 Thy promises be realized, 
 And we brought to Thy throne. 
5 Thy saving arm a refuge is, 
 My Savior God, to me; 
 Thou as the Father keepeth them 
 Who put their trust in Thee. 
 The sheep and shepherd are of one, 
 The head and body same; 
 None e’er can pluck from out Thy hand 
 The child who trusts Thy Name. 
6 A thousand hands won’t hinder me, 
 Nor will ten thousand eyes; 
 The thorns upon the road but help 
 Me onward to the prize. 
 Arise, my spirit and my heart, 
 And let the world go by; 
 The Lord of life will take me soon 
 To be with Him on high. 
7 Thou healing sun! Thou hope of man! 
 I really love Thy ray. 
 Oh, righteous Lord! oh, glorious King! 
 I bow to Thee and pray: 
 Oh, may Thou soon ascend Thy throne 
 And quickly show Thy face; 
 Thy heav’nly kingdom may Thou found 
 And grant all men Thy grace. 
8 The truth should triumph and be king, 
 And freedom should be queen; 
 But falsehood, which has rampant run, 
 Head of the world is seen. 
 We ask Thee, Truth, to quickly come 
 And bring Thy light from heav’n: 
 The foe be curshed and all Thy sons 
 Into Thy bosom giv’n.
644 或许在清晨或在梦醒的黎明
1 或许在清晨，或在梦醒的黎明，  长夜初过尽，日光正驱散黑影；  那时主耶稣满披荣耀再降临，  当主提接祂的子民。 
和 哦主，还需多久！多长！  我们才能高唱：基督再临！  阿利路亚！阿利路亚！ 
 阿们！阿利路亚！阿们！ 
2 或许在正午，或在薄暮的黄昏，  也许在午夜，黑暗深沉的时辰；  主荣耀光芒，划破最深的黑荫，  当主提接祂的子民。 
3 “和散那”声高，当主自高天降临，  得荣众圣徒，与天使一起欢吟；  主荣面射出，无限恩典的光明，  当主提接祂的子民。 
4 何等大欣喜，倘若不死即被提！  再没有疾病、忧伤、痛苦和哭泣；  与主永同在，共用荣耀于天庭，  当主提接祂的子民。 
644 IT MAY BE AT MORN WHEN THE DAY IS  AWAKING
12.12.12.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 It may be at morn when the day is awaking, 
 When sunlight through darkness and shadow is breaking,  That Jesus will come in the fullness of glory, 
 To receive from the world His own. 
(C) O Lord Jesus, how long, how long 
 Ere we shout the glad song, Christ returneth! Hallelujah!  Hallelujah! Amen, 
 Hallelujah! Amen. 
2 It may be at midday, it may be at twilight, 
 It may be, perchance, that the blackness of midnight  Will burst into light in the blaze of His glory, 
 When Jesus receives His own. 
3 While hosts cry Hosanna, from heaven descending,  With glorified saints and the angels attending, 
 With grace on His brow, like a halo of glory, 
 Will Jesus receive His own. 
4 O joy! O delight! should we go without dying, 
 No sickness, no sadness, no dread and no crying,  Caught up through the clouds with our Lord into glory,  When Jesus receives His own.
645 也许在清晨正当我们在赞美
1 也许在清晨，正当我们在赞美；  也许就在会中，正当众圣聚会；  有一事确知，圣灵也在作见证：  主耶稣不久将再临！
和 哦，主耶稣，阿们！ 
 教会不久将再见你！ 
 “主正再临！ 
 阿利路亚！阿利路亚！ 
 阿们！阿利路亚！阿们！”  
2 莫再浪费你光阴；  借着儆醒、祷告，抓住每一时辰；  凡事当感谢，并时时喜乐满怀，  如此欢迎主的再来。
3 提接祂的新妇归祂！
4 何等的喜乐，我们将与祂相会！  得见所爱之主，何等快乐、甜美！  祂是我生命，我主、我爱、我新郎，  要来提接我回天上！ 
645 IT MAY BE AT MORN AS THE DAY WE ARE  GREETING
12.12.12.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 It may be at morn as the day we are greeting; 
 It may be the time when the saints all are meeting;  But one thing we know, for the Spirit bears witness,  That Jesus will come very soon! 
(C) O Lord Jesus, Amen! 
 The church soon will see Thee again! 
 “Thou art coming! Hallelujah! 
 Hallelujah, Amen ! 
 Hallelujah, Amen!” 
2 there’s no time for delaying;  So grasping each moment by watching and praying  And in everything giving thanks and rejoicing,
 We’ll welcome our Lord’s return. 
3 An instant, a twinkling, and Jesus descending 
 Will come for His saints in His glory transcending.  He’ll come as the Bridegroom — as such we’ll behold Him —   To take to Himself His Bride! 
4 O what rapture to greet Him!  Our Lord and our life, our Beloved, our Bridegroom  Will take to Himself His Bride!
646 主你将要显现那日就在眼前 特.
1 主，你将要显现，那日就在眼前。  哦，我们渴慕你快临！主，我们新郎，  我命，我诗章！你外，我心别无所倾！
2 那日正在临近，主的呼声可闻；  那时，见你云中降临， 
 哦，何等甜美！与新郎相会！  大爱远超我心感领。 
3 时日飞逝似箭，不久就见你面！  阿们，我主，愿你快来！ 
 你赢得我心，我望见你身， 
 并且与你永远同在。 
4 新郎  就要回来迎娶新妇。
 哦，阿利路亚！我心所渴慕！  那时祂要心满意足。 
646 LORD THOU WILT SOON APPEAR THY DAY  IS ALMOST HERE.
1 IRREGULAR METER
The Hope of Glory 
1 Lord, Thou wilt soon appear, Thy day is almost here.  Oh, how we love Thy coming soon! We have no other  Lord, life, or lover Than Thou, Lord Jesus, our Bridegroom! 
2 The hour is drawing nigh, Soon we shall hear Thy cry  And see Thee in the clouds descend. Oh what an hour sweet  When Bride and Bridegroom meet 
 And love surpassing comprehend. 
3 The moments fly apace, Soon we shall see Thy face!  Amen, Lord Jesus! Quickly come! We long Thyself to see  And with Thee ever be, 
 Thou who our inmost heart hath won. 
4 ‘Tis but a moment now; Thou, our Lord Bridegroom, Thou  Soon wilt return to claim Thy Bride. 
 O Hallelujah! ‘Tis this we long for, 
 And Thou too wilt be satisfied.
647 面对面见我的救主
1 面对面见我的救主，  何等美好！何有福！  大喜之日当面注目
 爱我、替我死的主！ 
和 我要与主对面相见，  在遥远众星上面； 
 不久要在荣耀里面，  与我恩主面对面！ 
2 如今见祂模糊不清，  因有帕子隔中间； 
 但那有福日子将临，  就得喜见主荣脸。 
3 在祂面前欢乐不止，  忧伤、痛苦全消失；  弯曲道路已变正直，  所有隐情也全知。 
4 亲见主面何等有福，  面对面万事清楚； 
 面对面见我救赎主 -   爱我的耶稣基督。 
647 FACE TO FACE WITH CHRIST MY SAVIOR
1 Face to face with Christ, my Savior, 
 Face to face — what will it be? 
 When with rapture I behold Him, 
 Jesus Christ who died for me. 
(C) Face to face I shall behold Him, 
 Far beyond the starry sky; 
 Face to face in all His glory, 
 I shall see Him by and by! 
2 Only faintly now, I see Him, 
 With the darkling veil between, 
 But a blessed day is coming, 
 When His glory shall be seen. 
3 What rejoicing in His presence, 
 When are banished grief and pain; 
 When the crooked ways are straightened, 
 And the dark things shall be plain. 
4 Face to face! O blissful moment! 
 Face to face — to see and know; 
 Face to face with my Redeemer, 
 Jesus Christ who loves me so.
648 有日银炼将要折断
1 有日银炼将要折断，  我就不再如此歌唱；  但我醒来何等喜欢，  竟然得以面见我王。
和 我要见祂面对着面，  我要述说救我恩典；  我要见祂面对着面，  我要述说救我恩典。 
2 有日地上帐棚倾覆，  我也不知何日何载；  但我确知有个去处，  使我能以与主同在。 
3 或者有日救主再临，  那时工作即将完毕；  得主称许”忠心仆人，”   我要进入祂的安息。 
4 有日；所以我要准备，  把灯剔亮，儆醒等待；  那日我得与主相会，  永远享受祂的同在。 
648 SOME DAY THE SILVER CORD WILL BREAK
1 Some day the silver cord will break, 
 And I no more as now shall sing; 
 But, O the joy when I shall wake 
 Within the presence of the King! 
(C) And I shall see Him face to face, 
 And tell the story, saved by grace: 
 And I shall see Him face to face, 
 And tell the story, saved by grace. 
2 Some day my earthly house will fall, 
 I cannot tell how soon ‘twill be, 
 But this I know — my All in all 
 Has now a place with Him for me. 
3 Or some day when my Lord will come, 
 And called to meet Him I’ll be blest, 
 He then will say to me, “Well done,” 
 And I shall enter into rest. 
4 Some day, till then I’ll watch and wait, 
 My lamp all trimmed and burning bright, 
 That when my Savior I will greet, 
 My faith will then be changed to sight.
649 我在黑暗愁苦之中
1 我在黑暗、愁苦之中，  见一线明光；
 因我深知恩主基督，  将为我再来。 
 祂在安息、荣耀之中，  满了神荣光； 
 基督正在注目、等待，  直等到我来。 
2 我在这荒凉的路上，  主一直领率； 
 我今看见荣光迫近，  是我神荣光。 
 在那爱和荣耀之中，  祂乃在等待； 
 我的名铭刻祂手上，  祂永不能忘。 
3 在这荒凉路上，是谁  正来迎接我； 
 有如晨星正在豫示，  神的晴朗天。 
 在那蒙羞十字架上，  祂来赢得我； 
 藉祂荣耀，我深知祂：  永远不改变。 
4 当我行完荒漠路程，  见主何欢腾！ 
 祂那美妙问安的话，  终于说出来！ 
 祂要和我一同进入 
 天上的美境； 
 祂要和我一同享受 
 父所有的爱。 
5 那里毫无阴影、污迹，  圣城常明亮； 
 在祂无污的圣洁里，  我与祂同行。 
 我要与祂长远相伴，  瞻仰祂面光， 
 直到神恩典的荣耀，  在我里显明。 
6 祂曾为我担当咒诅，  渡忧伤时刻； 
 我今行经孤寂荒漠，  步祂的脚踪。 
 将来祂和我在荣耀，  同享大喜乐 -  
 我乐，因与祂永同在；  祂乐，我与共。 
649 ‘MIDST THE DARKNESS STORM AND  SORROW
1 ‘Midst the darkness, storm, and sorrow, 
 One bright gleam I see; 
 Well I know the blessed morrow 
 Christ will come for me. 
 ‘Midst the peace, the joy, the glory 
 And the light, God’s own, 
 Christ for me is watching, waiting, 
 Waiting ‘til I come. 
2 Long the blessed Guide has led me, 
 By the desert road; 
 Now I see the coming splendor, 
 Splendor of my God. 
 There amidst the love and glow 
 He is waiting yet; 
 On His hands a name is graven 
 He can ne’er forget. 
3 Who is this, who comes to meet me, 
 On the desert way, 
 As the Morning Star foretelling 
 God’s unclouded day? 
 He it is who came to win me, 
 On the cross of shame; 
 In His glow well I know Him, 
 Evermore the same. 
4 O the blessed joy of meeting, 
 All the desert past; 
 O the wondrous words of greeting, 
 He shall speak at last! 
 He and I together ent’ring 
 The fair realm above; 
 He and I together sharing 
 All the Father’s love. 
5 Where no shade nor stain can enter, 
 Nor the gold be dim, 
 In His holiness unsullied, 
 I shall walk with Him. 
 Meet companion then for Jesus, 
 From Him, for Him, made —  
 Glory of God’s grace forever 
 There in me displayed. 
6 He who in His hour of sorrow 
 Bore the curse alone; 
 I who through the lonely desert 
 Trod where He had gone; 
 He and I, in that bright glory,  
 One deep joy shall share —  
 Mine, to be forever with Him; 
 His, that I am there.
650 当我恩主降临时候
1 当我恩主降临时候，  我要脱尽所有忧愁，  同众圣徒跟祂而走，  哦！赞美主！哦！
 赞美主！哦！赞美主！  同众圣徒跟祂而走，  哦！赞美主！ 
2 当我亲眼见我救主，  与祂荣中永远同住，  我心快乐，我口欢呼，  哦！赞美主！哦！ 
 赞美主！哦！赞美主！  我心快乐，我口欢呼，  哦！赞美主！ 
3 当我见主在那空中，  我十字架就不苦重，  何等畅乐与主相逢！  哦！赞美主！哦！ 
 赞美主！哦！赞美主！  何等畅乐与主相逢！  哦！赞美主！ 
4 当那时候，我要见证  无何能胜主的生命，  离地上升何等欢腾！  哦！赞美主！哦！ 
 赞美主！哦！赞美主！  离地上升何等欢腾！  哦！赞美主！ 
5 但愿我们隐主肋畔！  合而为一不再离散，  好叫耶稣意足心满，  在祂来时！ 
 在祂来时！在祂来时！  好叫耶稣意足心满，  在祂来时！ 
6 来罢我王，愿你就来！  接等你者与你同在，  使爱你者得你赏赉，  主阿，快来！ 
 主阿，快来！主阿，快来！  使爱你者得你赏赉，  主阿，快来！ 
650 WHEN MY BLEST LORD WILL COME AGAIN
1 When my blest Lord will come again, 
 I will be saved from all my pain, 
 With all the saints I’ll follow Him, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 With all the saints I’ll follow Him, 
 O praise the Lord! 
2 When I shall see Him face to face, 
 And dwell with Him thru endless days, 
 I will rejoice and sing His grace, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 I will rejoice and sing His grace, 
 O praise the Lord! 
3 When I meet Him before the Throne, 
 My suff’rings then will all be gone, 
 The joy of vict’ry will be won, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 The joy of vict’ry will be won, 
 O praise the Lord! 
4 In that day I will testify 
 That nothing with Christ’s life can vie, 
 What glorious rapture to the sky, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 What glorious rapture to the sky, 
 O praise the Lord! 
5 May we in our Lord’s side e’er hide, 
 Be always one and ne’er divide, 
 That His heart may be satisfied, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 That His heart may be satisfied, 
 O praise the Lord! 
6 O come, our King, O come, dear Lord! 
 Receive us by Thy promised word, 
 And give the victors Thy reward, 
 O praise the Lord! 
 O praise the Lord! O praise the Lord! 
 And give the victors Thy reward, 
 O praise the Lord!
651 哦我救主你要再临 特.
1 哦，我救主，你要再临，  哦，我王，你要再临，  在你光辉美丽之中，
 在你超越荣耀之中， 
 我们将欢乐歌唱； 
 看哪！东方云开处， 
 先驱之光已渐明； 
 听哪！荣耀大祭司 
 脚上铃声已听闻。 
2 你要再回，你要再回；  回来路上要相会； 
 我们就要更认识你， 
 并要向你倾吐心意。 
 我们将欢乐称祝： 
 何等的一首诗歌！ 
 表达我们对你爱， 
 甘甜倾倒我欢乐， 
 在你脚前我敬拜。 
3 你要再临，在你桌前，  当我们向你纪念， 
 同作你再临的见证； 
 在与你甘甜交通中， 
 豫尝要来的祝福， 
 不只表明你的死， 
 或你救赎的大爱， 
 你的再来与国度， 
 正是我们所期待。 
4 哦，你是我亲爱救主，  配荣耀尊贵称祝！ 
 我们乐见你掌权柄， 
 万口莫不承认你名， 
 同心向你献敬拜； 
 你是我友并我主， 
 今被称义登宝座， 
 直到地的最极处， 
 将你荣耀来传播。 
651 THOU ART COMING O MY SAVIOR IRREGULAR METER
1 Thou art coming, O my Savior, 
 Thou art coming, O my King, 
 In Thy beauty all resplendent, 
 In Thy glory all transcendent; 
 Well may we rejoice and sing; 
 Coming! In the opening east, 
 Herald brightness slowly swells: 
 Coming! O my glorious Priest, 
 Hear we not Thy golden bells? 
2 Thou art coming, Thou art coming; 
 We shall meet Thee on Thy way; 
 We shall see Thee, we shall know Thee,  We shall bless Thee, we shall show Thee  All our hearts could never say: 
 What an anthem that will be, 
 Ringing out our love to Thee, 
 Pouring out our rapture sweet 
 At Thine own all-glorious feet. 
3 Thou art coming, at Thy Table 
 We are witnesses for this; 
 While rememb’ring hearts Thou meetest  In communion clearest, sweetest, 
 Earnest of our coming bliss, 
 Showing not Thy death alone, 
 And Thy love exceeding great, 
 But Thy coming and Thy throne, 
 All for which we long and wait. 
4 Oh, the joy to see Thee reigning, 
 Thee, my own beloved Lord! 
 Every tongue Thy Name confessing, 
 Worship, honor, glory, blessing, 
 Brought to Thee with one accord; 
 Thee, my Master and my Friend, 
 Vindicated and enthroned, 
 Unto earth’s remotest end 
 Glorified, adored, and owned!
652 颂赞受膏的基督
1 颂赞受膏的基督，
 君尊大卫后裔！ 
 豫定日期已满足， 
 开始治理全地！ 
 祂来解开诸捆索， 
 释放被掳子民； 
 祂来除净众罪恶， 
 公平君临万民。 
2 祂来犹如降甘霖， 
 在此肥沃土上； 
 喜乐、盼望似花锦， 
 盛开在祂路旁。 
 在祂降临诸山前， 
 平安作祂先遣； 
 公义涌出如清泉， 
 流遍山谷平原。 
3 君王向祂全俯伏， 
 献黄金并馨香； 
 万国向祂都拜服， 
 众民向祂颂唱。 
 河山、沧海并全地， 
 归祂掌权为王； 
 大鹰展翅所能及， 
 无不由祂执掌。 
4 无终祷告和颂赞， 
 如香日日上腾； 
 祂的国境仍扩展， 
 国权永远无终。 
 黑门甘露降下来 
 滋润微小麦种， 
 结出百倍子粒来， 
 众民全足全丰。 
5 祂已战胜众仇敌， 
 登上平安宝座； 
 祂的荣耀永无已， 
 配得赞美颂歌。 
 年日时代虽更改， 
 祂的约不废弃； 
 耶稣大名和祂爱， 
 永远长存无极。 
652 HAIL TO THE LORD’S ANOINTED
1 Hail to the Lord’s Anointed, 
 Great David’s greater Son! 
 Hail, in the time appointed, 
 His reign on earth begun! 
 He comes to break oppression, 
 To set the captive free; 
 To take away transgression, 
 And rule in equity. 
2 He shall come down like showers 
 Upon the fruitful earth; 
 And love, joy, hope, like flowers, 
 Spring in His path to birth: 
 Before Him on the mountains 
 Shall peace, the herald, go; 
 And righteousness, in fountains, 
 From hill to valley flow. 
3 Kings shall fall down before Him, 
 And gold and incense bring; 
 All nations shall adore Him, 
 His praise all people sing; 
 For He shall have dominion 
 O’er river, sea, and shore, 
 Far as the eagle’s pinion, 
 Or dove’s light wing can soar. 
4 To Him shall prayer unceasing 
 And daily vows ascend; 
 His kingdom still increasing, 
 A kingdom without end. 
 The mountain dews shall nourish 
 A seed in weakness sown, 
 Whose fruit shall spread and flourish, 
 And shake like Lebanon. 
5 O’er every foe victorious 
 He on His throne shall rest, 
 From age to age more glorious, 
 All-blessing and all-blest. 
 The tide of time shall never 
 His covenant remove; 
 His Name shall stand forever, 
 His changeless Name of Love.
653 快乐快乐新郎快来到
1 快乐，快乐，新郎快来到，  时候必不再延迟。
 不久那婚娶之晨临到， 
 我们欢乐唱新诗。 
和 哦，美妙日！哦，荣耀之晨！  当基督我爱来临， 
 我们器皿充满，灯都发光，  让我们迎接新郎。 
 快乐，快乐，新郎快来到，  时候必不再耽搁； 
 不久那婚娶之晨临到， 
 我们欢唱新诗歌。 
2 让我们赎回每寸光阴， 
 买更多贵重的油； 
 当夜半呼声响起时辰， 
 全人已被主浸透。 
3 哦，何等欢乐！我们豫备  等候基督来迎娶； 
 有福的赏赐，何等甜美！ 
 痛苦试炼不介意。 
4 哦，何等快乐，何等甘甜！  当那婚娶的一天； 
 与主一同作王一千年， 
 饱享羔羊的婚筵。 
653 REJOICE REJOICE OUR BRIDEGROOM’S  COMING
9.7.9.7. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 Rejoice! Rejoice! Our Bridegroom’s coming, 
 And the time will not be long 
 Before we hail that wedding morning 
 And lift up the glad new song. 
(C) Oh, wondrous day! Oh, glorious morning, 
 When the Christ we love shall come: 
 With vessels filled and lamps all burning 
 Let us welcome His return. 
 Rejoice! Rejoice! Our Bridegroom’s coming 
 And the time will not be long 
 Before we hail that wedding morning 
 And lift up the glad new song. 
2 Oh, let us now redeem each moment, 
 More the precious oil to buy, 
 And have our vessels filled with ointment 
 Ere we hear the midnight cry. 
3 Oh, what a joy it is preparing 
 For our wedding with the Lord, 
 E’en in the tribulations sharing 
 For the bliss of such reward! 
4 Oh, with what rapture and rejoicing 
 Shall the wedding day begin; 
 And then a thousand years of dining 
 At the marriage feast with Him!
654 耶稣要来奖赏祂的仆人
1 耶稣要来奖赏祂的仆人，  或早或晚时不定；
 会否祂来正逢我们坚忍，  我们的灯修光明？ 
和 我能否说，我是已经准备，  准备坦然见主面？ 
 会否祂来正逢我仍不睡，  仍然等候，直至祂显现？ 
2 若祂在一清晨回来结算，  一一指名传我们， 
 我们各人要将银子交还，  祂能否说”好，仆人？”  
3 主的委托，我们是否忠心？  我们是否尽所能？ 
 我们里面若无指责声音，  我们就必得高升。 
4 福哉人也！主来正逢儆醒，  就必与祂同作王； 
 当祂再临，或夜半或天明，  是否正逢我了望？ 
654 WHEN JESUS COMES TO REWARD HIS  SERVANTS
10.7.10.7. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 When Jesus comes to reward His servants, 
 Whether it be noon or night, 
 Faithful to Him will He find us watching, 
 With our lamps all trimmed and bright? 
(C) Oh, can we say we are ready, brother? 
 Ready for the soul’s bright home? 
 Say, will He find you and me still watching, 
 Waiting, waiting when the Lord shall come? 
2 If at the dawn of the early morning, 
 He shall call us one by one, 
 When to the Lord we restore our talents, 
 Will He answer thee? — “Well done!” 
3 Have we been true to the trust He left us? 
 Do we seek to do our best? 
 If in our hearts there is naught condemns us, 
 We shall have a glorious rest. 
4 Blessed are those whom the Lord finds watching,  In His glory they shall share; 
 If He shall come at the dawn or mid-night, 
 Will He find us watching there?
655 主快要来娶新妇
1 主快要来娶新妇，
 婚筵祂已备充足， 
 并供应洁白礼服要及时！  接受基督作生命， 
 借着受苦并受窘， 
 如此才能有义行要及时！ 
和 要及时！要及时！ 
 预备来赴主的婚筵，  要及时！ 
 若你否认魂生命， 
 并且学习跟随灵， 
 盛筵你才得有分 - 要及时！ 
2 主快要来召童女， 
 她们储油且有余， 
 但愚拙的未积蓄 - 要及时！  为储油要付代价， 
 甘心将己钉十架， 
 器皿内油天天加 - 要及时！ 
3 主快要来见仆人， 
 对忠心者赏福分， 
 懒惰仆人要受损 - 要及时！  你的才干全摆上， 
 己的难处都埋葬， 
 服事凭主所恩赏 - 要及时！ 
4 主快要来收庄稼， 
 将初熟果子割下， 
 未熟的就被留下 - 要及时！  属地水分当断绝， 
 世界娱乐当弃绝， 
 “死己”是成熟秘诀 - 要及时！ 
5 主来提接得胜者， 
 他们为主曾全舍， 
 “起初的爱”仍火热 - 要及时！  胜过所有的死沉， 
 与生命主永不分， 
向着标竿往前奔 - 要及时！ 
6 主来建立祂国度， 
 属天王权我渴慕， 
 让祂将你我征服 - 要及时！  叛逆的己须推翻， 
 该学功课莫迟延， 
 快让主作王掌权 - 要及时！ 
655 CHRIST COMES QUICKLY FOR HIS BRIDE
1 Christ comes quickly for His Bride, 
 Wedding feast He will provide, 
 Garments bright and pure supplied Dress in time!  Taking Christ as life she’s dressed, 
 By much suffering stitched and pressed; 
 Righteous acts are thus possessed Dress in time! 
(C) Be in time! Be in time! 
 For the marriage feast of Jesus 
 Be in time! 
 If your soul life you deny 
 And the Spirit you apply, 
 Then you’ll fully qualify — Be in time! 
2 Virgins Christ comes quickly for, 
 Those with oil an extra store,  
 Not the fools who oil ignore- Buy in time! 
 For the oil a price we pay, 
 Deal with self without delay, 
 Fill your vessels every day — Buy in time! 
3 For His servants Christ will come 
 And reward each faithful one; 
 Slothful ones will be undone — Serve in time! 
 Make your single talent count, 
 All self’s problems now surmount, 
 Serve with Christ, the living fount — Serve in time! 
4 Christ comes quickly for His grain, 
 Ripened firstfruits to obtain; 
 Unripe harvest will remain — Ripen now! 
 From earth’s water grain must dry, 
 From the world your soul deny; 
 To mature the self must die — Ripen now! 
5 Overcomers Christ will take, 
 Those who all for Him forsake, 
 Those who of first love partake — Win in time! 
 All the deadness overcome, 
 With the living Christ be one, 
 Toward the goal now swiftly run — Win in time! 
6 Christ comes for His kingdom too; 
 Heav’nly reign we must pursue, 
 Let His rule our self subdue — Yield in time! 
 Rebel self must be dethroned, 
 Lessons must not be postponed, 
 Quickly yield to Christ enthroned — Yield in time!
656 我们向神的信心必须要加增
1 我们向神的信心必须要加增，  显示我们从偶像已转向活神。  对主话说”阿们”是把信心调入，  并要在主话里一再转向基督。 
和 信心的工作要多多增加， 
 爱心的劳苦也需要丰满扩大，  祂成圣的工作在我里仍布开，  因盼望而忍耐，常儆醒到主来。 
2 让人从我们看见有弟兄相爱，  但我们的爱仍须增长并充塞。  主引导我们的心进入神的爱，  使我们能完备直等到主回来。 
3 我们的灵、魂、身体，要完全成圣，  信实的主就必要将新妇作成。  凡事我们若都肯阿们主引导，  我们就得预备来听主的呼召。 
4 祂要亲自来，  何等荣耀盼望！主阿，求你快来！  我们当时刻儆醒，见你在空中，  如同白昼之子，预备那日相逢。
656 OUR FAITH TO GOD-WARD MUST IN  THESE DAYS SPREAD ABROAD
12.12.12.12. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 Our faith to God-ward must in these days spread abroad  To show we’ve turned from idols to the living God.  We’ll mix His Word with faith by answering “Amen!”  And to Christ in the Word turn again and again. 
(C) Our work of faith must grow exceedingly, 
 The labor of our love increase abundantly, 
 His sanctifying work in us go on and on, 
 While in patience of hope we will watch till He come. 
2 The love for all the brothers, in our midst is found,  But in these days our love must increase and abound.  The Lord direct our hearts into the love of God  And prepare us in full for the day of the Lord. 
3 Our faithful Lord will do it to prepare His Bride,  While we amen His voice in matters great or small,  That we all may be ready to hear Jesus’ call.
4 Oh, what a glorious hope! Come quickly, Lord, Amen.  We’d ever watchful be to see Thee in the air  And as sons of the day for that meeting prepare.
657 我们来歌唱要掌权的王
1 我们来歌唱要掌权的王，  荣耀归耶稣，被杀的羔羊；  祂国度带来公义和平安，  喜乐遍全地，当耶稣为王。
和 同声歌唱：赞美我王，  耶稣为王，耶稣为王。  这首诗章属主的人爱唱：  荣耀归耶稣，我们的君王。 
2 万民要住在祂奇妙光中，  万族要归一于祂的爱中。  公平与真实出自祂王杖，  不法必终止，当耶稣为王。 
3 在祂国度里完全是和睦，  自由必旺盛，强暴被剪除，  化敌人为友，将祂歌同唱；  利剑变镰刀，当耶稣为王。 
4 认识神知识，将充满全地，  好像深水将海洋来淹蔽；  地上的万物必如春发旺，  一切全和谐，当耶稣为王。 
5 愿基督国度能早日来临，  晨光速露出，我们同欢欣。  当受造之物新歌同声唱，  撒但被摧毁，我耶稣为王！ 
657 SING WE THE KING WHO IS COMING TO  REIGN
10.10.10.10. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 Sing we the King who is coming to reign, 
 Glory to Jesus, the Lamb that was slain; 
 Righteousness, peace then His empire shall bring,  Joy to the nations when Jesus is King. 
(C) Come let us sing: Praise to our King, 
 Jesus our King, Jesus our King: 
 This is our song, who to Jesus belong: 
 Glory to Jesus, to Jesus our King. 
2 All men shall dwell in His marvelous light, 
 Races long severed His love shall unite, 
 Justice and truth from His scepter shall spring, 
 Wrong shall be ended when Jesus is King. 
3 All shall be well in His kingdom of peace, 
 Freedom shall flourish and wisdom increase, 
 Foe shall be friend when His triumph we sing, 
 Sword shall be sickle when Jesus is King. 
4 Knowledge and fear of the Lord then shall be 
 As the deep waters that cover the sea; 
 All things shall be in the splendor of spring 
 And all harmonious when Jesus is King. 
5 Kingdom of Christ, for thy coming we pray, 
 Hasten, O Father, the dawn of the day 
 When this new song Thy creation shall sing, 
 Satan is vanquished and Jesus is King.
658 看哪世上的国已成了我主基督的国
1 看哪！世上的国已成了我主基督的国！  众圣欢呼因祂作王，永永远远坐宝座！  千千万万立即回应，和声爆发同歌讴！  基督已经得胜！ 
和 得胜！得胜！阿利路亚！ 
 得胜！得胜！阿利路亚！ 
 得胜！得胜！阿利路亚！ 
 基督已经得胜！ 
2 那古蛇、大龙，就是魔鬼，已经被摔下去，  撒但和他的使者不能再迷惑设骗局，  我们颂赞之声如同雷鸣将主永高举。  基督已经得胜！ 
3 “救恩，能力，国度，并祂基督的权柄来到！  因那昼夜控告我们弟兄的已被摔倒，”   如今教会正在地上执行天上的宣告，  基督已经得胜！ 
4 我们胜过那控告者，因为宝血有功效，  借着口中的话，我们宣告：”一切都成了！”   我们虽至于死，魂生命也不爱惜计较。  基督已经得胜！ 
5 现在我们应当欢喜快乐向神归荣耀；羔羊婚娶 时候到了， 
 新妇也已豫备好，蒙了救恩， 
 穿上光明洁白的细麻义袍， 
 基督已经得胜！ 
6 魔鬼身在火湖，这是约翰目睹的事实，今后不 要怕它信口雌黄， 
 今后不要怕它信口雌黄，或造谣生事，  圣徒得胜之路是：大胆宣告它的判词！  基督已经得胜！ 
7 新耶路撒冷由天降！  基督新妇妆饰整齐模成基督的模样；  神人调和建造一起显出神荣耀形像，  基督已经得胜！
8 这是神在人间支搭帐幕，神人永同住，  神的圣洁、荣耀，从人身上完全的显出！  听哪！主在宣告：”都成了！”神已心满意足，  基督已经得胜！ 
和 阿利路亚！阿利路亚！ 
 阿利路亚！阿利路亚！ 
 阿利路亚！阿利路亚！ 
 基督已经得胜！ 
658 LO THE KINGDOM OF THE WORLD IS NOW  THE KINGDOM OF THE LORD
15.15.15.6. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 The victory is won!
(C) Vict’ry, vict’ry, Hallelujah! 
 Vict’ry, vict’ry, Hallelujah! 
 Vict’ry, vict’ry, Hallelujah! 
 The victory is won! 
2 The victory is won!
3 The victory is won!
4 all the glory to the Son!  The victory is won!
5 The victory is won!
6 The victory is won!
7 a perfect blend!  She’s the Bride, prepared, adorned for Christ — of all God’s work,  The end!
 The victory is won! 
8 It’s the tabernacle of our God, His dwelling place with men;  In His holiness and glory He’s expressed through all of them.  “It is done!” O brothers, see it! See the New Jerusalem!  The victory is won! 
(C) Hallelujah, hallelujah! 
 Hallelujah, hallelujah! 
 Hallelujah, hallelujah! 
 The victory is won!
659 圣城同救主是我们目标
1 圣城同救主是我们目标，  我们的永分，灿烂又荣耀；  我身虽在此，灵却已在彼，  深望与恩主立即在一起。  深望与恩主立即在一起。 
2 神圣的目标，新耶路撒冷，  乃是神为人豫备的圣城；  所有蒙宝血救赎的罪人，  都能有权利享受这福分。  都能有权利享受这福分。 
3 哦，那座圣城，我每一瞻仰，  我心渴想见恩主的面光；  巴不得早日听见祂呼声  得进入那城，永享祂丰盛。  得进入那城，永享祂丰盛。 
4 我荣耀盼望，  就是我永分，作我的奖赏。  就是我永分，作我的奖赏。
5 哦，求主耶稣！快照我心愿，  来接爱你者到你的面前！  在那圣城中享受你自己，  同住并同荣，永不再分离。  同住并同荣，永不再分离。 
6 那时的一切要更新完成，  新天并新地、新耶路撒冷！  神荣耀自己要作我永分；  主，愿你快来！与我永不分！  主，愿你快来！与我永不分！ 
659 OUR GOAL THE HOLY CITY WITH THE  LORD
10.10.10.10. WITH REPEAT 
The Hope of Glory 
1 the holy city with the Lord,
 It is our portion, ‘tis where He’s adored; 
 Although our bodies still are living here, 
 Our spirits with our glorious Lord are there. 
 Our spirits with our glorious Lord are there. 
 That holy city made for God with men; 
 For all redeemed, who have Thy pathway trod,  Shall have the right to share the bliss with God.  Shall have the right to share the bliss with God. 
3 And every time we toward that city gaze, 
 Then every time we long to see Thy face; 
 We long to hear the shout that calls to Thee, 
 With Thee to share Thy God eternally. 
 With Thee to share Thy God eternally. 
4 Our heart’s desire is not the peace so sweet, 
 Our longed for hope is not the joy we’ll meet;  But Thou Thyself, Thou art “our hope,” O Lord,  For ‘tis Thyself that will be our reward. 
 For ‘tis Thyself that will be our reward. 
5 O Jesus, Lord, we pray Thee hear our cry, Come!  Bring us to that city from on high! 
 That in that glory we may share with Thee, 
 Thy loving Self partake eternally . 
 Thy loving Self partake eternally . 
6 O Lord, Thou sayest, “I make all things new,”  New heav’ns, new earth, and all within them too!  Our God Himself our portion then shall be; 
 O Lord, come quickly! Take us up with Thee.  O Lord, come quickly! Take us up with Thee.
660 他等候一座城却住在帐棚
1 他等候一座城，却住在帐棚，  这天城的旅客，一直奔前程；  他有美好证据，前途实堪夸，  难怪他不寻求地上的荣华。 
和 家！家！甘美家！ 
 主耶稣在家等，要欢迎我们！ 
2 他等候一座城，他神的住处，  他没有，也不求地上的房屋；  因神岂非说过，属天的家乡，  是那不离正道旅客所安享。 
3 他等候一座城，虽然有时因  跋涉苦，丧失多，有叹息声音，  但一想到那城，就引声歌唱，  因为路虽崎岖，必定不会长。 
4 他等候一座城，我们今亦然：  望能在你城中，同你永为伴，  享受你的豫备，因此也愿意  以帐棚为寄庐，同你客此地。 
660 HE LOOKED FOR A CITY AND LIVED IN A  TENT
11.11.11.11. WITH CHORUS 
The Hope of Glory 
1 He looked for a city and lived in a tent, 
 A pilgrim to glory right onward he went; 
 God’s promise his solace, so royal his birth, 
 No wonder he sought not the glories of earth. 
(C) City! O city fair! 
 God’s dwelling with man to eternity is there. 
2 He looked for a city, his God should prepare; 
 No mansion on earth, could he covet or share, 
 For had not God told him, that royal abode 
 Awaited His pilgrims on ending the road. 
3 He looked for a city; if sometimes he sighed 
 To be trudging the road, all earth’s glory denied, 
 The thought of that city changed sighing to song,  For the road might be rough, but it could not be long. 
4 He looked for a city, his goal, Lord, we share 
 And know that bright city, which Thou dost prepare  Is ever our portion, since willing to be 
 Just pilgrims with Jesus, our roof a tent tree.
661 荣耀圣城必快降临
1 荣耀圣城必快降临，  神的话中早豫定；  祂要永远居住其中，  祂话既出不落空。  万古磐石为城根基，  稳固无人可摇移；  救恩为墙高大雄壮，  尽可嗤笑众仇敌。 
2 生命活水涌流不息，  源出永恒不变爱；  神的儿女享用不尽，  缺乏之惧永不再。  生命之河不断涌流，  有何干渴不能消？  何况我神丰厚恩典，  仍然赐给无终了！ 
3 借着救主宝血洗净，  组成有福的锡安；  圣徒作神祭司、君王，  因靠耶稣得完全。  提升祂所爱的子民，  身居荣位掌王权；  又作祭司神前侍立，  赞美为祭坛上献。 
4 主阿，因着圣城锡安，  藉恩我也居其间；  世人眼中我似可怜，  在你名里荣无边。  世上之乐我已淡薄，  一切虚荣成云烟；  只需有分锡安圣城，  喜乐价值真难言。 
661 GLORIOUS THINGS OF THEE ARE SPOKEN
1 Glorious things of thee are spoken, 
 Holy city of our God; 
 He whose word cannot be broken 
 Formed thee for His own abode; 
 On the Rock of Ages founded, 
 What can shake thy sure repose? 
 With salvation’s walls surrounded, 
 Thou may’st smile at all thy foes. 
2 See the streams of living waters, 
 Springing from eternal love, 
 Well supply thy blessed members, 
 And all fear of want remove; 
 Who can faint, when such a river 
 Ever flows their thirst t’ assuage? 
 Grace which, like the Lord, the giver, 
 Never fails from age to age. 
3 Blest constituents of Zion, 
 Washed in the Redeemer’s blood; 
 Jesus, whom their souls rely on, 
 Makes them kings and priests to God. 
 ‘Tis His love His people raises 
 Over self to reign as kings: 
 And as priests, His worthy praises, 
 Each his thankful offering brings. 
4 Savior, if of Zion’s city 
 I, through grace, a member am, 
 Let the world deride or pity —  
 I will glory in Thy name. 
 Fading is the worldling’s pleasure, 
 All his boasted pomp and show; 
 Solid joys and lasting treasure 
 None but Zion’s members know.
662 神为属祂的人所备荣耀
1 神为属祂的人所备荣耀，  并这世代末日将生何事，  实在无人能以领会、知晓；  但主在异象中早已启示：  教会从天降，美丽且荣耀，  光辉明亮有如碧玉宝石。 
2 主将使祂教会全然美丽，  如精金、珍珠，并闪亮宝石；  在圣洁里为王，荣耀无比，  所发光辉远胜天上星日；  祂将领祂新妇，祂心所喜，  同到父的座前颂扬不止。 
3 那时，神的众子都将会集，  那有福的交通将要来临；  在祂的大爱中相调为一，  各人显出他特出的光景，  都按照祂的智慧所定意，  正如这星荣光异于那星。 
4 在那日，神是一切的一切，  祂将是他们极大的奖赏；  是生命源，是美丽和喜悦，  主是他们的食物和荣光；  喜乐难言，惟用美妙音乐、  诗章来表达其中的欢畅。 
5 这是天上那永远的生命，  与基督一同藏在神里面，  祂所赐复活生命的显明：  是活水泉源，白给而丰满； 
 是胜过死亡权势的生命，  凭这生命，与基督同掌权。 
6 一切从这荒废的旷野起，  当人对基督有正确信仰，  儿子的灵使我们有生气，  接受祂作我们生命、亮光， 
 我们在祂眼中永远合一，  如葡萄树上的树枝一样。 
7 主耶稣，我们今求你快来，  在这旷野路上扶持我们，  你大爱引我们亲近你怀，  你是我们家园，哦，爱的神；  你里何安全，我们不离开，  你是我们住处、永远福分。 
662 HOW TRUE IT IS NO HEART MAY  COMPREHEND
1 How true it is no heart may comprehend  The glory God prepareth for His own, 
 And what will happen when this age shall end;  But yet in vision Jesus hath made known  How fair and holy shall the Church descend,  Lit up with light of precious jasper stone. 
2 And He shall make His Church all heavenly fair,  With-gold and pearls, and every radiant stone,  And reign in holiness and glory there, 
 And shine as suns and stars have never shone;  And He shall lead His Bride, His joy and care,  With blissful singing to His Father’s throne. 
3 And then the blest communion shall have come,  Of God’s dear children meeting from afar;  Within His burning love they blend as one,  Yet each, according as His counsels are,  Shall have peculiar glory of his own, 
 As one star differeth from another star. 
4 And God is all in all in that great day, 
 And He is their exceeding great Reward;  Their stream of life, their beautiful array,  Their food, their joy, their radiance, Christ the Lord;  The music of their wondrous song shall say,  How great the joy that passeth thought or word. 
5 And this is that eternal life of heaven,  
 Laid up with Christ in God, the’ mystery  Of resurrection life which He hath given:  A fount of living waters full and free; 
 A life by which the gates of death are riven,  A life which on the throne of Christ shall be. 
6 And here in this waste wilderness begun,  So soon as we believe in Christ aright, 
 And quickened by the Spirit of the Son, 
 Receive Him as our only life and light, 
 As all the branches in the vine are one, 
 So we are one forever in His sight. 
7 Now come, Lord Jesus, quickly from above,  Do Thou sustain us on the desert road, 
 And draw us after Thee by might of love,  Our Fatherland art Thou, O love of God;  Once safe in Thee, no more shall we remove,  O Thou our everlasting sure abode.
663 从神和羔羊的宝座
1 从神和羔羊的宝座，
 流出一道水河； 
 河水明亮如同水晶， 
 满有生命供应。 
 其中有生命树长着， 
 使神赎民欢乐； 
 饮此活泉苏醒人心， 
 喜乐涌流不尽。 
2 如此喜乐无法发表， 
 并且满了荣耀； 
 其中丰富可吃可喝， 
 世人未曾尝过。 
 眼未曾见、耳未曾闻，  人未曾历其境； 
 乃为属主者所保藏， 
 今已向我显彰。 
3 我觉你摸、我闻你言，  我尝你恩甘甜； 
 我魂跳跃、我心所羡，  亲眼看见你面！ 
 与众圣徒享你丰筵， 
 此乐长久不变； 
 喜乐之神赐恩何丰， 
 配得永远赞颂！ 
663 THERE IS A STREAM WHICH ISSUES  FORTH
1 There is a stream which issues forth 
 From God’s eternal throne 
 And from the Lamb, a living stream, 
 Clear as the crystal stone. 
 In it doth grow the tree of life, 
 It makes the ransomed sing: 
 Its living draught revives the heart; 
 Hence all the joys do spring. 
2 Such joys as are unspeakable, 
 And full of glory too; 
 Such splendid riches, meat and drink, 
 As worldlings do not know. 
 Eye hath not seen, nor ear hath heard, 
 For fancy ‘tis concealed, 
 What Thou, Lord, hast laid up for Thine 
 And hast to me revealed. 
3 I feel Thy touch, I hear Thy voice, 
 I taste Thy sweetest grace; 
 My soul doth leap: but, oh, that I 
 May see Thee face to face! 
 Then with the saints my soul shall feast 
 On joys that always last: 
 Blest be my God, the God of joy, 
 That gives here such a taste!
664 那日我神的宝贝
1 那日我神的宝贝， 
 不再藏于瓦器， 
 乃从变化的人中， 
 显出无遮美丽。 
2 藉那伟大的金器， 
 神的荣耀照亮； 
 不用日、月来光照， 
 因神自己作光。 
3 全城珍珠和宝石， 
 满了神的美丽； 
 光辉照耀如碧玉， 
 荣耀灿烂无比。 
4 在那伟大器皿中， 
 荣光永不黯淡， 
 明光丰满照四方， 
 驱尽地上黑暗。 
5 所有新造要看见， 
 在彼神光四布； 
 那个照耀的器皿， 
 乃是羔羊新妇。 
6 那个荣耀的金器， 
 令人向神敬拜， 
 神在荣中羔羊里， 
 显现直到万代。 
664 NO MORE IN EARTHEN VESSELS
1 No more in earthen vessels 
 God’s treasure then shall be, 
 But in unclouded beauty 
 Thou, Lord, wilt shine thru me. 
2 Afar thru that gold vessel 
 God’s glory shineth bright; 
 There’ll be no need of sunshine, 
 For God will be the light. 
3 With Christ, the Stone most precious, 
 God’s city shall be fair; 
 And He shall shine as jasper 
 In cloudless glow there: 
4 Undimmed in that great vessel, 
 The glory of that light, 
 Illum’ning with its fulness 
 The earth in radiance bright. 
5 All in His new creation 
 God’s glow there shall see; 
 The vessel for that shining 
 The Lamb’s own Bride shall be: 
6 A golden vessel glorious, 
 That all who see adore 
 God in the Lamb in glory 
 Expressed forevermore.
665 基督已经完成赎罪
1 基督已经完成赎罪， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 重价已付，我被赎回！ 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
和 何等奇妙的救主，是耶稣，我耶稣！  何等奇妙的救主，是耶稣，我主！ 
2 赞美祂血洗罪有效， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 使我这人与神和好， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
3 祂已洗净我的罪愆， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 今在我心作王掌权， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
4 时时刻刻与我亲近， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 天天保守使我忠心， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
5 得胜能力随时赐与， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 使我争战奏凯有余， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
6 我已向祂献上心身， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
 世界不再与我有分， 
 何等奇妙的救主！ 
665 CHRIST HAS A FULL REDEMPTION MADE
1 Christ has a full redemption made: 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
 We are redeemed! the price is paid: 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
(C) What a wonderful Savior is Jesus, my Savior; 
 What a wonderful Savior is Jesus, my Lord! 
2 I praise Him for the cleansing blood, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
 That reconciled my soul to God, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
3 He cleanses me from all my sin: 
 What a wonderful Savior!  
 And now He reigns and rules within; 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
4 He dwells within me day by day, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
 And keeps me faithful all the way, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
5 He gives me overcoming power, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
 And triumph in each conflict hour, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
6 To Him I’ve given all my heart, 
 What a wonderful Savior! 
 The world shall never share a part, 
 What a wonderful Savior!
666 耶稣我救主降生马槽中
1 耶稣，我救主，降生马槽中，  成”忧患之子，”来经历苦痛；  哦，这真希奇，值得我称颂！  祂来寻我，寻我！ 
和 祂来寻我，寻我！ 
 祂来寻我，寻我！’  
 哦，这真希奇，值得我称颂！  祂来寻我，寻我！ 
2 耶稣，我救主，在加略木上，  还我众罪债，将我人释放；  哦，这真希奇，怎么会这样？  祂死为我，为我！ 
和 祂死为我，为我！ 
 祂死为我，为我！ 
 哦，这真希奇，怎么会这样？  祂死为我，为我！ 
3 耶稣，我救主，永活不改变，  当我在流荡，将我来召唤；  虽遭我拒绝，仍召不间断，  祂来召我，召我！ 
和 祂来召我，召我！ 
 祂来召我，召我！ 
 虽遭我拒绝，仍召不间断，  祂来召我，召我！ 
4 耶稣，我救主，要来接选民，  这应许甜美，当年日飞奔：  哦，我要见祂从天上降临，  祂来接我，接我！ 
和 祂来接我，接我！ 
 祂来接我接我！ 
 哦，我要见祂从天上降临，  祂来接我，接我！ 
666 JESUS MY SAVIOR TO BETHLEHEM CAME
1 Jesus, my Savior, to Bethlehem came, 
 Laid in a manger to sorrow and shame; 
 O it was wonderful, blest be His name, 
 Seeking for me, for me: 
(C) Seeking for me, for me, 
 Seeking for me, for me; 
 O it was wonderful, blest be His name, 
 Seeking for me, for me. 
2 Jesus, my Savior, on Calvary’s tree 
 Paid the great debt, and my soul He set free; 
 O it was wonderful — how could it be? 
 Dying for me, for me! 
(C) Dying for me, for me! 
 Dying for me, for me! 
 O it was wonderful — how could it be? 
 Dying for me, for me! 
3 Jesus, my Savior, the same as of old, 
 While I was wand’ring afar from the fold, 
 Gently and long did He plead with my soul, 
 Calling for me, for me! 
(C) Calling for me, for me! 
 Calling for me, for me! 
 Gently and long did He plead with my soul, 
 Calling for me, for me! 
4 Jesus, my Savior, shall come from on high. 
 Sweet is the promise as weary years fly: 
 O I shall see Him descend from the sky, 
 Coming for me, for me! 
(C) Coming for me, for me! 
 Coming for me, for me! 
 O I shall see Him descend from the sky, 
 Coming for me, for me!
667 一日当天上充满赞美之声
1 一日，当天上充满赞美之声，  一日，当罪恶深染全人类，  耶稣就降世，为一童女所生，  住在人中间，显出神光辉！ 
和 降生，为爱我；受死，为救我；  埋葬，为带去我一切罪过；  复活，为白白的永远称义我：  一日，祂要来，哦，荣日接我！ 
2 一日，人将祂带到加略山上，  一日，人把祂钉木上剪除；  祂备尝痛苦，被神击打、压伤，  担当我罪过，作我救赎主！ 
3 一日，人撇祂独自在那园中，  一日，祂安息，不再有痛苦；  天使从天来，夜间守祂墓洞；  无望者之望，乃是我救主！ 
4 一日，那坟墓不能将祂留藏，  一日，那大石辊开不封堵；  祂已复活了，祂已胜过死亡，  升到高天上，永远作我王！ 
5 一日，号筒响，传报祂从天来，  一日，祂荣光满天都照出；  奇妙的日子，带来我的心爱；  荣耀的救主，就是我耶稣！ 
667 ONE DAY WHEN HEAVEN WAS FILLED  WITH HIS PRAISES
11.10.11.10. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 One day when heaven was filled with His praises,  One day when sin was as black as could be, 
 Jesus came forth to be born of a virgin —  
 Dwelt among men, my example is He! 
(C) Living, He loved me; dying, He saved me; 
 Buried, He carried my sins far away; 
 Rising, He justified freely forever: 
 One day He’s coming — O glorious day! 
2 One day they led Him up Calvary’s mountain,  One day they nailed Him to die on the tree; 
 Suffering anguish, despised and rejected; 
 Bearing our sins, my Redeemer is He. 
3 One day they left Him alone in the garden, 
 One day He rested, from suffering free; 
 Angels came down o’er His tomb to keep vigil;  Hope of the hopeless, my Savior is He. 
4 One day the grave could Conceal Him no longer,  One day the stone rolled away from the door; 
 Then He arose, over death He had conquered; 
 Now is ascended, my Lord evermore. 
5 One day the trumpet will sound for His coming,  One day the skies with His glory will shine; 
 Wonderful day, my beloved ones bringing; 
 Glorious Savior, this Jesus is mine!
668 至大医生可亲可近
1 至大医生可亲可近，  就是同情的耶稣，  能医罪伤，能解忧困，  请你速来就耶稣。 
和 祂为你受死木上，  祂将你众罪担当，  祂寻你前来医伤，  速来就这耶稣。 
2 你罪虽多，必蒙宽恕，  只要肯来就耶稣！  通神之路，畅通无阻，  因耶稣成功救赎。 
3 我已得着医治、释放，  因我接受主耶稣；  荣耀归给被杀羔羊，  我今相信主耶稣。 
和 我得释，因祂被绑；  我得医，因祂受伤；  我得生，因祂命亡；  我已得着耶稣。 
4 我爱救我恩主之名，  我爱之名是耶稣！  这名驱尽我的苦情，  宝贝之名惟耶稣！ 
和 馨香名，圣徒爱唱！  尊贵名，天使颂扬！  高超名，万名之上！  耶稣！宝贝耶稣！ 
668 THE GREAT PHYSICIAN NOW IS NEAR
1 The Great Physician now is near, 
 The sympathizing Jesus; 
 He speaks the drooping heart to cheer, 
 Oh, hear the voice of Jesus! 
(C) Sweetest note in seraph song; 
 Sweetest name on mortal tongue; 
 Sweetest carol ever sung: 
 Jesus, blessed Jesus! 
2 Your many sins are all forgiv’n, 
 Oh, hear the voice of Jesus; 
 The veil ‘twixt you and God is riven, 
 Redemption wrought by Jesus. 
3 All glory to the dying Lamb! 
 I now believe in Jesus; 
 I love the blessed Savior’s name, 
 I love the name of Jesus. 
4 His name dispels my guilt and fear, 
 No other name but Jesus; 
 Oh, how my soul delights to hear 
 The precious name of Jesus! 
(C) 
669 大喜信我已听见
1 大喜信我已听见：  主救人！主救人！  这佳音务要传遍：  主救人！主救人！  去天下中外人间，  不要顾路途艰险，  遵主命到处宣传：  主救人！主救人！ 
2 去通知贫富家门：  主救人！主救人！  去告诉大小罪人：  主救人！主救人！  众海岛应当歌唱，  众深海也当应响，  全地上都当宣扬：  主救人！主救人！ 
3 十字架已经宣告：  主救人！主救人！  宝贵血仍在说道：  主救人！主救人！  主受死使人免惩，  主复活使人得生，  主升天使人高升，  主救人！主救人！ 
4 这福音仍要传报：  主救人！主救人！  世上人都该知晓：  主救人！主救人！  神恩丰，广赐众人； 
 人罪深，也能蒙恩；  我声微，仍要诵吟：  主救人！主救人！ 
669 WE HAVE HEARD THE JOYFUL SOUND
1 We have heard the joyful sound: 
 Jesus saves! Jesus saves! 
 Spread the tidings all around: 
 Jesus saves! Jesus saves! 
 Bear the news to every land, 
 Climb the steeps and cross the waves; 
 Onward! — ‘tis our Lord’s command; 
 Jesus saves! Jesus saves! 
2 Waft it on the rolling tide, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 Tell to sinners far and wide, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 Sing, ye islands of the sea, 
 Echo back, ye ocean caves; 
 Earth shall keep her jubilee, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves. 
3 Sing above the battle’s strife, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 By His death and endless life, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 Sing it softly thru the 
 When the heart for mercy craves, 
 Sing in triumph o’er the tomb, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves. 
4 Give the winds a mighty voice, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 Let the nations now rejoice. 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves; 
 Shout salvation full and free, 
 Highest hills and deepest’ caves, 
 This our song of victory, 
 Jesus saves, Jesus saves.
670 这个荣耀信息何甜
1 这个荣耀信息何甜， 
 相信要简单： 
 昨日、今日、直到永远，  耶稣不改变。 
 祂仍喜爱拯救罪人， 
 医治人疾病， 
 平静风浪，安抚惊魂；  荣耀归祂名！ 
和 昨日、今日、直到永远，  耶稣不改变！ 
 万事、万物都在改变，  耶稣不改变！ 
 耶稣不改变， 
 耶稣不改变； 
 万事、万物都在改变，  耶稣不改变！ 
2 耶稣乃是罪人之友， 
 祂今寻找你； 
 到祂脚前认罪、祈求，  祂必不丢弃； 
 祂必对你说出恩言， 
 像祂在当年 
 曾对人说： 
 “你罪赦免，可平安向前。” 
3 当祂在世，曾医病痛，  用祂大能手； 
 今仍施医，与昔相同，  祂话要接受。 
 医治之能曾经显在 
 一妇的一摸； 
 今向信心，此能不改，  要显同样多。 
4 像祂前曾与人同行， 
 去以马忤斯； 
 照样祂在我的一生， 
 与我永偕止。 
 不久我就要再见祂， 
 因祂必快来！ 
 但祂必定一点不差， 
 像当日离开。 
670 O HOW SWEET THE GLORIOUS MESSAGE
1 O how sweet the glorious message, 
 Simple faith may claim; 
 Yesterday, today, forever, 
 Jesus is the same. 
 Still He loves to save the sinful, 
 Heal the sick and lame; 
 Cheer the mourner, still the tempest; 
 Glory to His name! 
(C) Yesterday, today, forever, 
 Jesus is the same, 
 All may change, but Jesus never! 
 Glory to His name, 
 Glory to His name, 
 Glory to His name; 
 All may change, but Jesus never! 
 Glory to His name. 
2 He who was the friend of sinners, 
 Seeks thee, lost one, now; 
 Sinner, come, and at His footstool, 
 Penitently bow. 
 He who said, “I’ll not condemn thee, 
 Go and sin no more,” 
 Speaks to thee that word of pardon, 
 As in days of yore. 
3 Oft on earth He healed the suff’rer, 
 By His mighty hand; 
 Still our sicknesses and sorrows, 
 Go at His command. 
 He who gave His healing virtue, 
 To a woman’s touch; 
 To the faith that claims His fulness, 
 Still will give as much. 
4 As of old He walked to Emmaus, 
 With them to abide; 
 So through all life’s way He walketh, 
 Ever near our side. 
 Soon again we shall behold Him, 
 Hasten, Lord, the day! 
 But ‘twill still be “this same Jesus,” 
 As He went away.
671 哦爱奇妙之爱救主去加略
1 哦，爱！奇妙之爱，救主去加略！  为去那地，祂竟离宝座， 
 去受贫穷、苦楚，遭患从未却，  一路艰难全是为着我！ 
和 祂去加略，一路劝是为着我，  是为着我，是为着我； 
 祂去加略，一路劝是为着我，  祂去将我救活！ 
2 可怜！战兢罪人原不懂恩典！  今在加略见祂肋被戳， 
 并闻：“我血流出，为你买赦免，”  才知祂死是为救赎我！ 
和 祂在十架流血，是为救赎我，  为救赎我，为救赎我； 
 祂在十架流血，是为救赎我，  流血免我灾祸！ 
3 阿呀！遍地黑暗，神来审判祂！  圣洁怒气焚烧如烈火， 
 因祂替我担罪，公义将祂杀，  祂受刑罚，乃是代替我！ 
和 祂在十架受死，乃是代替我，  是代替我，是代替我； 
 祂在十架受死，乃是代替我，  祂死担我罪过！ 
671 OH HOW DARK THE NIGHT THAT WRAPT  MY SPIRIT ROUND
11.9.11.9. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Oh, how dark the night that wrapt my spirit round!  Oh, how deep the woe my Savior found 
 When He walked across the waters of my soul, 
 Bade my night disperse and made me whole! 
(C) All the way to Calvary He went for me, 
 He went for me, He went for me; 
 All the way to Calvary He went for me, 
 He died to set me free. 
2 Tremblingly a sinner bowed before His face, 
 Naught I knew of pardon, God’s free grace; 
 Heard a voice so melting, “Cease thy wild regret,  Jesus bought thy pardon, paid thy debt.” 
3 O ‘twas wondrous love the Savior showed for me!  When He left His throne for Calvary, 
 When He bore my trespass, bore it all alone; 
 Praise His Name forever, make it known. 
672 我听救主声音
1 我听救主声音，  说我能力薄弱，  若非诚心相信，  不能免去罪过。
和 我欠千万金，  主替我还清；  一生犯罪真苦辛，  主今赦免、怜悯。 
2 主，我今才看明，  惟你有这力量，  能洗污秽洁净，  使软弱变刚强。 
3 我真没有善良，  可以得主救恩；  但主特别体谅，  用爱救我罪人。 
4 将来立在神前，  神必不再追问；  因主为我亏欠，  已经流血受审。 
672 I HEAR THE SAVIOR SAY
1 I hear the Savior say, 
 “Thy strength indeed is small,  Child of weakness, watch and pray,  Find in Me thine all in all.” 
(C) Jesus paid it all, 
 All to Him I owe; 
 Sin had left a crimson stain, 
 He washed it white as snow. 
2 Lord, now indeed I find 
 Thy pow’r, and Thine alone, 
 Can change the leper’s spots, 
 And melt the heart of stone. 
3 For nothing good have I 
 Whereby Thy grace to claim —   I’ll wash my garments white 
 In the blood of Calv’ry’s Lamb. 
4 And when, before the throne, 
 I stand in Him complete, 
 “Jesus died my soul to save,” 
 My lips shall still repeat.

673 哎呀救主真曾流血
1 哎呀！救主真曾流血？ 
 真曾舍命亡躬？ 
 祂肯牺牲祂的超越， 
 为我这个小虫？ 
和 在十架，在十架，我看见主恩光，  罪重担从我身全卸脱！ 
 在十架，我因信，眼明亮，心平康，  我终日能欢乐！ 
2 祂在木上那样哀叹， 
 可是为我罪愆？ 
 怜悯何满！慈爱何泛！ 
 恩典何其无边！ 
3 难怪太阳立变暗乌， 
 隐藏一切荣光； 
 当神基督造物的主， 
 为人担罪而亡。 
4 当我看见祂十字架， 
 也当隐藏羞脸； 
 心当溶化，发出感嗟， 
 眼当流类自贬。 
5 但这满腔忧伤 
 不能稍还主爱的债； 
 主，我在此奉上一生， 
 聊表此心感戴。 
673 ALAS AND DID MY SAVIOR BLEED
1 Alas, and did my Savior bleed? 
 And did my Sovereign die? 
 Would He devote that sacred head 
 For such a worm as I? 
(C) At the cross, at the cross where I first saw the light,  And the burden of my heart rolled away,  It was there by faith I received my sight,  And now I am happy all the day! 
2 Was it for sins that I had done 
 He groaned upon the tree? 
 Amazing pity! grace unknown! 
 And love beyond degree! 
3 Well might the sun in darkness hide, 
 And shut His glories in, 
 When Christ, the mighty Maker, died 
 For man, His creature’s sin. 
4 Thus might I hide my blushing face 
 While His dear cross appears. 
 Dissolve my heart in thankfulness, 
 And melt mine eyes to tears. 
5 But drops of grief can ne’er repay 
 The debt of love I owe; 
 Here, Lord, I give myself away, 
 ‘Tis all that I can do.
674 我为什么忧惧疑惑
1 我为什么忧惧、疑惑？  神岂未曾将我罪过  归祂儿子身上？ 
 主所为我还清的债，  公义的神能否再来  要我重新清偿？ 
2 我们所有罪戾；
 神的忿怒不能威胁，  因我已经洒上宝血，  靠恩已经称义。 
3 罪债一起清算；
 神就不会两面讨债：  先在我的中保身上….   后又要我归还。 
4 我的心哪，应当安息，  你的救主所有功绩，  已使你得开释； 
 当信祂的有效宝血，  不怕神再将你弃绝，  因主已为你死。 
674 WHY SHOULD I WORRY DOUBT AND FEAR
1 Why should I worry, doubt and fear? 
 Has God not caused His Son to bear 
 My sins upon the tree? 
 The debt that Christ for me has paid, 
 Would God another mind have made 
 To claim again from me? 
2 Redemption full the Lord has made, 
 And all my debts has fully paid, 
 From law to set me free. 
 I fear not for the wrath of God, 
 For I’ve been sprinkled with His blood, 
 It wholly covers me. 
3 For me forgiveness He has gained,  
 And full acquittal was obtained, 
 All debts of sin are paid; 
 God would not have His claim on two, 
 First on His Son, my Surety true, 
 And then upon me laid. 
4 So now I have full peace and rest, 
 My Savior Christ hath done the best 
 And set me wholly free; 
 By His all-efficacious blood 
 I ne’er could be condemned by God, 
 For He has died for me!
675 我重担已卸哦何等有福 特.
1 我重担已卸，哦，何等有福！  耶稣曾流血，使我蒙救赎；  我前曾堕落，心不安宁；  今主已救我，永欢欣。 
和 一定永定，当相信、接受！  一定永定，莫疑惑、心忧；  靠近主十架，罪担得脱；  主今来救拔，何稳妥！ 
2 在十字架上，负你罪重担；  救主的额上，为你戴荆冕。  免你为罪愆心里战兢，  既蒙主赦免，永欢欣。 
3 耶稣已豫备。  “到我这里来，”主在等待；  救主的大爱，永不改。
4 莫踌躇不前，听荣耀呼召；  救主的恩典，使你不失脚。  答应祂呼召，出死入生；  主救恩可靠，恩何深。 
675 FREE FROM THE LAW OH HAPPY  CONDITION
1 IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
The Gospel 
1 oh, happy condition!  Jesus hath bled, and there is remission;
 Cursed by the law and bruised by the fall,  Christ hath redeemed us once for all. 
(C) Once for all — oh, sinner, receive it; 
 Once for all — oh, doubter, believe it;  Cling to the cross, the burden will fall,  Christ hath redeemed us once for all. 
2 There on the cross your burden upbearing,  Thorns on His brow your Savior is wearing;  Never again your sin need appall, 
 You have been pardoned once for all. 
3 there’s no condemnation;  Jesus provides a perfect salvation:
 “Come unto Me,” oh, hear His sweet call,  Come, and He saves us once for all. 
4 oh, glorious calling,  Surely His grace will keep us from falling;  Passing from death to life at His call,
 Blessed salvation once for all.
676 罪人无论大小善
1 罪人，无论大、小善， 
 尽都是无益； 
 耶稣早就已作成， 
 无需你功绩。 
和 “成了！成了！”真成了，  无需你功劳； 
 救主既说已成了， 
 罪人当信靠！ 
2 基督从荣耀宝座， 
 降世来工作； 
 十架上完成救赎， 
 请听祂喊说： 
3 劳苦担重担的人， 
 为何仍劳苦？ 
 救主工作早完成， 
 信祂可得福。 
4 你要以简单的信， 
 信靠神儿子； 
 不能靠“修行”得生， 
 “修行”反致死。 
5 荣耀的完全！
676 NOTHING EITHER GREAT OR SMALL
1 Nothing either great or small —  
 Nothing, sinner, no; 
 Jesus did it, did it all, 
 Long, long ago. 
(C) “It is finished!” yes, indeed, 
 Finished every jot: 
 Sinner, this is all you need —  
 Tell me, is it not? 
2 When He, from His lofty throne, 
 Stooped to do and die, 
 Everything was fully done; 
 Hearken to His cry: 
3 Weary, working, burdened one, 
 Wherefore toil you so? 
 Cease your doing; all was done 
 Long, long ago. 
4 Till to Jesus’ work you cling 
 By a simple faith, 
 “Doing” is a deadly thing —  
 “Doing” ends in death. 
5 Down at Jesus’ feet;  Stand in Him, in Him alone, Gloriously complete.
677 耶稣我救主作神羔羊
1 耶稣我救主，作神羔羊，  为罪人受死，罪债清偿；  将祂的宝血洒你身上，  神必越过你，你免灭亡。 
和 我一见这血， 
 我一见这血， 
 我一见这血， 
 我就必越过你，不毁灭！ 
2 罪中的罪魁，耶稣肯救，  凡祂所应许，祂必成就；  在祂这血下，虽有愆尤，  神必越过你，你得宽宥。 
3 审判要来到，无人能避；  在神公义前，谁能站立？  惟有让祂血将你掩蔽，  神必越过你，你得称义。 
4 哦，怜悯何大！哦，爱无边！  哦，神圣恩典，丰盛、甘甜！  在血荫蔽下享受平安，  神必越过你，你要颂赞！ 
677 CHRIST OUR REDEEMER DIED ON THE  CROSS
9.9.9.9. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Christ our Redeemer died on the cross, 
 Died for the sinner, paid all his due; 
 Sprinkle your soul with the blood of the Lamb,  “And I will pass, will pass over you.” 
(C) “When I see the blood, 
 When I see the blood, 
 When I see the blood, 
 I will pass, I will pass over you.” 
2 Chiefest of sinners, Jesus will save; 
 All He has promised, that will He do; 
 Wash in the fountain opened for sin, 
 “And I will pass, will pass over you.” 
3 Judgment is coming, all will be there, 
 Each one receiving justly his due; 
 Hide in the saving, sin-cleansing blood, 
 “And I will pass, will pass over you.” 
4 O great compassion! O boundless love! 
 O loving kindness, faithful and true! 
 Find peace and shelter under the blood, 
 “And I will pass, will pass over you.”
678 今有一泉血流盈满
1 今有一泉，血流盈满，  涌自耶稣肋边； 
 罪人只要投身此泉，  立去全身罪愆。 
 立去全身罪愆， 
 立去全身罪愆， 
 罪人只要一投此泉，  立去全身罪愆。 
2 当日与主同钉一盗，  曾见此泉功效； 
 我罪即使不比他少，  在此必能除掉。 
 在此必能除掉。 
 在此必能除掉。 
 我罪即使不比他少，  在此必能除掉。 
3 被杀羔羊，你的宝血，  权能永不消减， 
 要将选民都洗清洁，  永远与罪隔绝。 
 永远与罪隔绝。 
 永远与罪隔绝。 
 要将选民都洗清洁，  永远与罪隔绝。 
4 自从我见此全之开，  乃因你身受害， 
 我便颂扬救赎大爱，  颂扬至死不迨。 
 颂扬至死不迨。 
 颂扬至死不迨。 
 我便颂扬救赎大爱，  颂扬至死不迨。 
5 等到离世，拙口闭封，  笨舌墓中寂静， 
 我要发出复活歌声，  赞你救赎大能。 
 赞你救赎大能。 
 赞你救赎大能。 
 我要发出复活歌声，  赞你救赎大能。 
678 THERE IS A FOUNTAIN FILLED WITH  BLOOD
8.6.8.6. WITH REPEAT 
The Gospel 
1 There is a fountain filled with blood 
 Drawn from Immanuel’s veins; 
 And sinners, plunged beneath that flood, 
 Lose all their guilty stains: 
 Lose all their guilty stains, 
 Lose all their guilty stains; 
 And sinners, plunged beneath that flood, 
 Lose all their guilty stains. 
2 The dying thief rejoiced to see 
 That fountain in his day; 
 And there may I, though vile as he, 
 Wash all my sins away. 
 Wash all my sins away. 
 Wash all my sins away. 
 And there may I, though vile as he, 
 Wash all my sins away. 
3 Dear dying Lamb, Thy precious blood 
 Shall never lose its power, 
 Till all the ransomed ones of God 
 Be saved to sin no more. 
 Be saved to sin no more. 
 Be saved to sin no more. 
 Till all the ransomed ones of God 
 Be saved to sin no more. 
4 E’er since by faith I saw the stream 
 Thy flowing wounds supply, 
 Redeeming love has been my theme, 
 And shall be till I die. 
 And shall be till I die. 
 And shall be till I die. 
 Redeeming love has been my theme, 
 And shall be till I die. 
5 When this poor lisping, stammering tongue 
 Lies silent in the grave, 
 Then in a nobler, sweeter song, 
 I’ll sing Thy power to save. 
 I’ll sing Thy power to save. 
 I’ll sing Thy power to save. 
 Then in a nobler, sweeter song, 
 I’ll sing Thy power to save.
679 曾否就主求祂洗净你罪愆
1 曾否就主，求祂洗净你罪愆？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？  曾否信主，接祂进入你心间？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？ 
和 曾否在羔羊血， 
 在羔羊有能血洗清洁？  你的衣裳是否洁白犹如雪？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？ 
2 曾否蒙主赐你赦罪的恩典？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？  曾否因主替你受死而心安？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？ 
3 当主来时，你的衣裳是否白？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？  荣耀冠冕，你的头额配否戴？  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？ 
4 加略泉源为着罪人正流淌，  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？  污秽衣裳，不该还留在身上！  曾否在羔羊血洗清洁？ 
679 HAVE YOU BEEN TO JESUS FOR THE  CLEANSING POW’R
11.9.11.9. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Have you been to Jesus for the cleansing pow’r?  Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
 Are you fully trusting in His grace this hour?  Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
(C) Are you washed in the blood, 
 In the soul-cleansing blood of the Lamb? 
 Are your garments spotless? Are they white as snow?  Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
2 Are you walking daily by the Savior’s side?  Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
 Do you rest each moment in the Crucified? 
 Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
3 When the Bridegroom cometh will your robes be white?  Are you washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
 Will your soul be ready for His presence bright,  And be washed in the blood of the Lamb? 
4 Lay aside the garments that are stained with sin,  And be washed in the blood of the Lamb; 
 There’s a fountain flowing for the soul unclean,  O be washed in the blood of the Lamb.
680 何能洗去我污点
1 何能洗去我污点？  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！  何能恢复我完全？  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！ 
和 哦，这血泉何妙！  洗我如雪白皎！ 
 别泉无此功效： 
 无他，惟有耶稣宝血！ 
2 要得清洁，我认定，  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！  要得赦免，我能凭，  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！ 
3 无他，惟有耶稣宝血！
4 我的圣洁和公义，  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！  我的盼望和安息，  无他，惟有耶稣宝血！ 
680 WHAT CAN WASH AWAY MY SIN
1 What can wash away my sin? 
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus; 
 What can make me whole again? 
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus. 
(C) Oh! precious is the flow 
 That makes me white as snow; 
 No other fount I know, 
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus. 
2 For my cleansing this I see —  
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus! 
 For my pardon this my plea —  
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus! 
3 Nothing can my sin erase —  
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus! 
 Naught of works, ‘tis all of grace 
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus! 
4 This is all my hope and peace —  
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus! 
 This is all my righteousness —  
 Nothing but the blood of Jesus!
681 你愿脱离良心的重担么
1 你愿脱离良心的重担么？  权能是在血，权能在血；  你愿免去公义的审判么？  奇妙的权能是在血。 
和 有权能！能！奇妙大权能，  在羔羊之宝血 
 有权能！能！奇妙大权能，  在圣洁羔羊之宝血 
2 你愿脱掉罪恶的羞愧么？  权能是在血，权能在血；  你愿去掉情欲的污秽么？  奇妙的权能是在血。 
3 你愿洁白犹如雪一般么？  权能是在血，权能在血；  你愿成圣好像主完全么？  奇妙的权能是在血。 
4 你愿得着完全的救恩么？  权能是在血，权能在血；  你愿享受永生的福分么？  奇妙的权能是在血。 
681 WOULD YOU BE FREE FROM YOUR  BURDEN OF SIN
10.9.10.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Would you be free from your burden of sin?  There’s power in the blood, power in the blood;  Would you o’er evil a victory win? 
 There’s wonderful power in the blood. 
(C) There is power, power, wonder-working power,  In the blood of the Lamb; 
 There is power, power, wonder-working power,  In the precious blood of the Lamb. 
2 Would you be free from your passion and pride?  There’s power in the blood, power in the blood;  for a cleansing to Calvary’s tide, 
 There’s wonderful power in the blood. 
3 Would you be whiter, much whiter than snow?  There’s power in the blood, power in the blood;  Sin-stains are lost in its life-giving flow, 
 There’s wonderful power in the blood. 
4 Would you do service for Jesus your. King?  There’s power in the blood, power in the blood;  Would you live daily His praises to sing? 
 There’s wonderful power in the blood.
682 我今看见洗罪泉源
1 我今看见洗罪泉源，  其流既深且广； 
 耶稣我主，能施救援，  示我以祂肋旁。 
和 洗罪之泉，我已看见；  一投此泉，我就得洁！  哦，赞美主，洗我罪愆！  是的，这泉使我得洁。 
2 我今看见救主复活，  宝血向我述说； 
 宝血发声！我灵惊愕！  我藉此泉得活。 
3 我今起来，行神光中，  远离罪恶之疆； 
 心被更新，衣裳洁净，  主在我心作王。 
682 O NOW I SEE THE CLEANSING WAVE
1 O now I see the cleansing wave! 
 The fountain deep and wide; 
 Jesus, my Lord, mighty to save, 
 Points to His wounded side. 
(C) The cleansing stream I see, I see; 
 I plunge, and O it cleanseth me! 
 O praise the Lord it cleanseth me! 
 It cleanseth me, yes, cleanseth me. 
2 I see the dear Redeemer raised, 
 I hear the speaking blood; 
 It speaks! My spirit is amazed! 
 And quickened by its flood. 
3 I rise to walk in God’s own light 
 Above the world and sin, 
 With heart renewed and garments white 
 And Christ enthroned within.
683 耶稣宝血珍贵无比
1 耶稣宝血，珍贵无比，  流于髑髅地！ 
 是为罪人、叛逆， 
 为我，也为你！ 
和 耶稣宝血已经流出，  在那髑髅地！ 
 相信！接受！宝血为我，  也为你！ 
2 耶稣宝血，权能无比，  使你得称义； 
 罪恶、过犯，血全清洗，  是为你！ 
3 你罪虽然深如朱红，  无法得清洁； 
 耶稣宝血却能洗净，  白如雪！ 
4 耶稣宝血，贵重代价，  赎我回神前； 
 完全赦免，心无亏欠，  全平安！ 
5 坦然无惧，来到神前，  因血得赦免； 
 宝血之泉，洗我良心，  无亏欠！ 
6 耶稣宝血是我倚靠，  战胜众仇敌； 
 打退撒但，消灭罪恶，  有能力！ 
7 耶稣宝血，完全救恩，  与神永相亲； 
 荣耀之路，明光照耀，  赞美神！ 
683 PRECIOUS PRECIOUS BLOOD OF JESUS
1 Precious, precious blood of Jesus, 
 Shed on Calvary; 
 Shed for rebels, shed for sinners, 
 Shed for thee. 
(C) Precious, precious blood of Jesus 
 Ever flowing free; 
 Oh, believe it; Oh, receive it, 
 ‘Tis for thee. 
2 Precious, precious blood of Jesus, 
 Let it make thee whole; 
 Let it flow in mighty cleansing, 
 O’er thy soul. 
3 Though thy sins are red like crimson, 
 Deep in scarlet glow, 
 Jesus’ precious blood shall wash thee, 
 White as snow. 
4 Precious blood that hath redeemed us! 
 All the price is paid; 
 Perfect pardon now is offered, 
 Peace is made. 
5 Now the holiest with boldness 
 We may enter in; 
 For the open fountain cleanseth 
 From all sin. 
6 Precious blood, by this we conquer 
 In the fiercest fight, 
 Sin and Satan overcoming 
 By its might. 
7 Precious blood whose full redemption 
 Makes us nigh to God; 
 Precious blood, our way of glory, 
 Praise and laud.
684 祂是超乎万人之上
1 祂是超乎万人之上，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 比诸兄弟更密、更强，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 地上朋友时常离我，  今日慰我，明日忌我，  但这朋友从不欺我，  哦，祂的爱！ 
2 我今享受喜乐、安康，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 都亏我主罪债代偿，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 祂流宝血，祂买了我，  祂来旷野，祂寻找我，  同归羊群，祂领导我，  哦，祂的爱！ 
3 耶稣乃是我们朋友，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 祂赐福气，祂赐恩佑，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 我心欣幸能瞻仰祂，  叫我安居常亲近祂，  我怎可以再顶撞祂，  哦，祂的爱！ 
4 因祂的名我得赦免，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 在仇敌前为我设筵，  哦，祂的爱！ 
 祂使最好福分临我，  祂禁旨外祸害侵我，  直到荣耀，祂在引我，  哦，祂的爱！ 
684 ONE THERE IS ABOVE ALL OTHERS
1 One there is above all others, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 His is love beyond a brother’s, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Earthly friends may fail or leave us, 
 One day soothe, the next day grieve us; 
 But this Friend will ne’er deceive us: 
 Oh, how He loves! 
2 ‘Tis eternal life to know Him, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Think, oh, think how much we owe Him, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 With His precious blood He bought us, 
 In the wilderness He sought us, 
 To His flock He safely brought us: 
 Oh, how He loves! 
3 Blessed Jesus! would you know Him? 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Give yourselves entirely to Him, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Think no longer of the morrow, 
 From the past new courage borrow, 
 Jesus carries all your sorrow: 
 Oh, how He loves!  
4 All your sins shall be forgiven, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Backward shall your foes be driven, 
 Oh, how He loves! 
 Best of blessings He’ll provide you, 
 Nought but good shall e’er betide you, 
 Safe to glory He will guide you: 
 Oh, how He loves!
685 来让我们唱那奇妙大爱
1 来！让我们唱那奇妙大爱，  真切、柔细； 
 这爱流自天上父的心怀， 
 浸润我，也浸润你： 
 奇妙大爱， 
 原本藏在天上父的心怀。 
2 救主耶稣，为宣告此恩言，  欢然临世； 
 来住在无助、无望者中间，  担其忧患与羞耻， 
 为寻迷羊，付宝贵代价， 
 救人免灭亡。 
3 耶稣仍在寻找失迷的人， 
 为何流荡？ 
 祂正等着赦免，不留罪痕，  回家罢！莫再流荡。 
 奇妙大爱， 
 原本藏在天父的心怀。 
4 哦，奇妙大爱，请进到我心，  来此永住； 
 拔高我生命，直至我能胜过骄傲、  虚谎、嫉妒； 
 并且像你那样低微、 
 谦卑、真切、柔细。 
685 COME LET US SING OF A WONDERFUL  LOVE
1 Come let us sing of a wonderful love, 
 Tender and true; 
 Out of the heart of the Father above, 
 Streaming to me and to you: 
 Wonderful love 
 Dwells in the heart of the Father above. 
2 Jesus, the Savior, this gospel to tell, 
 Joyfully came; 
 Came with the helpless and hopeless to dwell,  Sharing their sorrow and shame; 
 Seeking the lost, 
 Saving, redeeming at measureless cost. 
3 Jesus is seeking the wanderers yet; 
 Why do they roam? 
 Love only waits to forgive and forget; 
 Home! weary wanderers, home! 
 Wonderful love 
 Dwells in the heart of the Father above. 
4 Come to my heart, O Thou wonderful love, 
 Come and abide, 
 Lifting my life till it rises above 
 Envy and falsehood and pride; 
 Seeking to be 
 Lowly and humble, a learner of Thee.
686 主的爱永不消减或衰落
1 主的爱永不消减或衰落，  无爱可与相比； 
 祂召集我们进入神家中，  享受无比安息。 
和 主的爱何宝贵， 
 纯洁、白给、无限；  哦，失迷的人哪， 
 来得此爱！耶稣正在召唤。 
2 耶稣的心充满温柔、慈爱，  无心可与相比； 
 我们的心事，无人能知道，  但祂却能洞悉。 
3 主的眼睛远远就能看透，  无眼可与相比； 
 祂以柔和眼光关注各人，  满足我们心意。 
4 主的声音如铃，温柔、甘甜，  无声可与相比； 
 如水泉潺潺美妙流水声，  鸣响在炎夏里。 
5 哦，请来倾听耶稣的声音，  你就不再失迷； 
 我们安息在祂爱的怀里，  我们因祂合一。 
686 THERE IS NO LOVE LIKE THE LOVE OF  JESUS
10.6.10.6. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 There is no love like the love of Jesus, 
 Never to fade or fall, 
 Till into the rest of the house of God 
 He has gathered us all. 
(C) Jesus’ love, precious love, 
 Boundless, and pure, and free; 
 Oh, turn to that love, weary wand’ring soul; 
 Jesus pleadeth for thee. 
2 There is no heart like the heart of Jesus, 
 Filled with a tender love; 
 No throb nor throe that our hearts can know, 
 But He feels it above. 
3 There is no eye like the eye of Jesus, 
 Piercing so far away; 
 Ne’er out of the sight of its tender light 
 Can the wanderer stray. 
4 There is no voice like the voice of Jesus, 
 Tender and sweet its chime; 
 Like musical ring of a flowing spring 
 In the bright summertime. 
5 Oh, let us hark to the voice of Jesus! 
 Then we shall never roam; 
 And we shall rest on His loving breast, 
 And with Him we’ll be one!
687 恩主所赐奇妙的恩典
1 恩主所赐奇妙的恩典，  远超我们的罪恶、过犯；  在那受钉的加略山上，  羔羊的血为我们流淌。 
和 恩典，恩典， 
 赦免并洗净人的恩典；  恩典，恩典， 
 远超我们的罪恶、过犯。 
2 罪恶、绝望如冰冷海浪，  使我一生受无限损伤；  但主恩典比罪恶更大，  将人引向全能的十架。 
3 罪污极深，我不能遮盖，  有何能将它洗得洁白？  看有一朱红血潮澎湃，  使你今天能比雪更白！ 
4 奇妙、无限、无比的恩典，  白白赐给相信的心坎；  你若渴慕瞻仰祂荣脸，  何不现在接受祂恩典？ 
687 MARVELOUS GRACE OF OUR LOVING  LORD
9.9.9.9. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Marvelous grace of our loving Lord, 
 Grace that exceeds our sin and our guilt, 
 Yonder on Calvary’s mount outpoured, 
 There where the blood of the Lamb was spilt. 
(C) Grace, grace, God’s grace, 
 Grace that will pardon and cleanse within; 
 Grace, grace, God’s grace, 
 Grace that is greater than all our sin. 
2 Sin and despair like the sea waves cold, 
 Threaten the soul with infinite loss; 
 Grace that is greater, yes, grace untold, 
 Points to the Refuge, the mighty Cross. 
3 Dark is the stain that we cannot hide, 
 What can avail to wash it away? 
 Look! there is flowing a crimson tide; 
 Whiter than snow you may be today. 
4 Marvelous, infinite, matchless grace, 
 Freely bestowed on all who believe; 
 You that are longing to see His face, 
 Will you this moment His grace receive?
688 罪恶烦扰的重担压身
1 罪恶、烦扰的重担压身，  多少的心灵正忧伤，  何不接受永远的生命，  主里的喜乐可分享。 
和 生命！永远生命！ 
 耶稣是惟一的源头；  生命！丰盛生命！ 
 荣耀归耶稣到永久。 
2 劳苦人哪，为何仍彷徨，  当主能解脱你忧伤，  丰盛生命，耶稣已释放，  敞开你心灵来饱尝。 
3 看潺潺流水始于高岗，  汇聚成河，汹涌、奔放；  照样，生命水广阔、浩荡，  流自救主受难山上。 
4 像清泉浇灌干旱之域，  带来全地极大复兴；  哦，圣别子民不再恐惧，  为主再来雀跃、欢欣。 
688 UNDER THE BURDENS OF GUILT AND  CARE
9.8.9.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Under the burdens of guilt and care, 
 Many a spirit is grieving, 
 Who in the joy of the Lord might share, 
 Life everlasting receiving. 
(C) Life! life! eternal life! 
 Jesus alone is the Giver: 
 Life! life! abundant life! 
 Glory to Jesus forever! 
2 Burdened one, why will you longer bear 
 Sorrows from which He releases? 
 Open your heart, and rejoicing, share 
 Life more abundant in Jesus. 
3 Leaving the mountain, the streamlet grows, 
 Flooding the vale with a river; 
 So, from the hill of the Cross, there flows 
 Life more abundant forever. 
4 Oh, for the flood on the thirsty land! 
 Oh, for a mighty revival! 
 Oh, for a sanctified, fearless band, 
 Ready to hail its arrival!
689 救主为我死何等的奇妙
1 救主为我死，何等的奇妙！  使我得自由，脱离罪囚牢；  祂再三的说：人若是信靠，  已经出死入生！ 
和 真福音，真福音，你们快来听！  真福音，真福音，基督已讲明：  人若肯相信神儿子的名，  已经出死入生！ 
2 一切的亏欠，祂替我还清；  一切的污秽，祂替我洗净；  祂特意的说：人若信祂名，  已经出死入生！ 
3 我虽满罪恶，我能信祂名；  我虽极软弱，我能受祂灵；  朋友，这真是何等的荣幸！  已经出死入生！ 
4 我虽顶不堪，我不肯生疑；  到祂那里的，祂永不撇弃；  凡是信祂的，都当时常记：  已经出死入生！ 
689 OH WHAT A SAVIOR THAT HE DIED FOR  ME
10.10.10.6. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Oh, what a Savior that He died for me! 
 From condemnation He hath made me free; 
 “He that believeth on the Son” saith He, 
 “Hath everlasting life.” 
(C) “Verily, verily, I say unto you;” 
 “Verily, verily,” message ever new! 
 “He that believeth on the Son” — ‘tis true —  
 “Hath everlasting life?” 
2 All my iniquities on Him were laid, 
 All my indebtedness by Him was paid; 
 All who believe on Him, the Lord hath said, 
 “Hath everlasting life.” 
3 Though poor and needy, I can trust my Lord; 
 Though weak and sinful, I believe His word; 
 Oh, glad message; every child of God 
 “Hath everlasting life.” 
4 Though all unworthy, yet I will not doubt; 
 For him that cometh He will not cast out: 
 “He that believeth” — oh, the good news shout! 
 “Hath everlasting life.”
690 一再尝试终归徒然
1 一再尝试，终归徒然，  我仍无法使我心安；  圣经之言，向我指出：  我的需要惟耶稣。 
2 我不能视，我不能觉；  祂是生命、亮光、救主，  我所信靠惟耶稣。
3 祂死又活，今在呼召，  所言、所行，爱的发表；  世上罪人一切需要，  都在耶稣里找到。 
4 有人嘲笑，有人咒?；  但我带着罪、羞见祂；  因祂的名，我来就主，  远超万名，是耶稣。 
690 I’VE TRIED IN VAIN A THOUSAND WAYS
1 I’ve tried in vain a thousand ways 
 My fears to quell, my hopes to raise; 
 But what I need, the Bible says, 
 Is ever, only Jesus. 
2 My soul is night, my heart is steel —  
 I cannot see, I cannot feel; 
 For light, for life I must appeal 
 In simple faith to Jesus. 
3 He died, He lives, He reigns, He pleads; 
 There’s love in all His words and deeds; 
 There’s all a guilty sinner needs 
 Forevermore in Jesus. 
4 Though some should sneer, and some should blame,  I’ll go with all my guilt and shame; 
 I’ll go to Him because His name, 
 Above all names, is Jesus.
691 整个世界被罪恶黑暗笼罩
1 整个世界被罪恶黑暗笼罩，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
 祂的荣耀如正午阳光照耀，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
和 快来就光！这光是为你；  这个恩光已照我心里；  前我瞎眼，但今被开启；  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
2 凡在主里的人，就毫无黑暗，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
 跟祂引导，就得在光中进前，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
3 黑暗中的罪人，请到主前来，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
 遵命前去洗，祂使你眼睁开，  这世界的光是耶稣！ 
691 THE WHOLE WORLD WAS LOST IN THE  DARKNESS OF SIN
11.8.11.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 The whole world was lost in the darkness of sin;  The light of the world is Jesus; 
 Like sunshine at noonday His glory shone in, 
 The light of the world is Jesus. 
(C) Come to the light, ‘tis shining for thee; 
 Sweetly the light has dawned upon me; 
 Once I was blind, but now I can see; 
 The light of the world is Jesus. 
2 No darkness have we who in Jesus abide, 
 The light of the world is Jesus; 
 We walk in the light when we follow our Guide,  The light of the world is Jesus. 
3 Ye dwellers in darkness with sin-blinded eyes, 
 The light of the world is Jesus; 
 Go, wash, at His bidding, and light will arise; 
 The light of the world is Jesus.
692 前有一官因见耶稣的神能
1 前有一官因见耶稣的神能，  就在夜间来问作人的途径；  救主实实在在的对他说明：  “你们必须重生！” 
和 “你们必须重生！ 
 你们必须重生！” 
 救主实实在在的对他说明：  “你们必须重生！” 
2 这话，世人务要郑重而敬听，  这是救主所说，严肃且肯定，  切莫轻忽祂这神圣的叮咛：  “你们必须重生！” 
3 哦，谁想要进那光明的天城，  并同赎民享那荣耀的安宁，  他就需要得那永远的生命：  “你们必须重生！” 
692 A RULER ONCE CAME TO JESUS BY NIGHT
1 A ruler once came to Jesus by night, 
 To ask Him the way of salvation and light; 
 The Master made answer in words true and plain,  “Ye must be born again!” 
(C) “Ye must be born again!” 
 “Ye must be born again!” 
 “I verily, verily say unto thee, 
 Ye must be born again!” 
2 Ye children of men, attend to the word 
 So solemnly uttered by Jesus, the Lord, 
 And let not this message to you be in vain, 
 “Ye must be born again.” 
3 Oh, ye who would enter that glorious rest, 
 And sing with the ransomed the song of the blest;  The life everlasting if ye would obtain, 
 “Ye must be born again.”
693 何等柔细慈爱耶稣在呼召
1 何等柔细、慈爱，耶稣在呼召，  呼召他，也呼召你！ 
 祂在天上等待，也来地寻找，  寻找他，也寻找你！ 
和 来家！来家！ 
 你这疲乏人，来家！ 
 何等恳切、慈爱， 
 耶稣在呼召，呼召你，罪人，来家！ 
2 为何糊涂迟延，不听祂恳劝，  恳劝他，也恳劝你？ 
 为何踌躇留恋，不理祂恩眷，  恩眷他，也恩眷你？ 
3 时间急速逝掉，机会要越过，  越过他，也越过你； 
 阴影正渐笼罩，死亡要来捉，  来捉他，也来捉你。 
4 哦，那奇妙之爱，祂已经应许，  应许他，也应许你； 
 虽然污秽、败坏，祂仍必怜恤，  怜恤他，也怜恤你。 
693 SOFTLY AND TENDERLY JESUS IS  CALLING
11.7.11.7. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Softly and tenderly Jesus is calling —  
 Calling for you and for me; 
 Patiently Jesus is waiting and watching —   Watching for you and for me! 
(C) Come home! come home! 
 Ye who are weary, come home! 
 Earnestly, tenderly, Jesus is calling, 
 Calling, O sinner, come home! 
2 Pleading for you and for me?
 Why should we linger and heed not His mercies —   Mercies for you and for me? 
3 Passing from you and from me;
 Shadows are gathering, death-beds are coming —   Coming for you and for me! 
4 Promised for you and for me!
 Though we have sinned, He has mercy and pardon —   Pardon for you and for me!
694 耶稣发慈声要召你回来
1 耶稣发慈声要召你回来， 
 今日召你！今日召你！ 
 为何仍迷蒙，远离主慈怀，  终日流荡在苦地？ 
和 今日召你！今日召你！ 
 耶稣今召你，今日发慈声呼召你！ 
2 耶稣在呼召你来得安息， 
 今日召你，今日召你！ 
 重担卸给祂，疲劳变有力，  祂要欢迎不厌弃。 
3 耶稣在等待你来得赦免， 
 今日等你，今日等你！ 
 可带你罪来，俯伏主脚前；  现在就来莫迟疑！ 
4 耶稣仍呼召，何不就听从？  今日听祂！今日听祂！ 
 来求告祂名，必蒙恩无穷；  祂要赐福无复加。 
694 JESUS IS TENDERLY CALLING THEE HOME
1 Jesus is tenderly calling thee home —  
 Calling today, calling today! 
 Why from the sunshine of love wilt thou roam, 
 Farther and farther away? 
(C) Calling today! calling today! 
 Jesus is calling, is tenderly calling today! 
2 Jesus is calling the weary to rest, 
 Calling today! calling today! 
 Bring Him thy burden and thou shalt be blest: 
 He will not turn thee away. 
3 Jesus is waiting, O come to Him now! 
 Waiting today! waiting today! 
 Come with thy sins, at His feet lowly bow; 
 Come, and no longer delay. 
4 Jesus is pleading, O list to His voice! 
 Hear Him today! hear Him today! 
 They who believe on His name shall rejoice: 
 Quickly arise, come away!
695 被罪压害人人请来
1 被罪压害人人请来，  救主充满爱怜； 
 祂要救你，安你心怀，  只要信祂恩言。 
和 只要信祂！只要信祂！  现在要信祂！ 
 祂要救你！祂要救你！  现在要救你！ 
2 耶稣为赐丰富恩典，  已经流出宝血； 
 你若投此朱红泉源，  必得洁白如雪。 
3 是的，主是道路、真理，  引人进入安息； 
 立即相信，勿再迟疑，  必得永生福气。 
4 来阿！加入这个圣队，  同向荣耀直往； 
 美丽天城，无忧、无泪，  不息之乐永享。 
695 COME EVERY SOUL BY SIN OPPRESSED
1 Come, every soul by sin oppressed, 
 There’s mercy with the Lord; 
 And He will surely give you rest 
 By trusting in His Word. 
(C) Only trust Him! Only trust Him! 
 Only trust Him now! 
 He will save you! He will save you! 
 He will save you now! 
2 For Jesus shed His precious blood 
 Rich blessings to bestow; 
 Plunge now into the crimson flood 
 That washeth white as snow. 
3 Yes, Jesus is the Truth, the Way, 
 That leads you into rest; 
 Believe in Him without delay, 
 And you are fully blest. 
4 Come then, and join the holy band, 
 And on to glory go; 
 In Christ’s redemption take your stand, 
 And all His goodness know.
696 无论何人愿意就可得救恩
1 无论何人愿意，就可得救恩，  这是天上来的佳音给罪人；  赶快将这信息向万人宣陈：  无论何人都可来。 
和 “无论什么人，无论什么人，”  这是慈爱天父唤浪子回家；  “无论老幼、男妇，都不必代价，  无论何人都可来。” 
2 无论何人想来，不必稍迟延；  恩门已经大开，进者可随便；  耶稣真是救主，祂已发恩言：  无论何人都可来。 
3 无论何人愿意，就可得永生；  无论何人愿意，这话语有征；  无论何人愿意，这应许无更，  无论何人都可来。 
696 WHOSOEVER HEARETH SHOUT SHOUT  THE SOUND
11.11.11.7. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 “Whosoever heareth!” shout, shout the sound! 
 Send the blessed tidings all the world around; 
 Spread the joyful news wherever man is found:  “Whosoever will may come!” 
(C) “Whosoever will! whosoever will!” 
 Send the proclamation over vale and hill; 
 ‘Tis a loving Father calls the wand’rer home:  “Whosoever will may come!” 
2 “Whosoever cometh” need not delay, 
 Now the door is open, enter while you may; 
 Jesus is the true, the only Living Way: 
 “Whosoever will may come!” 
3 “Whosoever will!” the promise is secure; 
 “Whosoever will,” forever must endure; 
 “Whosoever will!” ‘tis life forevermore; 
 “Whosoever will may come.”
697 你心有空房为主吗
1 你心有空房为主吗？  耶稣在叩门等待； 
 祂代偿你罪的重价，  你愿否让祂进来？ 
和 速速将你心门大开，  今就让耶稣进来；  荣耀君王站立门外，  切莫让祂久等待。 
2 你心有空房为事业，  为享安乐与世福； 
 耶稣为你舍命、流血，  怎为祂竟无空处？ 
3 你心有空房为主吗？  耶稣慈声再呼唤； 
 速把握“悦纳时候”罢！  明日或许已太晚！ 
697 HAVE YOU ANY ROOM FOR JESUS
1 Have you any room for Jesus, 
 He who bore your load of sin? 
 As He knocks and asks admission, 
 Sinner, will you let Him in? 
(C) Room for Jesus, King of glory! 
 Hasten now, His word obey; 
 Swing the heart’s door widely open, 
 Bid Him enter while you may. 
2 Room for pleasure, room for business, 
 But for Christ the Crucified, 
 Not a place that He can enter, 
 In the heart for which He died? 
3 Have you any room for Jesus, 
 As in grace He calls again? 
 O, today is time accepted, 
 Tomorrow you may call in vain.

698 你若愿意脱离罪的苦情
1 你若愿意脱离罪的苦情，  让基督来进入你心；  你若渴慕得着新的人生，  让基督来进入你心。 
和 现在，将疑惑抛弃；  现在，将救主投倚；  现在，将心门开启；  让基督来进入你心。 
2 你若渴慕，现在就得清洁，  让基督来进入你心；  洗罪之泉，一直涌流不绝，  让基督来进入你心。 
3 若觉恶性，自己不能治服，  让基督来进入你心；  若感虚空，世界不能满足，  让基督来进入你心。 
698 IF YOU ARE TIRED OF THE LOAD OF YOUR  SIN
10.8.10.8. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 If you are tired of the load of your sin, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart; 
 If you desire a new life to begin, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart. 
(C) Just now, your doubtings give o’er; 
 Just now, reject Him no more; 
 Just now, throw open the door; 
 Let Jesus come into your heart. 
2 If ‘tis for purity now that you sigh, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart; 
 Fountains for cleansing are flowing near by, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart. 
3 If there’s a tempest your voice cannot still, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart; 
 If there’s a void this world never can fill, 
 Let Jesus come into your heart.

699 听阿救主叩门叩门 特.和.
1 听阿，救主叩门，叩门，  不住叩心门！ 
 为何你仍硬心，硬心，  不理这声音？ 
 火速起来开心门， 
 火速请祂进； 
 祂要进入你心，你心，  赐给你救恩。 
和 请主进！请主进！  祂在心外叩门； 
 请主进！请主进！  祂必进你心。 
2 为何你仍犹豫，犹豫，  让主等门外？ 
 要知机会一去，一去，  永远不再来！ 
 祂既对你满恩情， 
 莫把祂心伤； 
 祂愿赐你生命，生命，  何必要灭亡？ 
699 HARK THE SAVIOR’S KNOCKING  KNOCKING
1 IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
The Gospel 
1 Hark, the Savior’s knocking, knocking, 
 Knocking at your heart! 
 Oh, do not be hardened, hardened, 
 Lest He should depart. 
 Rise and open up your heart, 
 Quickly let Him in; 
 Life divine He’ll give you, give you, 
 And forgive your sin. 
(C) Let Him in! Let Him in! 
 He’s knocking at your heart; 
 Let Him in! Oh, let Him in! 
 Let Him in your heart. 
2 Why should you still tarry, tarry, 
 Keep Him waiting there? 
 He is kind and gracious, gracious, 
 Merciful and dear. 
 Listen to His tender voice, 
 Do not grieve His heart; 
 Won’t you let Him enter, enter, 
 And His grace impart.
700 “几乎要听劝”弃绝罪途 特.
1 “几乎要听劝，”弃绝罪途；  “几乎要听劝，”相信耶稣。  有人却在自语： 
 “圣灵，目前请去！ 
 等有更好机遇， 
 我再求主。” 
2 “几乎要听劝，”今即前来；  “几乎要听劝，”切勿离开；  亲友为你祷告， 
 天使望你趁早， 
 耶稣等你求告， 
 迷人，何待？ 
3 请你就听劝，耶稣奇妙；  请你就听劝，宝血有效；  祂赦一切的罪， 
 祂洗所有污秽， 
 这是难得机会， 
 岂可失掉？ 
4 “几乎要听劝，”仍误机会；  “几乎要听劝，”难免定罪；  “几乎”甚为不妥， 
 “几乎”难免大错！ 
 “几乎”终于相左， 
 “几乎”可危！ 
5 你今当听劝，切莫硬心！  你今当听劝，耶稣真近！  祂仍向你召呼， 
 你该对祂降服， 
 喜乐难以尽述， 
 请你就信！ 
700 ALMOST PERSUADED NOW TO BELIEVE IRREGULAR METER
1 “Almost persuaded” now to believe; 
 “Almost persuaded” Christ to receive; 
 Seems now some soul to say, 
 “Go, Spirit, go Thy way, 
 Some more convenient day 
 On Thee I’ll call.” 
2 “Almost persuaded,” come, come today; 
 “Almost persuaded,” turn not away; 
 Jesus invites you here, 
 Angels are ling’ring near, 
 Prayers rise from hearts so dear; 
 O wand’rer, come! 
3 Oh, be persuaded! Christ never fails —  
 Oh, be persuaded! His blood avails —  
 Can save from every sin, 
 Cleanse you without, within —  
 Will you not let Him in? 
 Open the door! 
4 “Almost persuaded,” harvest is past! 
 “Almost persuaded,” doom comes at last; 
 “Almost” cannot avail; 
 “Almost” is but to fail! 
 Sad, sad that bitter wail —  
 “Almost — but lost!” 
5 Be now persuaded, oh, sinner, hear! 
 Be now persuaded, Jesus is near; 
 His voice is pleading still, 
 Turn now with heart and will, 
 Peace will your spirit fill —  
 Oh, turn today!

701 飘渺人生何短暂
1 飘渺人生何短暂，  好似浮云现即散，  又似幻梦醒就完  要及时！
 时日飞逝在宣言：  转瞬就到死亡线，  再迟必在地狱间  要及时！ 
和 要及时！要及时！  当今耶稣在召唤：  要及时！ 
 若在罪中仍流连，  只怕恩门向你关，  那时呼救已太晚  要及时！ 
2 谁是智者，该想看  鲜花朝艳暮凋残，  英年要去何能挽？  要及时！ 
 哦，我求你早打算，  免得过了死亡线，  灵魂丧在地狱间  要及时！ 
3 圣灵仍在把你感，  时常与你来争战，  何不降服得平安？  要及时！ 
 救主等候赐恩典，  愿意救你免悲惨；  你若踌躇何愚顽！  要及时！ 
4 罪人，请听我忠言，  莫把救恩视等闲，  速把救主来拣选  要及时！ 
 来投耶稣怀里面，  来接基督进心间，  来就救主趁今天  要及时！ 
701 LIFE AT BEST IS VERY BRIEF
1 Life at best is very brief, 
 Like the falling of a leaf, 
 Like the binding of a sheaf, 
 Be in time! 
 Fleeting days are telling fast 
 That the die will soon be cast, 
 And the fatal line be passed, 
 Be in time! 
(C) Be in time! Be in time! 
 While the voice of Jesus calls you,  Be in time! 
 If in sin you longer wait, 
 You may find no open gate, 
 And your cry be just too late: 
 Be in time! 
2 Fairest flowers soon decay, 
 Youth and beauty pass away; 
 O you have not long to stay, 
 Be in time! 
 While God’s Spirit bids you come,  Sinner, do not longer roam, 
 Lest you seal your hopeless doom, 
 Be in time! 
3 Time is gliding swiftly by, 
 Death and judgment draweth nigh,  To the arms of Jesus fly, 
 Be in time! 
 O I pray you count the cost! 
 Ere the fatal line be crossed, 
 And your soul in hell be lost, 
 Be in time! 
4 Sinner, heed the warning voice, 
 Make the Lord your final choice, 
 Then all heaven will rejoice, 
 Be in time! 
 Come from darkness into light; 
 Come, let Jesus make you right; 
 Come, receive His life tonight, 
 Be in time!
702 照我本相无善足称
1 照我本相，无善足称，  惟你流血，替我受惩，  并且召我就你得生；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
2 照我本相，不必等到  自己改变比前更好，  因你宝血除罪可靠；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
3 照我本相，反复不定，  疑信参半，如浪不平，  内有挂虑，外有恶行；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
4 照我本相，贫、瞎、可怜；  我真需要你的恩典，  感我恶心，开我盲眼；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
5 照我本相，你肯收留；  赐我生命，赦我愆尤；  你既应许，必定成就；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
6 照我本相，你的大爱  为我除去所有障碍；  今来就你，惟你是赖；  救主耶稣，我来！我来！ 
702 JUST AS I AM WITHOUT ONE PLEA
1 Just as I am, without one plea, 
 But that Thy blood was shed for me, 
 And that Thou bid’st me come to Thee, 
 O Lamb of God, I come! I come! 
2 Just as I am, and waiting not 
 To rid my soul of one dark blot; 
 To Thee whose blood can cleanse each spot,  O Lamb of God, I come, I come! 
3 Just as I am, though tossed about 
 With many a conflict, many a doubt; 
 Fightings within, and fears without, 
 Lamb of God, I come, I come! 
4 Just as I am, poor, wretched, blind; 
 Sight, riches, healing of the mind; 
 Yes, all I need, in Thee to find, 
 O Lamb of God, I come, I come! 
5 Just as I am, Thou wilt receive, 
 Wilt welcome, pardon, cleanse, relieve; 
 Because Thy promise I believe, 
 Lamb of God, I come, I come! 
6 Just as I am, Thy love unknown 
 Has broken every barrier down; 
 Now, to be Thine, yea, Thine alone, 
 Lamb of God, I come, I come!
703 脱离捆绑忧愁与黑影 特.
1 脱离捆绑、忧愁与黑影，  耶稣，我来！耶稣，我来！  进入自由、喜乐与光明，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
 脱离疾病，进入你健全；  脱离贫乏，进入你富源；  脱离罪恶，进入你美善，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
2 脱离失败、羞耻与无能，  耶稣，我来！耶稣，我来！  进入十架荣耀的得胜，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
 脱离痛苦，进入你安宁；  脱离风波，进入你平静；  脱离怨叹，进入你颂称，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
3 脱离狂傲、不平的危地，  耶稣，我来！耶稣，我来！  进入稳固、有福的旨意，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
 脱离自己，住在你爱里；  脱离绝望，等候你来提；  离地上腾，如鹰展双翼，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
4 脱离撒但死亡的权势，  耶稣，我来！耶稣，我来！  进入基督生命的恩赐，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
 脱离败坏、无底的深渊，  进入护庇、安歇的家园，  永永远远瞻仰你荣颜，  耶稣，我来就你！ 
703 OUT OF MY BONDAGE SORROW AND  NIGHT
1 IRREGULAR METER
The Gospel 
1 Out of my bondage, sorrow, and night, 
 Jesus, I come! Jesus, I come! 
 Into Thy freedom, gladness, and light, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
 Out of my sickness into Thy health, 
 Out of my want and into Thy wealth, 
 Out of my sin and into Thyself, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
2 Out of my shameful failure and loss, 
 Jesus, I come! Jesus, I come! 
 Into the glorious gain of Thy cross, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
 Out of earth’s sorrows into Thy balm, 
 Out of life’s storm and into Thy calm, 
 Out of distress to jubilant psalm, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
3 Out of unrest and arrogant pride, 
 Jesus, I come! Jesus, I come! 
 Into Thy blessed will to abide, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
 Out of myself to dwell in Thy love, 
 Out of despair into raptures above, 
 Upward for aye on wings like a dove, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
4 Out of the fear and dread of the tomb, 
 Jesus, I come! Jesus, I come! 
 Into the joy and pleasure, Thine own, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee! 
 Out of the depths of ruin untold, 
 Into the flock Thy love doth enfold, 
 Ever Thy glorious face to behold, 
 Jesus, I come to Thee!
704 你的欢迎声音
1 你的欢迎声音， 
 召我前来相信， 
 因你为我已流宝血，  特要洗我良心。 
和 主，我来就你！  我今来就你！ 
 求主用血将我洗，  使我干净无比。 
2 我真污秽可鄙， 
 行善一无能力； 
 但你欢喜赐恩帮助，  并除一切恶迹。 
3 你今郑重吩咐， 
 我远离罪俗， 
 虚心悔改，实心相信，  接受你作救主。 
4 神用恩言呼召， 
 又用圣灵光照， 
 使我知道自己不堪，  知道救主可靠。 
5 圣灵今在我灵， 
 证明我有生命； 
 神的应许已经应验，  若我已信祂名。 
6 奇哉！神爱罪人！  妙哉！神有救恩！  美哉！耶稣流血赎罪！  我愿献上全身。 
704 I HEAR THY WELCOME VOICE
1 I hear Thy welcome voice, 
 That calls me, Lord, to Thee, 
 For cleansing in Thy precious blood  That flowed on Calvary. 
(C) I am coming, Lord, 
 Coming now to Thee: 
 Wash me, cleanse me in the blood  That flowed on Calvary. 
2 Though coming weak and vile, 
 Thou dost my strength assure; 
 Thou dost my vileness fully cleanse,  Till spotless all, and pure. 
3 ‘Tis Jesus who confirms 
 The blessed work within, 
 By adding grace to welcomed grace,  Where reigned the power of sin. 
4 And He the witness gives 
 To loyal hearts and free, 
 That every promise is fulfilled, 
 If faith but brings the plea. 
5 All hail, redeeming blood! 
 All hail, life-giving grace! 
 All hail, the gift of Christ our Lord,   Our strength and righteousness. 
6 (Chinese stanza added)

705 谁在流荡远离天父
1 谁在流荡远离天父？ 
 为何不回家？ 
 活在罪中，终日痛苦，  何不就回家？ 
和 回家罢！回家罢！ 
 不要再流荡！ 
 慈爱天父等你回家， 
 整天在巴望！ 
2 我已流荡，远离天父，  现在要回家； 
 走过好长罪恶道路， 
 主，我要回家。 
和 要回家！要回家！ 
 不愿再流荡！ 
 现在我要回到父家， 
 永住父身旁！ 
3 流荡、犯罪，我已疲乏，  现在要回家； 
 投靠你爱，相信你话，  主，我要回家。 
4 我魂衰残，我心悲伤，  现在要回家； 
 加我力量，复我盼望，  主，我要回家。 
5 惟你是我所求、所望，  现在要回家； 
 因你替我血流、命丧，  主，我要回家。 
6 我心切需洗罪宝血， 
 现在要回家； 
 洗我罪污，洁白如雪，  主，我要回家。 
 (第三至第六节用第二节和诗)  
705 I’VE WANDERED FAR AWAY FROM GOD
1 I’ve wandered far away from God, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 The paths of sin too long I’ve trod, 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
(C) Coming home, coming home, 
 Nevermore to roam; 
 Open wide Thine arms of love; 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
2 I’ve wasted many precious years, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 I now repent with bitter tears, 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
3 I’m tired of sin and straying, Lord, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 I’ll trust Thy love, believe Thy word; 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
4 My soul is sick, my heart is sore, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 My strength renew, my hope restore: 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
5 My only hope, my only plea, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 That Jesus died, and died for me; 
 Lord, I’m coming home. 
6 I need His cleansing blood, I know, 
 Now I’m coming home; 
 O wash me whiter than the snow; 
 Lord, I’m coming home.
706 “各样都齐备”请来赴席 特.
1 “各样都齐备，”请来赴席！  来，桌上已摆满美物；  哦，饥饿者，疲倦者，  来，你们就必得饱足。 
和 听，主正在邀请， 
 无论何人愿意， 
 来得神完全救恩， 
 无论何人愿意。 
2 “各样都齐备，”请来赴席！  来，恩门现在正大开；  尊贵之位为你保留， 
 靠近主人的胸怀。 
3 “各样都齐备，”请来赴席！  来，祂等着你尝恩典；  今天是时候，莫迟延，  因不一定有明天。 
4 “各样都齐备，”请来赴席！  脱去挂虑、属世争竞；  来，接受神所赐基督，  并喝永远的生命。 
706 ALL THINGS ARE READY COME TO THE  FEAST
1 IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
The Gospel 
1 “All things are ready,” come to the feast! 
 Come for the table now is spread; 
 Ye famishing, ye weary, come, 
 And thou shalt be richly fed. 
(C) Hear the invitation, 
 Come, whosoever will; 
 Praise God for full salvation 
 For whosoever will. 
2 “All things are ready,” come to the feast! 
 Come, for the door is open wide; 
 A place of honor is reserved 
 For you at the Master’s side. 
3 “All things are ready,” come to the feast! 
 Come, while He waits to welcome thee; 
 Delay not while this day is thine, 
 Tomorrow may never be. 
4 “All things are ready,” come to the feast! 
 Leave every care and worldly strife; 
 Come, feast upon the Christ of God 
 And drink everlasting life.

707 耶稣灵魂的爱人
1 耶稣，灵魂的爱人，  你怀让我来藏身； 
 惊波骇浪滚滚近！ 
 狂风暴雨阵阵紧！ 
 藏我！哦，主，求藏我！  直到今生风波过！ 
 引我安全到路尽， 
 至终求接我灵魂！ 
2 别无避所能藏隐， 
 无助之人托你身； 
 不！哦，不要丢弃我！  扶持、安慰，望无辍：  所有倚靠寄你身， 
 所有救助由你临； 
 头无遮护、身无蔽，  求你圣翼来覆庇。 
3 主阿，你是我所需，  够我一切还有余： 
 仆，你扶起；弱，你保；  病，你医治；瞽，你导；  你名至义、至圣洁，  我全不义，满罪孽；  我是邪恶，没良善，  恩典、真理，你充满。 
4 你前我遇恩浩瀚， 
 赦我众罪之恩典； 
 医治活水望涌流， 
 洁我衷里并保守： 
 你是永远生命源， 
 望在我心成活泉， 
 从我里头来涌流， 
 一直涌流到永久。 
707 JESUS LOVER OF MY SOUL
1 Jesus, lover of my soul, 
 Let me to Thy bosom fly, 
 While the nearer waters roll, 
 While the tempest still is high: 
 Hide me, O my Savior, hide, 
 Till the storm of life is past; 
 Safe into the haven guide; 
 O receive my soul at last. 
2 Other refuge have I none, 
 Hangs my helpless soul on Thee;  Leave, oh, leave me not alone, 
 Still support and comfort me. 
 All my trust on Thee is stayed, 
 All my help from Thee I bring; 
 Cover my defenseless head 
 With the shadow of Thy wing. 
3 Thou, O Christ, art all I want; 
 More than all in Thee I find; 
 Raise the fallen, cheer the faint, 
 Heal the sick and lead the blind.  Just and holy is Thy name, 
 I am all unrighteousness; 
 Vile and full of sin I am, 
 Thou art full of truth and grace. 
4 Plenteous grace with Thee is found,  Grace to cover all my sin; 
 Let the healing streams abound;  Make and keep me pure within. 
 Thou of life the fountain art, 
 Freely let me take of Thee; 
 Spring Thou up within my heart,  Rise to all eternity.
708 永久磐石为我开
1 永久磐石为我开，  让我藏身在你怀；  愿你所流血与水，  两面解决我的罪：  赎我免去它永刑，  救我脱离它权能。 
2 纵我双手不甘休，  不能满足你要求；  纵我热心能持久，  纵我眼泪永远流，  仍不足以赎愆尤；  必须你来施拯救。 
3 空空两手无代价，  单单投靠你十架！  赤身，就你求衣衫；  无助，望你赐恩典；  污秽，飞奔你泉旁，  主阿，洗我，否则亡。 
4 当我此生年日逝，  当我临终闭目时，  当我飞进永世间，  当我到你宝座前，  永久磐石为我开，  让我藏身在你怀。 
708 ROCK OF AGES CLEFT FOR ME
1 Rock of Ages, cleft for me, 
 Let me hide myself in Thee; 
 Let the water and the blood, 
 From Thy riven side which flowed, 
 Be of sin the double cure, 
 Save me from its guilt and power. 
2 Not the labor of my hands 
 Can fulfill Thy law’s demands; 
 Could my zeal no respite know, 
 Could my tears forever flow, 
 All could never sin erase, 
 Thou must save, and save by grace. 
3 Nothing in my hands I bring, 
 Simply to Thy cross I cling; 
 Naked, come to Thee for dress, 
 Helpless, look to Thee for grace: 
 Foul, I to the fountain fly, 
 Wash me, Savior, or I die. 
4 While I draw this fleeting breath, 
 When mine eyes shall close in death,  When I soar to worlds unknown, 
 See Thee on Thy judgment throne, 
 Rock of Ages, cleft for me, 
 Let me hide myself in Thee.

709 你曾离天庭撇弃宝座和荣冕 特.和.
1 你曾离天庭，撇弃宝座和荣冕，  为救我竟甘愿来世间； 
 但在伯利恒，并无一家房空闲，  备接你降生到里面。 
和 哦，来我心中，主耶稣！ 
 在我心有空房为着你； 
 哦，来我心中，主耶稣！ 
 来！在我心有空房为你。 
2 天使赞高声，天上众军也回应，  乐宣告你身位，君尊荣； 
 但你来地上，出生寒门， 
 无佳形，陋城中，谁将你看重！ 
3 狐狸尚有洞，飞鸟亦有其窝巢，  山谷中，树林内，任逍遥；  你无枕头地，终日飘泊犹太郊，  加利利野地宿荒草。 
4 哦，主，你来此，带着生命之恩言，  好释放你子民脱苦难； 
 他们却侮慢，戏弄且加荆棘冕，  终将你置于受难山。 
和 哦，来我心中，主耶稣！ 
 你十架是我惟一拯救； 
 哦，来我心中，主耶稣！ 
 来！你十架是我的拯救。 
5 天上还要响，天使更要赞高声，  欢颂你来得胜，至威荣； 
 愿你那时候，将我提接并说明：  “我身边有房备你用！” 
和 我心要欢畅，主耶稣！ 
 你来时要召我到身边； 
 哦，愿你快来！主耶稣！ 
 来！快将我接到你身边。 
709 THOU DIDST LEAVE THY THRONE AND  THY KINGLY CROWN
1 IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
The Gospel 
1 Thou didst leave Thy throne and Thy kingly crown,  When Thou camest to each for me; 
 But in Bethlehem’s home was there found no room  For Thy holy nativity: 
(C) Oh, come to my heart, Lord Jesus! 
 There is room in my heart for Thee; 
 Oh, come to my heart, Lord Jesus, come, 
 There is room in my heart for Thee. 
2 Heaven’s arches rang when the angels sang, 
 Proclaiming Thy royal degree; 
 But of lowly birth cam’st Thou, Lord, on earth,  And in great humility: 
3 The foxes found rest, and the birds had their nest  In the Shade of the forest tree; 
 But Thy couch was the sod, O Thou Son of God,  In the deserts of Galilee: 
4 Thou camest, O Lord, with the living Word 
 That should set Thy people free; 
 But with mocking’ scorn, and with crown of thorn,  They bore Thee to Calvary: 
(C) Oh, come to my heart, Lord Jesus! 
 Thy cross is my only plea; 
 Oh, come to my heart, Lord Jesus, come, 
 Thy cross is my only plea. 
5 When heaven’s arches shall ring, and her choirs shall sing  At Thy coming to victory, 
 Let Thy voice call me up, saying, “Yet there is room,  There is room at My side for thee!” 
(C) And my heart shall rejoice, Lord Jesus! 
 When Thou comest and callest for me; 
 And my heart shall rejoice, Lord Jesus! 
 When Thou comest and callest for me.
710 来进入我心哦主耶稣
1 来进入我心，哦，主耶稣！  我今愿悔改相信； 
 我心感觉虚空和孤独，  现在来进入我心！ 
和 进入我心！进入我心！  来进入我心，主耶稣！  求你现在进来施恩，  来进入我心，主耶稣！ 
2 来进入我心，哦，主耶稣！  向我施行你救恩； 
 救我脱离罪恶的痛苦，  现在来进入我心！ 
3 来进入我心，哦，主耶稣！  将我全人都更新； 
 生命之灵请进来居住，  现在就进入我心。 
710 COME INTO MY HEART O LORD JESUS
1 Come into my heart, O Lord Jesus, 
 Come into my heart, I pray; 
 My soul is so troubled and weary, 
 Come into my heart, today. 
(C) Into my heart, into my heart, 
 Come into my heart, Lord Jesus; 
 Come in today, come in to stay, 
 Come into my heart, Lord Jesus. 
2 Come into my heart, O Lord Jesus, 
 I need Thee through life’s dreary way; 
 The burden of sin is so heavy, 
 Come into my heart to stay. 
3 Come into my heart, O Lord Jesus, 
 Now cleanse and illumine my soul; 
 Fill me with Thy wonderful Spirit, 
 Come in and take full control.
711 我今信靠你主耶稣
1 我今信靠你，主耶稣，  单单信靠你； 
 为这完全、白白救赎，  信靠你。 
2 为得赦免，我信靠你，  俯伏你脚前； 
 信靠你的慈祥、 
 怜恤和恩典。 
3 为蒙洗净，我信靠你，  你已流宝血； 
 这血为要将我 
 洗涤成圣洁。 
4 我信靠你必引导我，  惟你来引领； 
 天天、时刻，无论什么，  都供应。 
5 因你能力，我信靠你，  你永不负我； 
 你自己所赐的话语，  永稳妥。 
6 主耶稣，我今信靠你，  你必保守我； 
 我要永远将我自己，  全信托。 
711 I AM TRUSTING THEE LORD JESUS
1 I am trusting Thee, Lord Jesus, 
 Trusting only Thee; 
 Trusting Thee for full salvation, 
 Great and free. 
2 I am trusting Thee for pardon, 
 At Thy feet I bow; 
 For Thy grace and tender mercy, 
 Trusting now. 
3 I am trusting Thee for cleansing 
 In the crimson flood; 
 Trusting Thee to make me holy 
 By Thy blood. 
4 I am trusting Thee to guide me; 
 Thou alone shalt lead, 
 Every day and hour supplying 
 All my need. 
5 I am trusting Thee for power, 
 Thine can never fail; 
 Words which Thou Thyself shalt give me  Must prevail. 
6 I am trusting Thee, Lord Jesus; 
 Never let me fall; 
 I am trusting Thee for ever, 
 And for all.
712 耶稣我信靠你
1 耶稣，我信靠你，  全心信靠你； 
 失迷、无助、内疚，  你将我拯救； 
 别无救主像你， 
 在天或在地； 
 你为罪人受死， 
 好使我免死。 
和 耶稣，我信靠你，  全心信靠你！ 
 失迷、无助、内疚，  你将我拯救。 
2 我必信靠耶稣， 
 思念你道路； 
 在地三十三载， 
 满有怜与爱： 
 罪人乐就近你， 
 病人来投倚； 
 无人被你厌弃， 
 因你恩无极。 
3 耶稣，我信靠你，  信靠你话语， 
 你的慈怜声音， 
 前我未曾闻； 
 现因你灵教导， 
 何甜美味道！ 
 惟愿坐你脚前， 
 聆听你圣言。 
4 耶稣，我信靠你，  丝毫不怀疑； 
 不论何人来倚， 
 你总不丢弃； 
 你应许真可靠， 
 你血有功效！ 
 这是我的救恩， 
 我的救主神！ 
712 JESUS I WILL TRUST THEE
1 Jesus, I will trust Thee, 
 Trust Thee with my soul, 
 Guilty, lost and helpless, 
 Thou canst make me whole: 
 There is none in heaven 
 Or on earth like Thee: 
 Thou hast died for sinners, 
 Therefore, Lord, for me. 
(C) Jesus, I will trust Thee, 
 Trust Thee with my soul, 
 Guilty, lost and helpless, 
 Thou canst make me whole. 
2 Jesus, I must trust Thee, 
 Pondering Thy ways; 
 Full of love and mercy 
 All Thine earthly days: 
 Sinners gathered round Thee, 
 Lepers sought Thy face: 
 None too vile or loathsome 
 For a Savior’s grace. 
3 Jesus, I can trust Thee, 
 Trust Thy written Word, 
 Though Thy voice of pity 
 I have never heard: 
 When Thy Spirit teacheth, 
 To my taste how sweet! 
 Only may I hearken, 
 Sitting at Thy feet. 
4 Jesus, I do trust Thee, 
 Trust without a doubt; 
 Whosoever cometh 
 Thou wilt not cast out: 
 Faithful is Thy promise, 
 Precious is Thy blood: 
 These my soul’s salvation, 
 Thou my Savior God!
713 我爱述说这故事
1 我爱述说这故事，  关乎耶稣降世； 
 祂是神的独生子，  因爱，为人受死。  我爱述说这故事，  因它真实、可颂；  别无一事能如此 
 满足我的情衷。 
和 我爱述说这故事，  直至永世亿万载；  述说老、老的故事，  关乎耶稣的爱。 
2 我爱述说这故事，  美妙令人心倾， 
 远胜最美的幻思，  远胜黄金梦境； 
 我爱述说这故事，  因它益我良多； 
 因我认识它价值，  故今向你述说。 
3 我爱述说这故事，  不厌述说千遍； 
 好像每多说一次，  更多觉它甘甜。  我爱述说这故事，  因多人未听见， 
 这个救恩的启示，  出自神的圣言。 
4 我爱述说这故事，  因人虽常听闻， 
 仍觉饥渴要认识，  一如从未听闻。  那日进入荣耀时，  我所唱新、新诗，  仍是这老、老故事 -   我所久爱不释。 
713 I LOVE TO TELL THE STORY
1 I love to tell the story, 
 Of unseen things above, 
 Of Jesus and His glory, 
 Of Jesus and His love. 
 I love to tell the story, 
 Because I know ‘tis true; 
 It satisfies my longings 
 As nothing else can do. 
(C) I love to tell the story, 
 ‘Twill be my theme in glory 
 To tell the old, old story 
 Of Jesus and His love. 
2 I love to tell the story; 
 More wonderful it seems 
 Than all the golden fancies 
 Of all my golden dreams, 
 I love to tell the story, 
 It did so much for me; 
 And that is just the reason 
 I tell it now to thee. 
3 I love to tell the story; 
 ‘Tis pleasant to repeat 
 What seems each time I tell it, 
 More wonderfully sweet. 
 I love to tell the story; 
 For some have never heard 
 The message of salvation 
 From God’s own holy Word. 
4 I love to tell the story; 
 For those who know it best 
 Seem hungering and thirsting 
 To hear it like the rest. 
 And when, in scenes of glory, 
 I sing the new, new song, 
 ‘Twill be the old, old story, 
 That I have loved so long.
714 救我恩何等丰满
1 救我恩何等丰满，  救我恩何等丰满，  救我恩何等丰满，  救我恩无量！ 
和 主断开一切锁炼，  主断开一切锁炼，  主断开一切锁炼，  主把我释放！ 
2 我罪过都蒙赦免，  我心中充满平安，  我全人脱离羁绊，  我今得释放！ 
3 无论是罪恶试探，  无论是世界、撒但，  无论是疾病、忧患，  都不能捆绑！ 
4 我要唱阿利路亚，  我要唱阿利路亚，  我要唱阿利路亚，  主把我释放！ 
714 O HOW GREAT HIS SALVATION
1 O how great His salvation! 
 O how great His salvation! 
 O how great His salvation! 
 Jesus saves me now! 
(C) Jesus breaks every fetter! 
 Jesus breaks every fetter! 
 Jesus breaks every fetter! 
 Jesus sets me free! 
2 All my sins are forgiven! 
 All my fetters are riven! 
 I enjoy peace of heaven! 
 Jesus saves me now! 
3 Neither sin nor temptation, 
 Neither Satan’s vexation, 
 Nor the world’s best elation 
 Can enslave me now! 
4 I will sing Hallelujah! 
 I will sing Hallelujah! 
 I will sing Hallelujah! 
 Jesus saves me now!

715 在十字架我救主舍命
1 在十字架我救主舍命，  所流宝血洗罪有权能；  这宝贝血已将我洗清；  荣耀归主名！ 
和 荣耀归主名！ 
 荣耀归主名！ 
 主宝贝血已将我洗清；  荣耀归主名！ 
2 我已脱罪，奇妙而甘甜，  救主耶稣住在我里面；  藉十字架，祂与我相联；  荣耀归主名！ 
3 宝贵泉源，拯救我脱罪，  我真快乐，竟得此恩惠！  耶稣救我，使与祂相配；  荣耀归主名！ 
4 请你速来投入这泉源，  将你全人抛在主脚前；  今天来投，今天得完全；  荣耀归主名！ 
715 DOWN AT THE CROSS WHERE MY SAVIOR  DIED
9.9.9.5. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 Down at the cross where my Savior died, 
 Down where for cleansing from sin I cried, 
 There to my sin was the blood applied; 
 Glory to His name! 
(C) Glory to His name, 
 Glory to His name; 
 There to my sin was the blood applied; 
 Glory to His name! 
2 I am so wondrously saved from sin, 
 Jesus so sweetly abides within; 
 There at the cross where He took me in; 
 Glory to His name. 
3 Oh, precious fountain that saves from sin, 
 I am so glad I have entered in; 
 There Jesus saves me and keeps me clean; 
 Glory to His name. 
4 Come to this fountain so rich and sweet; 
 Cast thy poor soul at the Savior’s feet; 
 Plunge in today, and be made complete; 
 Glory to His name.
716 我主耶稣竟然甘心替我受死
1 我主耶稣竟然甘心替我受死，  使不堪如我能得恩典； 
 祂竟甘心走上十架、被钉至死，  使我一生罪孽蒙赦免。 
和 祂在十字架上， 
 将我罪全担当， 
 哦，祂竟甘心为我担当！ 
 祂在十字架上， 
 为我受苦、命丧， 
 祂在彼将我罪全担当。 
2 祂待我满了温柔、慈爱并忍耐，  祂洗净我心中的污秽； 
 祂说：“不再定罪，”我今已被解开，  祂在十架上担我众罪。 
3 我要紧靠救主，永不将祂离弃，  天天欢乐在世作客旅； 
 我口高唱得救乐歌，满心欢喜，  因我众罪已被祂担去。 
716 THERE WAS ONE WHO WAS WILLING TO  DIE IN MY STEAD
12.9.12.9. WITH CHORUS 
The Gospel 
1 There was One who was willing to die in my stead,  That a soul so unworthy might live, 
 And the path to the cross He was willing to tread,  All the sins of my life to forgive. 
(C) They were borne on the cross, 
 They were borne on the cross, 
 O how much He was willing to bear! 
 With what anguish and loss, 
 Jesus went to the cross! 
 But He carried my sins with Him there. 
2 He is tender and loving and patient with me, 
 While He cleanses my heart of its dross; 
 But “there’s no condemnation,” I know I am free,  For my sins were all borne on the cross. 
3 I will cling to my Savior and never depart —  
 I will joyfully journey each day, 
 With a song on my lips and a song in my heart, 
 That my sins have been taken away.
717 当我疲困罪恶境 特.和.
1 当我疲困罪恶境， 
 祂以柔爱来寻， 
 怀我、肩我满温情，  带我归祂羊群； 
 千万天使因此欢腾，  甚至歌声满天回应。 
和 爱何大，寻回我！  血何宝，赎回我！  恩何丰，带回我归羊群！  奇妙恩，带回我归羊群！ 
2 伤重待毙祂见我， 
 便以油、酒敷裹； 
 柔声细语许我说： 
 “你要永远属我！”  从无声音如此甜美，  伤痛之心顿觉欣慰！ 
3 钉痕、枪伤祂示我，  血也、水也流出， 
 头戴荆冕、利刺戳，  羞辱加上痛楚； 
 我真不知我有何长，  使祂为我这样受戕。 
4 我今安坐祂面前， 
 瞻仰祂的荣脸， 
 心觉希奇，灵感赞，  追忆祂的恩眷； 
 似乎永世所有时间，  用来赞祂尚嫌太短。 
5 年日虽然在飞逝， 
 今享完全安息； 
 等候光明的日子， 
 永远与主同居。 
 那时召我到祂身边，  与祂同在，作祂圣伴。 
717 IN TENDERNESS HE SOUGHT ME IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS
1 In tenderness He sought me, 
 Weary and sick with sin, 
 And on His shoulders brought me 
 Into His flock again. 
 While angels in His presence sang 
 Until the courts of heaven rang. 
(C) Oh, the love that sought me! 
 Oh, the blood that bought me! 
 Oh, the grace that brought me to the flock,  Wondrous grace that brought me to the flock! 
2 He washed the bleeding sin-wounds, 
 And poured in oil and wine; 
 He whispered to assure me, 
 “I’ve found thee, thou art Mine:” 
 I never heard a sweeter voice, 
 It made my aching heart rejoice. 
3 He pointed to the nail-prints, 
 For me His blood was shed; 
 A mocking crown so thorny, 
 Was placed upon His head: 
 I wondered what He saw in me, 
 To suffer such deep agony. 
4 I’m sitting in His presence, 
 The sunshine of His face, 
 While with adoring wonder 
 His blessings I retrace. 
 It seems as if eternal days 
 Are far too short to sound His praise. 
5 So while the hours are passing, 
 All now is perfect rest; 
 I’m waiting for the morning, 
 The brightest and the best, 
 When He will call us to His side, 
 To be with Him, His spotless Bride.
718 前我堕入罪海中
1 特.和.
福音──见证 
1 前我堕入罪海中， 
 远离平安之岸， 
 受尽摧残，深感痛， 
 欲拔不能，徒叹！ 
 但主听见我呼喊， 
 立即前来拯救， 
 甘冒风险施救援， 
 爱何深厚！ 
和 爱救了我！爱救了我！  当我在世界活着，爱救了我！  爱救了我！爱救了我！  当我在世界活着，爱救了我！ 
2 现今我在平安地， 
 脱离罪恶痛苦， 
 满了喜乐和安息， 
 完全属于耶稣。 
 爱是如此强而真， 
 配得我的歌讴； 
 我心、我命、我全人， 
 永归祂有！ 
3 苦中罪人，请听信， 
 耶稣能施拯救； 
 祂爱所施的救恩， 
 现在就要接受。 
 祂心渴望拯救你， 
 等候已经够久； 
 立即相信，勿犹疑， 
 就来得救！ 
718 I WAS SINKING DEEP IN SIN IRREGULAR METER WITH CHORUS The Gospel
1 I was sinking deep in sin, 
 Far from the peaceful shore, 
 Very deeply stained within, 
 Sinking to rise no more; 
 But the Master of the sea 
 Heard my despairing cry, 
 From the waters lifted me, 
 Now safe am I. 
(C) Love lifted me! 
 Love lifted me! 
 When nothing else could help, 
 Love lifted me. 
2 All my heart to Him I give, 
 Ever to Him I’ll cling, 
 In His blessed presence live, 
 Ever His praises sing. 
 Love so mighty and so true 
 Merits my soul’s best songs; 
 Faithful, loving service, too, 
 To Him belongs. 
3 Souls in danger, look above, 
 Jesus completely saves; 
 He will lift you by His love 
 Out of the angry waves. 
 He’s the Master of the sea, 
 Billows His will obey; 
 He your Savior wants to be —  
 Be saved today.
719 主耶稣接纳罪人
1 主耶稣接纳罪人；  凡离开天路的人，  堕落罪中并流连，  都应当听此恩言。 
和 主耶稣接纳罪人，  当将它一再唱吟；  将此信息传清楚：  主耶稣接纳罪徒。 
2 来，祂要赐你安息，  凭祂话将祂投倚；  主接纳罪人来归，  祂甚至接纳罪魁。 
3 我心今不再定罪，  在神前坦然无愧；  祂洗我一切罪污，  神的要求都满足。 
4 主接纳罪人来归，  即或我满身是罪；  每一罪污都洗净，  故我能进荣耀境。 
719 SINNERS JESUS WILL RECEIVE
1 Sinners Jesus will receive; 
 Sound this word of grace to all 
 Who the heavenly pathway leave, 
 All who linger, all who fall. 
(C) Sing it o’er and o’er again; 
 Christ receiveth sinful men; 
 Make the message clear and plain: 
 Christ receiveth sinful men. 
2 Come, and He will give you rest; 
 Trust Him for His word is plain; 
 He will take the sinfulest; 
 Christ receiveth sinful men. 
3 Now my heart condemns me not, 
 Pure before the law I stand; 
 He who cleansed me from all spot, 
 Satisfied its last demand. 
4 Christ receiveth sinful men, 
 Even me with all my sin; 
 Purged from every spot and stain, 
 Glory I shall enter in.

720 九十九只圈中躺卧
1 九十九只圈中躺卧， 
 终日平安、快乐； 
 但有一只山野飘泊， 
 处境艰窘、险恶； 
 荒山深谷，流荡、孤苦， 
 远离慈牧，失却照护。 
 远离慈牧，失却照护。 
2 “主，你已经有九十九， 
 难道还嫌不够？” 
 祂说：“迷羊亦我所有， 
 现在离我飘流， 
 山势虽陡，路虽难走， 
 我仍须去将它营救。 
 我仍须去将它营救。 
3 但是我们不能领会， 
 祂涉之水何危， 
 所历黑夜何等可畏，为将迷羊寻回。  荒野前行，祂闻哀声； 
 迷羊无助，垂死悲鸣。 
4 “主阿，山径一路血滴， 
 是谁，为何而流？” 
 “乃是我为迷羊流的， 
 为要将它拯救。” 
 “你的手掌，为何受伤？” 
 乃是昨夜路荆所创。” 
 乃是昨夜路荆所创。” 
5 但从迅雷轰开山岭， 
 穿过悬崖陡坡， 
 有一呼声直达天庭， 
 “乐哉，迷羊找着！” 
 天使欢唱，满天应响： 
 “乐哉！主已寻回迷羊。” 
 “乐哉！主已寻回迷羊。” 
720 THERE WERE NINETY AND NINE THAT  SAFELY LAY
1 There were ninety and nine that safely lay 
 In the shelter of the flock, 
 But one was out on the hills away, 
 Far off in the cold and dark; 
 Away on the mountains wild and bare, 
 Away from the tender Shepherd’s care. 
 Away from the tender Shepherd’s care. 
2 “Lord, Thou hast here Thy ninety and nine; 
 Are they not enough for Thee?” 
 But the Shepherd made answer: “This of Mine 
 Has wandered away from Me; 
 And although the road be rough and steep, 
 I go to the desert to find My sheep.” 
 I go to the desert to find My sheep.” 
3 But none of the ransomed ever knew 
 How deep were the waters crossed; 
 Nor how dark was the night which the Lord passed through Ere He  found His sheep that was lost. 
 Out in the bleak desert He heard its cry —  
 All bleeding and helpless, and ready to die. 
4 “Lord, whence are those blood-drops all the way 
 That mark out the mountain’s track?” 
 “They were shed for one who had gone astray 
 Ere the Shepherd could bring him back.” 
 “Lord, whence are Thy hands so rent and torn?” 
 “They’re pierced tonight by many a thorn.” 
 “They’re pierced tonight by many a thorn.” 
5 And all through the mountains, thunder-riven, 
 And up from the rocky steep, 
 There arose a cry to the gate of heaven, 
 “Rejoice! I have found My sheep!” 
 And the angels echoed around the throne, 
 “Rejoice, for the Lord brings back His own!” 
 “Rejoice, for the Lord brings back His own!”

721 请对我讲主福音
1 请对我讲主福音，  讲说天上妙事； 
 讲说耶稣爱罪人，  讲说祂为人死。  简单讲说主福音，  像对儿童讲说， 
 因我软弱又愚笨，  无助且有罪过。 
和 请对我讲说主福音，  讲耶稣爱的故事；  请对我讲说主福音，  讲耶稣为人死。 
2 慢慢讲说主福音，  使我可以听明； 
 神那奇妙的宏恩，  如何拯救罪人。  常常讲说主福音，  因我容易忘记， 
 犹如晨露虽降临，  日中就无踪迹。 
3 仔细讲说主福音，  话语热切、温柔，  请记得我是罪人，  需要耶稣拯救。 
 每逢我心感悲哀，  请你作安慰人， 
 用你真诚的心怀，  对我讲主福音。 
4 每逢我心感惊恐，  请仍讲主福音； 
 惟恐今世的虚荣，  迷惑我心太深。  每逢虚荣来诱我，  开始要动我心， 
 请仍讲主福音说：  “耶稣是你福分。” 
721 TELL ME THE OLD OLD STORY
1 Tell me the old, old story, 
 Of unseen things above, 
 Of Jesus and His glory, 
 Of Jesus and His love; 
 Tell me the story simply, 
 As to a little child, 
 For I am weak and weary, 
 And helpless and defiled. 
(C) Tell me the old, old story, 
 Tell me the old, old story, 
 Tell me the old, old story, 
 Of Jesus and His love. 
2 Tell me the story slowly, 
 That I may take it in —  
 That wonderful redemption, 
 God’s remedy for sin; 
 Tell me the story often, 
 For I forget so soon, 
 The “early dew” of morning 
 Has passed away at noon. 
3 Tell me the story softly, 
 With earnest tones and grave;  
 Remember I’m the sinner 
 Whom Jesus came to save; 
 Tell me the story always, 
 If you would really be, 
 In any time of trouble, 
 A comforter to me. 
4 Tell me the same old story, 
 When you have cause to fear 
 That this world’s empty glory 
 Is costing me too dear; 
 And when the Lord’s bright glory 
 Is dawning on my soul, 
 Tell me the old, old story: 
 “Christ Jesus makes thee whole.”

722 若尽得世界而失去救主
1 若尽得世界，而失去救主，  岂值得一日在此活着？  在这些就要过去之物中，  安息与安慰岂能寻得？  若尽得世界，而失去救主，  所得的一切够用一生？  地上所有的快乐， 
 也不能比那充满了主的生命！ 
2 就是那为你受死的主，  能否这世界供一避难所，  给你逃进去永远居住？
3 何等的虚空！若没有救主：  地上尽都是罪恶、苦难！  永世何黑暗！若没有救主：  黑夜与眼泪， 
 痛苦无边！ 
 哦，必要面对那无主幽谷，  且一直无主， 
 直到永远！ 
4 主里得一切，何等的快乐！  何等能安抚伤痛心田！  并无一罪过，祂不肯赦免；  也无一忧患，祂不承担！  若你只有主，只有主基督，  全地除了祂，你无他物，  但在祂里面，你就有一切，  应付你需要，无限丰富。 
722 IF I GAINED THE WORLD BUT LOST THE  SAVIOR
1 If I gained the world, but lost the Savior, 
 Were my life worth living for a day? 
 Could my yearning heart find rest and comfort 
 In the things that soon must pass away? 
 If I gained the world, but lost the Savior, 
 Would my gain be worth the lifelong strife? 
 Are all earthly pleasures worth comparing 
 For a moment with a Christ-filled life? 
2 Had I wealth and love in fullest measure, 
 And a name revered both far and near, 
 Yet no hope beyond, no harbor waiting, 
 Where my storm-tossed vessel I could steer; 
 If I gained the world, but lost the Savior, 
 Who endured the cross and died for me, 
 Could then all the world afford a refuge, 
 Whither, in my anguish, I might flee? 
 ‘Mid the sins and sorrows here below! 
 And eternity, how dark without Him! 
 Only night and tears and endless woe! 
 What, though I might live without the Savior, 
 When I come to die, how would it be? 
 O to face the valley’s gloom without Him! 
 And without Him all eternity! 
4 O the joy of having all in Jesus! 
 What a balm the broken heart to heal! 
 Ne’er a sin so great, but He’ll forgive it, 
 Nor a sorrow that He does not feel! 
 If I have but Jesus, only Jesus, 
 Nothing else in all the world beside —  
 O then everything is mine in Jesus; 
 For my needs and more He will provide.
723 我们从信主一直到如今
1 我们从信主一直到如今，  同心兴旺福音；
 我们为促进基督的福音，  广传祂的喜信。 
 并为着辩明且证实福音，  我们一同得恩 -  
 祂动了善工，就必要成全，  直到见祂荣面。 
2 愿我们每日所遭遇事故，  都为福音缘故； 
 甚至为福音我们被捆绑，  好叫罪人释放。 
 灵里越放胆而无所惧怕，  去传扬神的话， 
 但要在爱里，靠能力而作，  天天凭主而活。 
3 主，我们切慕在呼吸之间，  凡事都能放胆； 
 无论生或死， 
 总是要让祂在我身上显大。  因为我活着就是主基督，  无一事愧对主； 
 在我生活中，祂掌管一切，  是我生命、秘诀。 
4 愿行事为人，与福音相称，  不致羞辱祂名； 
 为所信福音，都同灵站立，  并且齐心努力。 
 我们将福音传得更完全，  好叫主能心满； 
 到处去传讲：基督是生命，  教会是祂显明。 
723 OURS IS A FELLOWSHIP IN THE GOSPEL
1 Ours is a fellowship in the gospel 
 Since we received the Lord; 
 We’re for the furtherance of the gospel, 
 Spreading to all His Word. 
 For its defense and strong confirmation 
 We all partake of grace —  
 He who began this work will perfect it 
 Till we shall see His face. 
2 May all the things that come to us daily 
 Unto the gospel turn, 
 That all may see we’re bound for the gospel 
 And of the Lord may learn. 
 May we be bold and fearless in spirit, 
 Speaking the Word of God, 
 Do it in love and do it in power, 
 While living in the Lord. 
3 Lord, we’re expecting that we’ll be given 
 Boldness with every breath. 
 Christ must be magnified in our body 
 Whether by life or death. 
 We hope in nothing to be ashamed, 
 For us to live is Christ —  
 He is the Person in all our living, 
 Our everything, our life. 
4 May all our lives be worthy the gospel 
 Whatever may betide, 
 All standing fast in oneness of spirit, 
 All striving side by side. 
 Let us proclaim the gospel in fullness 
 To satisfy the Lord: 
 Christ is the life, the church His expression, 
 Sound everywhere abroad.
724 响起福音号声你这信徒
1 响起福音号声，你这信徒；  宣扬祂的名声，耶稣是主！  传说祂的大名，高举祂的尊贵，  万膝因祂大名，无不下跪。 
2 谁肯为祂前去，谁愿兴起？  虽因亲人分离，泪流滴滴；  但以十架为荣，视万事如粪土，  所得一切虚空；谁肯站住？ 
3 去罢，得讲之日，已快临近；  时日即将消逝，耶稣快临。  高举十架前往，向拜偶像之民，  将此信息宣扬：耶稣快临。 
4 听哪，号声已响，耶稣为王！  政权归祂执掌，永世无疆。  全地向祂服降，座前俯伏颂扬，  惟独耶稣为王，耶稣为王！ 
724 SOUND YE THE TRUMPET-CALL HERALDS  PROCLAIM
1 Sound ye the trumpet-call; Heralds proclaim 
 Jesus as Lord of all, Sound forth His fame; 
 Tell of His great renown, Lift high the kingly crown,  Let every knee bow down At His blest name. 
2 Who will go forth for Him? Who will arise? 
 Though eyes with tears are dim, Severed love’s ties:  Counting all things but loss, Earth’s highest gain but dross,  And glorying in the cross, Who will arise? 
3 Go, for the crowning day Draws ever near; 
 Time will soon pass away, Jesus be here: 
 Raise ye the cross where now Nations to idols bow;  Dawn o’er the mountain’s brow Tells He is near. 
4 Hark to the trumpet-blast! Jesus is King! 
 He comes to reign at last, All conquering: 
 Then the wide world shall own, Bending before His throne,  Jesus is King alone, Jesus is King!
725 信徒赶快遵命出去普天下
1 信徒赶快遵命出去普天下，  通知他们：神是如何慈爱，  使之深晓：神已成功祂救法，  并不愿意一人灭亡、悲哀。 
和 传扬好信息、和平福音，  传扬主耶稣已经救赎罪人。 
2 请看，何止千万的人在罪中，  受了捆绑，一直事奉鬼魔，  无人前去通知：救赎已成功，  救主已经得胜，死而复活。 
3 主能救人脱离罪恶的捆绑，  亚当族类，因祂舍命结束；  我们应当不畏蹈火与赴汤，  庶免拦阻一人来信耶稣。 
4 世界各民、各国、各方并各人，  我们都当前往传扬恩典，  叫人知道：神是如何成肉身，、  受死在地，使人重生属天。 
5 不该拦阻儿女献身往边荒，  应当奉献财物帮助福音，  并且祷告，求神祝福并推广，  你的牺牲，主必纪念在心。 
6 应当记得，救主已将快再临，  机会一过，就难再尽本分；  只怕有人是因你我不热心，  不能得救，也不能亲近神。 
725 CHRISTIANS MAKE HASTE YOUR MISSION  HIGH FULFILLING
11.10.11.10. WITH CHORUS 
Preaching the Gospel 
1 Christians, make haste, your mission high fulfilling,  To tell to all the world that God is Light, 
 That He who made all nations is not willing 
 One soul should perish, lost in shades of night. 
(C) Publish glad tidings, tidings of peace; 
 Tidings of Jesus, redemption and release. 
2 Behold how many thousands still are lying, 
 Bound in the darksome prison-house of sin, 
 With none to tell them of the Savior’s dying 
 Or of the life He died for them to win. 
3 ‘Tis yours to save from peril of perdition 
 The soul for whom the Lord His life laid down; 
 Beware lest, slothful to fulfill your mission, 
 You lose one jewel that should deck His crown. 
4 Proclaim to every people, tongue, and nation 
 That God, in whom they move and live, is love;  
 Tell how He stooped to save His lost creation, 
 And died on earth that men He might approve. 
5 Give of your sons to bear the message glorious; 
 Give of your wealth to speed them on their way; 
 Pour out your soul for them in prayer victorious, 
 And all you spend our Savior will repay. 
6 He comes again; O brothers, ere you meet Him, 
 Make known to every heart His saving grace; 
 Let none whom He hath ransomed fail to greet Him,  Through your neglect unfit to see His face.
726 祂曾戴荆棘冠冕
1 祂曾戴荆棘冠冕， 
 祂将在全地掌权； 
 从前祂被人藐视、 
 恨恶、讥嘲并不齿；  今当广传好信息， 
 使人在祂前屈膝。 
2 长久以来祂产业， 
 被那说谎者劫掠； 
 祂要从它手夺回， 
 战胜仇敌凯旋归。 
 今当广传好信息， 
 使人在祂前屈膝。 
3 在祂平安掌权中， 
 天唱地和乐欢腾， 
 生命果实出产丰， 
 使她君王得尊荣。 
 今当广传好信息， 
 使人在祂前屈膝。 
4 主，使那日快来到，  全地充满你荣耀， 
 国度、权柄全属你，  荣耀也都永归你。 
 但愿每颗背叛心， 
 都来称颂你尊名。 
726 HE SHALL REIGN O’ER ALL THE EARTH
1 He shall reign o’er all the earth, 
 He who wore the crown of thorn, 
 Whom they deemed of little worth, 
 Whom they met with hate and scorn; 
 Send the tidings forth, that all 
 Humbly at His feet may fall. 
2 Long His heritage hath lain 
 ‘Neath the false usurper’s sway; 
 He will claim it back again, 
 Rout the foes and win the day. 
 Send the tidings forth, that all 
 Humbly at His feet may fall. 
3 Then, beneath His rule of peace 
 Heaven shall smile, and earth shall sing, 
 Ever yielding rich increase 
 To the honor of her King. 
 Send the tidings forth, that all 
 Humbly at His feet may fall. 
4 Hasten, Lord, the wondrous hour, 
 Bid it strike from shore to shore, 
 Thine the kingdom and the power, 
 Thine the glow evermore. 
 Bow each rebel heart, that all 
 At Thy feet adoring fall.
727 速兴起传福音速抢救灵魂
1 速兴起传福音！速抢救灵魂！  看！每天千万人正在沉沦！  莫塞住怜悯心，莫看重金银，  松开手，传福音，趁着现今。 
和 速兴起传福音！速抢救灵魂！  你为何仍忍心，看人沉沦？ 
2 人虽轻视主爱，祂仍在等待，  等罪人，心悔改，接受主爱；  迫切、温柔、忍耐，来感动人怀，  人信祂，肯悔改，就赦罪债。 
3 在人心的深处，受恶者欺骗，  失感觉，心颟顸，恩能复苏；  被主爱所鼓舞，感激主慈怜，  使已断的心弦，因主恢复。 
4 速兴起传福音，是信徒本分，  为此主会加恩，将你滋润；  窄路上仍力奔，为得人勤奋，  宣告主因爱人，竟舍己身。 
727 RESCUE THE PERISHING CARE FOR THE  DYING
11.10.11.10. WITH CHORUS 
Preaching the Gospel 
1 Rescue the perishing, Care for the dying, 
 Snatch them in pity from sin and the grave; 
 Weep o’er the erring one, Lift up the fallen, 
 Tell them of Jesus the mighty to save. 
(C) Rescue the perishing, Care for the dying; 
 Jesus is merciful, Jesus will save. 
2 Though they are slighting Him, Still He is waiting,  Waiting the penitent child to receive; 
 Plead with them earnestly, Plead with them gently;  He will forgive if they only believe. 
3 Down in the human heart, Crushed by the tempter,  Feelings lie buried that grace can restore; 
 Touched by a loving heart, Wakened by kindness,  Chords that are broken will vibrate once more. 
4 Rescue the perishing, Duty demands it; 
 Strength for thy labor the Lord will provide; 
 Back to the narrow way. Patiently win them; 
 Tell the poor wand’rer a Savior has died.
728 在那远处黑暗异教徒之疆
1 在那远处黑暗异教徒之疆，  亿万灵魂或将永远灭亡， 
 谁肯为主前去将救恩传扬，  不计代价，惟将耶稣仰望？ 
和 “天上地下所有权柄， 
 父神都早已赐给我； 
 所以要往普天下去传扬福音，  我就常与你们同在。” 
2 请看福音之门全地已敞开，  基督精兵，兴起！跟主领率！  信徒，醒起！当联结一切力量，  前去传福音，将罪囚释放。 
3 “何必死亡？”这是神来的呼声，  “何必死亡？”奉祂名也回应；  耶稣借着死，救人脱离死亡，  故当去将生命救恩传扬。 
728 FAR FAR AWAY IN HEATHEN DARKNESS  DWELLING
11.10.11.10. WITH CHORUS 
Preaching the Gospel 
1 Far, far away, in heathen darkness dwelling, 
 Millions of souls forever may be lost; 
 Who, who will go, salvation’s story telling, 
 Looking to Jesus, counting not the cost? 
(C) “All pow’r is given unto me, 
 All pow’r is given unto me, 
 Go ye into all the world and preach the gospel,  And lo, I am with you alway.” 
2 See o’er the world, wide open doors inviting: 
 Soldiers of Christ, arise and enter in! 
 Christians, awake! your forces all uniting, 
 Send forth the Gospel, break the chains of sin. 
3 “Why will ye die?” the voice of God is calling, 
 “Why will ye die?” re-echo in His name: 
 Jesus hath died to save from death appalling, 
 Life and salvation therefore go proclaim.
729 每日都有千万灵魂
1 每日都有千万灵魂，  一个一个走向沉沦，  没有神，没有指望；  没有救恩，没有光线，  前途有如永夜黑暗，  他们快要灭亡，
 他们快要灭亡。 
和 将灭亡，灭亡！ 
 每日千万人奔向灭亡！  他们奔向灭亡！ 
 他们奔向灭亡！ 
2 肯求圣灵感动教会，  用信和爱浸透心内；  为主费财、费力， 
 一切财宝献主脚前，  所有圣徒再次结联，  复兴有如往昔， 
 复兴有如往昔。 
3 主的再来即将应验，  不久人子就要显现，  祂的国度在望。 
 在这荣耀大日之前，  天国福音必须传扬  各国、各民、各方，  各国、各民、各方。 
4 哦，快促进主的降临！  哦，速止住灵魂沉沦，  免受痛苦无尽。 
 亿万灵魂仍旧失丧，  罪的代价，主血已偿，  请听他们哀吟！ 
 请听他们哀吟！ 
5 他们灭亡，快要灭亡，  每日千万灵魂失丧，  因为不信基督。 
 在那可怕审判台前，  主的教会如何答辩 -   他们对你控诉！ 
 他们对你控诉！ 
729 A HUNDRED THOUSAND SOULS A DAY
1 A hundred thousand souls a day 
 Are passing one by one away 
 In Christless guilt and gloom; 
 Without one ray of hope or light, 
 With future dark as endless night, 
 They’re passing to their doom, 
 They’re passing to their doom. 
(C) They’re passing, passing fast away 
 In thousands day be day; 
 They’re passing to their doom, 
 They’re passing to their doom. 
2 O Holy Ghost, Thy people move, 
 Baptize their hearts with faith and love 
 And consecrate their gold. 
 At Jesus’ feet their millions pour, 
 And all their ranks unite once more, 
 As in the days of old, 
 As in the days of old. 
3 The Master’s coming draweth near; 
 The Son of Man will soon appear; 
 His kingdom is at hand. 
 But ere that glorious day can be, 
 This gospel of the kingdom we 
 Must preach in every land, 
 Must preach in every land. 
4 Oh, let us then His coming haste, 
 Oh, let us end this awful waste 
 Of souls that never die. 
 For many millions still are lost; 
 A Savior’s blood has paid the cost, 
 Oh, hear their dying cry, 
 Oh, hear their dying cry. 
5 They’re passing, passing fast away, 
 A hundred thousand souls a day 
 In Christ-less guilt and gloom. 
 O Church of Christ, what wilt thou say 
 When, in the awful judgment day, 
 They charge thee with their doom, 
 They charge thee with their doom?
730 哦主遍地满是罪人
1 哦主，遍地满是罪人，  求你感动信徒之心，  快去传你奇妙救恩，  好迎接你再临。 
2 差遣那曾亲眼见神，  并亲闻祂妙音的人，  去领失丧灵魂归神，  好迎接你再临。 
3 传福音给罪中灵魂，  赢回受伤、破碎之心，  从各地带人归羊群，  好迎接你再临。 
4 人人佩带圣灵宝剑，  就是你的活泼圣言，  使他们都因你得胜，  好迎接你再临。 
5 哦，主的灵，向你求恳，  兴起你的得胜大军，  到处拯救失丧灵魂，  好迎接你再临。 
730 SEND THOU O LORD TO EVERY PLACE
1 Send Thou, O Lord, to every place 
 Swift messengers before Thy face, 
 The heralds of Thy wondrous grace, 
 Where Thou Thyself wilt come. 
2 Send men whose eyes have seen the King! 
 Men in whose ears His sweet words ring; 
 Send such Thy lost ones home to bring; 
 Send them where Thou wilt come. 
3 To bring good news to souls in sin; 
 The bruised and broken hearts to win; 
 In every place to bring them in, 
 Where Thou Thyself wilt come. 
4 Gird each one with the Spirit’s sword, 
 The sword of Thine own deathless word; 
 And make them conquerors, conquering Lord,  Where Thou Thyself wilt come. 
5 Raise up, O Lord the Holy Ghost, 
 From this broad land a mighty host, 
 Their war-cry, We will seek the lost, 
 Where Thou, O Christ, wilt come!
731 耶稣到底是否可能
1 耶稣，到底是否可能？  竟然有人羞认你名？  你名乃是天使所颂，  荣耀光辉照耀不停！ 
2 竟然有人羞认主名，  无异黑夜羞认明星！  我心本来暗如夜半，  祂这晨星，使暗变明。 
3 竟然有人羞认主名，  无异清晨羞认朝阳！  主是朝阳，光华四射，  照明我的如夜天良。 
4 竟然有人羞认主名，  我们属天盼望所赖；  我心惭愧，我脸含羞，  因我不觉祂名可爱。 
5 直到那日，我心所夸，  仍是救主为我受死；  这是我的永远荣耀，  基督竟不以我为耻。 
731 JESUS AND SHALL IT EVER BE
1 Jesus and shall it ever be? 
 A mortal man ashamed of Thee? 
 Ashamed of Thee, Whom angels praise,  Whose glories shine thro’ endless days? 
2 Ashamed of Jesus! sooner far 
 Let night disown each radiant star: 
 ‘Tis midnight with my soul, till He. 
 Bright Morning Star’, bid darkness flee. 
3 Ashamed of Jesus! O as soon 
 Let morning blush to own the sun; 
 He sheds the beams of light divine, 
 O’er this benighted soul of mine. 
4 Ashamed of Jesus! that dear friend 
 On whom my glorious hope depends?  No, when blush, be this my shame, 
 That I no more revere His Name. 
5 Till then, I boast a Savior slain;
 And, O may this my glory be, 
 That Christ is not ashamed of me.
732 多人在黑暗罪中沉沦
1 多人在黑暗、罪中沉沦； 
 当速施救援，使脱罪困。 
 但怎能奏凯？当用何法？ 
 “爱永不失败，”爱是救法。  “爱永不失败，”爱是救法。 
2 要思想救主，从天而来， 
 在加略受诅，流露祂爱； 
 人虽弃绝祂，祂仍爱人； 
 爱是祂救法，爱能得人。 
 爱是祂救法，爱能得人。 
3 你也当爱人，人正观看你如何待人，  好做拣选； 
 人似不理睬，心硬、眼瞎，  “爱永不失败，”莫计代价。  “爱永不失败，”莫计代价。 
4 “爱永不失败，”爱是至宝；  耶稣亲自来将爱发表； 
 求赐我以爱，使能爱人； 
 “你爱不失败，”爱必得胜。  “你爱不失败，”爱必得胜。 
732 OUT IN THE DARKNESS SHADOWED BY  SIN
5.4.5.4.D. WITH REPEAT 
Preaching the Gospel 
1 Out in the darkness, Shadowed by sin, 
 Souls are in bondage, Souls we would win. 
 How can we win them? How show the way? 
 “Love never faileth,” 
 Love is the way. 
2 Think how the Savior Came from above, 
 Suffered on Calvary, Breathing out love; 
 Think how He loves us, E’en when we stray: 
 We must love others, 
 Love is His way. 
3 See, they are waiting, 
 Looking at you, 
 Silently watching All that you do; 
 Seeming so careless, Hardened and lost: 
 “Love never faileth,” Count not the cost. 
4 “Love never faileth,” Love is pure gold; 
 Love is what Jesus Came to unfold; 
 Love these souls thru us, Savior, we pray; 
 Thy love ne’er faileth, 
 Love is Thy way.
733 我岂可去双手空空
1 我岂可去，双手空空？  岂可如此见主面？  从无一日为主作工，  从无掳物献主前。
和 我岂可以空手见主？  岂可双手空空去？  未领一人来归基督！  岂可双手空空去？ 
2 今日去世复有何恐？  因为恩主已救我； 
 但一想到双手空空，  愁云立即覆我额！ 
3 从前犯罪所废岁月，  假若现在能赎回， 
 我必完全奉献无缺，  乐行主旨不再违。 
4 哦，愿信徒速起热心，  殷勤作工趁白昼； 
 死夜尚未临到你身，  努力救人不稍休。 
733 MUST I GO AND EMPTY-HANDED
1 “Must I go, and empty-handed,” 
 Thus my dear Redeemer meet? 
 Not one day of service give Him, 
 Lay no trophy at His feet? 
(C) “Must I go, and empty-handed?” 
 Must I meet my Savior so? 
 Not one soul with which to greet Him:  Must I empty-handed go? 
2 Not at death I shrink nor falter, 
 For my Savior saves me now; 
 But to meet Him empty-handed, 
 Thought of that now clouds my brow. 
3 O the years in sinning wasted; 
 Could I but recall them now, 
 I would give them to my Savior, 
 To His will I’d gladly bow. 
4 O ye saints, arouse, be earnest, 
 Up and work while yet ‘tis day; 
 Ere the night of death o’ertake thee, 
 Strive for souls while still you may.
734 主是我的产业是我杯中的分
1 1 主是我的产业，是我杯中的分；  祂实在美好！
 主是我的产业，是我杯中的分；  祂实在美好！ 
和 你指示我生命的路， 
 你面前有满足喜乐， 
 你右手有永远福乐， 
 永远福乐。 
2 我常将主耶稣摆在我的面前，  祂在我右边； 
 我常将主耶稣摆在我的面前，  祂在我右边。 
3 因此我心欢喜，我的灵也快乐，  我身也安居； 
 因此我心欢喜，我的灵也快乐，  我身也安居。 
 (第三节不唱“和”诗)  
734 THE LORD IS THE PORTION OF MY  INHERITANCE
12.5.12.5. WITH CHORUS 
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
1 The Lord is the portion of my inheritance, 
 And He is my cup. 
 The Lord is the portion of my inheritance, 
 And He is my cup. 
(C) Thou wilt show me the path of life; 
 Thy presence is fullness of joy. 
 At Thy right hand there are pleasures 
 Forevermore. 
2 For I have set my Lord forever before me:  He’s at my right hand. 
 For I have set my Lord forever before me:  He’s at my right hand. 
3 Therefore is my heart glad, my spirit rejoiceth,  My flesh rests in hope. 
 Therefore is my heart glad, my spirit rejoiceth,  My flesh rests in hope. 
 (Do not repeat chorus after the last verse.)
735 至于我我必在义中得见你的面 特.
1 诗 17:15
 至于我，我必在义中得见你的面；  得见你的形像，我就要心满意足了。  我心渴慕能像你，主。 
 至于我，我要见你的面； 
 至于我，我要见你的面。 
735 AS FOR ME I WILL BEHOLD THY FACE IN  RIGHTEOUSNESS
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 As for me, I will behold Thy face in righteousness,  I will be satisfied when I awake with Thy likeness.  I want to be just like You, Lord, 
 So as for me, I will behold Thy face. 
 So as for me, I will behold Thy face.
736 我要求告耶和华(我要求告耶和华) 特.
1 诗 18:3,46
 我要求告耶和华，(我要求告耶和华，)   祂是配得赞美的；(祂是配得赞美的；)   这样，我必被救脱离仇敌。 
 (这样，我必被救脱离仇敌。)   祂是活神，愿我的磐石被人称颂，  并愿救我的神被人尊崇； 
 祂是活神，愿我的磐石被人称颂，  并愿救我的神被人尊崇。 
736 I WILL CALL UPON THE LORD (I WILL  CALL UPON THE LORD)
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 I will call upon the Lord, (I will call upon the Lord,)  Who is worthy to be praised; (Who is worthy to be praised;)  So shall I be saved from mine enemies. 
 (So shall I be saved from mine enemies.) 
 The Lord liveth and blessed be the Rock 
 And may the God of my salvation be exalted. 
 The Lord liveth and blessed be the Rock 
 And may the God of my salvation be exalted.
737 耶和华的律法全备
1 1 耶和华的律法全备，
 能苏醒人心； 
 耶和华的法度确定， 
 它能使愚人有智慧。 
和 它们比金子更可羡慕， 
 比精金可慕； 
 比蜂房滴蜜甘甜， 
 比蜂蜜甘甜。 
2 耶和华的训词正直， 
 能快活人心； 
 耶和华的命令清洁， 
 它能明亮人的眼目。 
3 耶和华的道理洁净， 
 直存到永远； 
 耶和华的典章真实， 
 它们乃是全然公义。 
4 但愿我口中的言语， 
 心里的意念， 
 都在你面前蒙悦纳， 
 哦，我磐石，我的救主！ 
和 你的仆人因此受警戒， 
 仆人受警戒； 
 守着这些便有赏， 
 便会有大赏。 
737 THE LAW OF THE LORD IS PERFECT
1 The law of the Lord is perfect 
 Converting the soul: 
 The testimony of the Lord is sure, 
 Making wise the simple. 
(C) More to be desired are they than gold. 
 Yea, than much fine gold: 
 Sweeter also than honey 
 And the honeycomb. 
2 The statutes of the Lord are right, 
 Rejoicing the heart: 
 The commandment of the Lord is pure, 
 Enlightening the eyes. 
3 The fear of the Lord is clean, 
 Enduring forever; 
 The judgments of the Lord are true 
 And righteous altogether. 
4 Let the words of my mouth, 
 And the meditation of my heart, 
 Be acceptable in Thy sight, O Lord, 
 My strength, and my redeemer. 
(C) Moreover by them is Thy servant warned  Is Thy servant warned: 
 And in keeping of them 
 There is great reward.
738 我的恩主阿我的心仰望你
1 诗 25:1~2
 我的恩主阿，我的心仰望你；  我的恩主阿，我的心仰望你。  哦，我神，我倚靠你；  求别让我羞愧； 
 求别让我的仇敌向我夸胜。 
738 UNTO THEE O LORD DO I LIFT UP MY  SOUL
1 Psalms and Scripture Portions
 Unto Thee, O Lord, do I lift up my soul; 
 Unto Thee, O Lord, do I lift up my soul; 
 O my God, I trust in Thee, 
 Let me not be ashamed, 
 Let not my enemies triumph over me.
739 你已经将我的哀哭变为跳舞 特.
1 诗 30:11~12
 你已经将我的哀哭变为跳舞，  将我的麻衣脱去， 
 你已经将我的哀哭变为跳舞，  给我披上了喜乐； 
 好叫我的灵歌颂你，并不住声。  哦，主耶和华，我的神阿，  我要称谢你，直到永远！ 
739 THOU HAST TURNED MY MOURNING INTO  DANCING FOR ME
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 Thou hast turned my mourning into dancing for me;  Thou hast put off my sackcloth; 
 Thou hast turned my mourning into dancing for me,  And girded me with gladness; 
 To the end my glory may sing praise unto Thee, 
 And not be silent. 
 O Lord my God, I will give thanks unto Thee forever.
740 主本为大在我们神城内 特.
1 诗 48:1~2
 主本为大！在我们神城内，  在祂的圣山上， 
 理当受大大的赞美！ 
 锡安山座落在北面， 
 居高华美胜一切， 
 乃是我们大君的京城，  为全地所喜悦； 
 乃是我们大君的京城，  为全地所喜悦。 
740 GREAT IS THE LORD AND GREATLY TO BE  PRAISED
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 Great is the Lord, and greatly to be praised, 
 In the city of our God, 
 In the mountain of His holiness. 
 Beautiful in elevation, the joy of the whole earth, 
 Is Mount Zion, on the sides of the north, 
 The city of the great King. 
 Is Mount Zion, on the sides of the north, 
 The city of the great King. 
 Used by permission of Robert Ewing.
741 主阿我照常与你同在 特.
1 诗 73:23~26
 主阿，我照常与你同在，  你搀着我的右手， 
 你引导我走路， 
 以你的训言引导我； 
 并且以后必接我， 
 接我到荣耀里。 
 除你以外，在天有谁？ 
 除你以外， 
 在地上我也没有所爱慕的。  我肉体、心肠衰残， 
 但神是我心里力量， 
 是我福分到永远。 
741 LORD I AM CONTINUALLY WITH THEE IRREGULAR METER
1 Psalms and Scripture Portions
 Lord, I am continually with Thee: 
 Thou hast holden me by my right hand, 
 Thou shalt guide me, 
 Thou shalt guide me with Thy counsel, 
 And afterward receive me, 
 Receive me to glory. 
 Whom have I in heaven but Thee? 
 And there is none upon the earth 
 That I desire beside Thee. 
 My flesh and my heart faileth; 
 But God is the strength of my heart, 
 And my portion forever.
742 我要唱耶和华的大慈爱到永远 特.
1 诗 89:1
 我要唱耶和华的大慈爱到永远，  我要唱，我要唱； 
 我要唱耶和华的大慈爱到永远，  我要唱耶和华的大慈爱。 
 用我口，叫人知道你的信实，  你的信实； 
 用我口，叫人知道你的信实，  直到万世万代。 
 我要唱耶和华的大慈爱到永远，  我要唱，我要唱； 
 我要唱耶和华的大慈爱到永远，  我要唱耶和华的大慈爱。 
742 I WILL SING OF THE MERCIES OF THE  LORD FOREVER
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord forever, 
 I will sing, I will sing. 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord forever, 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord. 
 With my mouth will I make known  
 Thy faithfulness, Thy faithfulness; 
 With my mouth will I make known 
 Thy faithfulness to all generations. 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord forever, 
 I will sing, I will sing. 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord forever, 
 I will sing of the mercies of the Lord.
743 我的心称颂神我的心称颂神
1 诗 103:1
 我的心，称颂神；我的心，称颂神；  凡在我里面的阿，称颂祂圣名。 
743 BLESS THE LORD O MY SOUL BLESS THE  LORD O MY SOUL
1 Psalms and Scripture Portions
 Bless the Lord, O my soul; Bless the Lord, O my soul;  And all that is within me, Bless His holy name.
744 我拿什么来报答神
1 诗 116:12~13
 我拿什么来报答神， 
 向我，向我所赐一切厚恩？  我要举起救恩的杯， 
 称扬，称扬，称扬我神耶和华的名。 
744 WHAT SHALL I GIVE UNTO THE LORD
1 Psalms and Scripture Portions
 What shall I give unto the Lord 
 For all, for all, for all He’s done for me? 
 I’ll take the cup of salvation, 
 And call, and call, and call upon the name of the Lord.
745 当主将那些被掳的带回锡安之时 特.
1 诗 126:1~3
 当主将那些被掳的带回锡安之时，  我们好像作梦， 
 好像作梦的人。 
 我们满口喜乐欢笑、满舌欢呼之时，  外邦人中就有人说， 
 主为他们行事， 
 主为他们行了大事。 
 主为我们行了大事，我们就欢喜；  主为我们行了大事， 
 我们就欢喜。 
 当主将那些被掳的带回锡安之时，  我们好像作梦，好像作梦的人。 
745 WHEN THE LORD TURNED AGAIN THE  CAPTIVITY OF ZION
1 IRREGULAR METER
Psalms and Scripture Portions 
 When the Lord turned again the captivity of Zion,  We were like them that dream, 
 We were like them that dream. 
 Then was our mouth filled with laughter, 
 And our tongue with singing: 
 Then said they among the nations, 
 The Lord hath done great things, 
 The Lord hath done great things for them. 
 The Lord hath done great things for us; 
 Whereof we are glad. 
 The Lord hath done great things for us; 
 Whereof we are glad.

746 “我已拣选了锡安
1 诗 132:13~16
 “我已拣选了锡安， 
 作我居所。 
 是我永远安息之所， 
 我要住这里，这是我所愿意。  我要使其中的粮食极丰满，  使其中的穷人都饱足。 
 我要使祭司披上救恩， 
 使圣民大声赞美欢呼。” 
746 THIS IS MY REST FOREVER IRREGULAR METER
1 Psalms and Scripture Portions
 This is My rest forever; 
 Here will I dwell, 
 For the Lord hath chosen Zion, 
 He hath desired it for His habitation.  He will abundantly bless her provision:  He will satisfy her poor with bread.  He will clothe her priests with salvation,  And her saints shall shout aloud for joy.
